Delaware, session 153, HB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE:
Section 1. The several amounts named in this Act, or such part thereof as may be necessary and essential to
the proper conduct of the business of the agencies named herein, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026, are
hereby appropriated and authorized to be paid out of the Treasury of the State by the respective departments and
divisions of State Government, and other specified spending agencies, subject to the limitations of this Act and to the
provisions of Title 29, Part VI, Delaware Code, as amended or qualified by this Act, all other provisions of the
Delaware Code notwithstanding. All parts or portions of the several sums appropriated by this Act which, on the last
day of June 2025 2026, shall not have been paid out of the State Treasury, shall revert to the General Fund; provided,
however, that no funds shall revert which are encumbered pursuant to 29 Del. C. § 6521.
The several amounts hereby appropriated are as follows:
OMB:GOV Page 1 of 311
0211530001

INDEX - Section 1
PAGE
LEGISLATIVE .................................................................................................................................................... 2
JUDICIAL ............................................................................................................................................................ 4
EXECUTIVE ....................................................................................................................................................... 8
DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION .................................................................. 11
OTHER ELECTIVE ................................................................................................................................... 13
LEGAL ....................................................................................................................................................... 15
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES ........................................................................................... 17
DEPARTMENT OF STATE ............................................................................................................................. 20
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE ........................................................................................................................ 25
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES ........................................................................... 27
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR CHILDREN, YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES ............................ 34
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION ............................................................................................................... 36
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL .......................... 38
DEPARTMENT OF SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY................................................................... 42
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ..................................................................................................... 45
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR ............................................................................................................................ 48
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE ............................................................................................................. 50
DEPARTMENT OF ELECTIONS ................................................................................................................... 51
FIRE PREVENTION COMMISSION.............................................................................................................. 52
DELAWARE NATIONAL GUARD ............................................................................................................... 53
ADVISORY COUNCIL FOR EXCEPTIONAL CITIZENS .......................................................................... 54
HIGHER EDUCATION .................................................................................................................................... 55
UNIVERSITY OF DELAWARE ........................................................................................................... 55
DELAWARE GEOLOGICAL SURVEY .............................................................................................. 55
DELAWARE STATE UNIVERSITY .................................................................................................... 55
DELAWARE TECHNICAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE .................................................................... 56
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION .................................................................................................................. 57
i

INDEX - Epilogue
PAGE
GENERAL .............................................................................................................................. (Sections 2 - 31) .......... 62
TOBACCO - MASTER SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT .................................................... (Sections 32 - 34) ........ 125
LEGISLATIVE ....................................................................................................................... (Sections 35 - 38) ........ 128
JUDICIAL ............................................................................................................................... (Sections 39 - 48) ........ 129
EXECUTIVE .......................................................................................................................... (Sections 49 - 73) ........ 132
TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION .............................................................................. (Sections 74 - 78) ........ 140
OTHER ELECTIVE ............................................................................................................... (Sections 79 - 86) ........ 142
LEGAL .................................................................................................................................... (Sections 87 - 94) ........ 144
HUMAN RESOURCES ......................................................................................................... (Sections 95 - 99) ........ 146
STATE ..................................................................................................................................... (Sections 100 - 116) .... 148
FINANCE ................................................................................................................................ (Sections 117 - 124) .... 153
HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES ................................................................................... (Sections 125 - 180) .... 156
SERVICES FOR CHILDREN, YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES .................................... (Sections 181 - 191) .... 173
CORRECTION ....................................................................................................................... (Sections 192 - 209) .... 176
NATURAL RESOURCES AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL .................................. (Sections 210 - 222) .... 181
SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY .......................................................................... (Sections 223 - 235) .... 184
TRANSPORTATION ............................................................................................................. (Sections 236 - 244) .... 187
LABOR ................................................................................................................................... (Sections 245 - 249) .... 190
AGRICULTURE .................................................................................................................... (Sections 250 - 256) .... 192
ELECTIONS ........................................................................................................................... (Sections 257 - 263) .... 194
NATIONAL GUARD ............................................................................................................. (Sections 264 - 265) .... 196
HIGHER EDUCATION ......................................................................................................... (Sections 266 - 283) .... 197
EDUCATION ......................................................................................................................... (Sections 284 - 344) .... 203
ii

DEPARTMENTS
Year ending June 30, 2026
(01-00-00) LEGISLATIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(01-01-01) General Assembly - House
39.0 Personnel Costs 8,093.4
Travel:
Other - Travel 25.3
Mileage - Legislative 70.0
Contractual Services 1,616.5
Supplies and Materials 60.0
Other Items:
Expenses - House Members 389.3
House Committee Expenses 100.0
39.0 TOTAL -- General Assembly - House 10,354.5

(01-02-01) General Assembly - Senate
34.0 Personnel Costs 5,814.6
Travel:
Other - Travel 29.8
Mileage - Legislative 22.3
Contractual Services 530.0
Supplies and Materials 60.0
Other Items:
Expenses - Senate Members 199.4
Senate Committee Expenses 55.0
34.0 TOTAL -- General Assembly - Senate 6,711.1

(01-05-01) Commission on Interstate Cooperation
Travel 29.0
Contractual Services 40.0
Other Items:
Council of State Governments 132.8
National Conference of State Legislatures 150.2
National Foundation for Women Legislators 25.0
National Black Caucus of State Legislators 1.6
Legislation for Gaming States 5.0
Eastern Trade Council 5.0
Interstate Agriculture Commission 25.0
Delaware River Basin Commission 447.0
TOTAL -- Commission on Interstate Cooperation 860.6


Year ending June 30, 2026
(01-00-00) LEGISLATIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(01-08-00) Legislative Council
(01-08-01) Legislative Services
24.0 Personnel Costs 3,001.3
Travel 15.4
Contractual Services 315.8
Supplies and Materials 33.8
Capital Outlay 27.0
Other Items:
Printing - Laws and Journals 20.0
Sunset Committee Expenses 7.5
Security 50.0
24.0 TOTAL -- Legislative Services 3,470.8

(01-08-02) Office of the Controller General
12.0 Personnel Costs 1,641.8
Travel 6.5
Contractual Services 1,810.5
Supplies and Materials 63.0
Capital Outlay 24.3
Contingencies:
Legislative Council 25.0
JFC/CIP Contingency 15.0
12.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Controller General 3,586.1

(01-08-03) Code Revisors
Travel 1.0
Contractual Services 170.8
TOTAL -- Code Revisors 171.8

(01-08-06) Commission on Uniform State Laws
Travel 10.0
Contractual Services 45.0
TOTAL -- Commission on Uniform State Laws 55.0

36.0 TOTAL -- Legislative Council 7,283.7


109.0 TOTAL -- LEGISLATIVE 25,209.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(02-00-00) JUDICIAL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(02-01-00) Supreme Court
10.3 33.0 Personnel Costs 4,520.2
Travel 6.8 15.2
Contractual Services 101.4 205.2
Energy 8.3
Supplies and Materials 5.0 32.8
Capital Outlay 6.7
Other Items:
Technology 20.0
Court Security 1.8
10.3 33.0 TOTAL -- Supreme Court 141.7 4,781.7

33.0 (-10) Supreme Court 141.7 4,781.7
10.3 (-40) Regulatory Arms of the Court
10.3 33.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 141.7 4,781.7

(02-02-00) Court of Chancery
7.0 24.5 56.5 Personnel Costs 1,641.8 7,263.5
Travel 12.8
Contractual Services 334.0 45.3
Supplies and Materials 97.9
Capital Outlay 25.0
Other Item:
Court Security 19.6
7.0 24.5 56.5 TOTAL -- Court of Chancery 2,131.1 7,308.8

7.0 24.5 56.5 (-10) Court of Chancery 2,131.1 7,308.8
7.0 24.5 56.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 2,131.1 7,308.8

(02-03-00) Superior Court
315.5 Personnel Costs 31,928.2
Travel 57.7
Contractual Services 693.2
Supplies and Materials 206.8
Capital Outlay 41.4
Other Items:
Jury Expenses 597.8
12.0 Expungement Acts 712.8
Court Security 130.9
327.5 TOTAL -- Superior Court 130.9 34,237.9

327.5 (-10) Superior Court 130.9 34,237.9
327.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 130.9 34,237.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(02-00-00) JUDICIAL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(02-06-00) Court of Common Pleas
6.0 141.0 Personnel Costs 255.1 13,589.6
Travel 14.8
Contractual Services 349.9
Supplies and Materials 87.1
Capital Outlay 4.0 9.6
Other Item:
2.0 Court Security 228.5
8.0 141.0 TOTAL -- Court of Common Pleas 487.6 14,051.0

8.0 141.0 (-10) Court of Common Pleas 487.6 14,051.0
8.0 141.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 487.6 14,051.0

(02-08-00) Family Court
1.0 59.3 289.7 Personnel Costs 3,907.6 27,803.8
Travel 12.3 33.2
Contractual Services 289.7 583.0
Supplies and Materials 81.8 109.2
Capital Outlay 48.0
Other Items:
2.0 Expungement Acts 180.5
Family Court Civil Attorneys 464.4
Court Security 136.0
Title IV-E Legal Representation and Training 287.5
Parental Representation 1,208.0
1.0 59.3 291.7 TOTAL -- Family Court 4,762.9 30,382.1

1.0 59.3 291.7 (-10) Family Court 4,762.9 30,382.1
1.0 59.3 291.7 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 4,762.9 30,382.1

(02-13-00) Justice of the Peace Court
17.5 264.5 Personnel Costs 1,524.0 24,110.5
Travel 11.5
Contractual Services 2,395.6
Energy 104.7
Supplies and Materials 165.4
Other Items:
Court Security 376.6
8.0 Right to Representation 739.7
17.5 272.5 TOTAL -- Justice of the Peace Court 1,900.6 27,527.4

17.5 272.5 (-10) Justice of the Peace Court 1,900.6 27,527.4
17.5 272.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,900.6 27,527.4

(02-15-00) Central Services Account
Contractual Services 60.1
TOTAL -- Central Services Account 60.1

(-10) Central Services Account 60.1
TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 60.1


Year ending June 30, 2026
(02-00-00) JUDICIAL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(02-17-00) Administrative Office of the Courts -
Court Services
87.5 Personnel Costs 9,166.4
Travel 26.5
Contractual Services 1,262.3
Supplies and Materials 231.5
Capital Outlay 216.8
Other Items:
Technology Maintenance 1,926.2
Retired Judges 100.0
Continuing Judicial Education 58.3
Elder Law Program 47.0
Victim Offender Mediation Program 361.0
Interpreters 523.3
Court Appointed Attorneys/Involuntary Commitment 177.6
New Castle County Courthouse 361.4
Judicial Services 2,050.0
Training 20.0
Law Related Education 100.0
Right to Representation 2,450.0
87.5 TOTAL -- Administrative Office of the Courts - 2,050.0 17,028.3
Court Services

37.0 (-01) Office of the State 2,050.0 8,945.4
Court Administrator
9.0 (-03) Office of State Court 792.5
Collections Enforcement
38.0 (-04) Information Technology 6,782.2
3.5 (-05) Law Libraries 508.2
87.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 2,050.0 17,028.3


Year ending June 30, 2026
(02-00-00) JUDICIAL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(02-18-00) Administrative Office of the Courts -
Non-Judicial Services
1.0 48.0 Personnel Costs 94.7 4,954.0
Travel 16.4
Contractual Services 221.3
Energy 4.5
Supplies and Materials 26.1
Other Items:
Special Needs Fund 0.5
Child Attorneys 386.5
Ivy Davis Scholarship Fund 75.0
Guardianship Fees 43.0
Youth in Transition 60.0
1.0 48.0 TOTAL -- Administrative Office of the Courts - 137.7 5,744.3
Non-Judicial Services

1.0 11.0 (-01) Office of the Public Guardian 137.7 989.5
30.0 (-05) Office of the Child Advocate 3,977.7
5.0 (-06) Maternal and Child Death Review 555.3
Commission
2.0 (-07) Delaware Nursing Home Residents 221.8
Quality Assurance Commission
1.0 48.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 137.7 5,744.3


18.3 110.3 1,257.7 TOTAL -- JUDICIAL 11,802.6 141,061.5


Year ending June 30, 2026
(10-00-00) EXECUTIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(10-01-01) Office of the Governor
29.0 Personnel Costs 3,831.0
Travel 8.0
Contractual Services 388.2
Supplies and Materials 29.7
Other Item:
Woodburn Expenses 70.0
29.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Governor 4,326.9

(10-02-00) Office of Management and Budget
9.2 125.8 221.0 Personnel Costs 13,654.9 22,224.9
Travel 43.6 14.2
Contractual Services 10,993.6 17,593.0
Energy 134.7 6,592.0
Supplies and Materials 4,231.0 1,941.8
Capital Outlay 379.1 438.5
Budget Administration Other Items:
Budget Automation - Operations 78.0
Trans and Invest 500.0
Contingencies and One-Time Items:
Technology 374.0
Prior Years' Obligations 450.0
Legal Fees 2,071.0
Appropriated Special Funds 91,100.0
Salary/OEC Contingency 149,213.4
Judicial Nominating Committee 8.0
Elder Tax Relief and Education Expense Fund 31,789.3
Civil Indigent Services 1,000.0
Local Law Enforcement Education 150.0
DE Child Well-Being Benchmark 100.5
Behavioral Health Consortium 1,075.0
Veterans Tax Relief Education Expense Fund 2,500.0
DE Demographic Studies 100.0
OPEB Investments 61,292.2
Higher Education Contingency 2,450.0
Pensions Other Items:
Other Items 668.0
Health Insurance - Retirees in Closed 4,067.3
State Police Plan
Pensions - Paraplegic Veterans 51.0
Pensions - Retirees in Closed State Police Plan 26,200.0
Fleet Management Other Items:
Cars and Wagons 12,519.7
Fleet Link Expenses 727.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(10-00-00) EXECUTIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
Food Distribution Other Items:
Food Processing 500.0
Truck Leases 10.0
Facilities Management Other Items:
2.0 Absalom Jones Building 384.6
Leased Facilities 185.6
9.2 127.8 221.0 TOTAL -- Office of Management and Budget 136,032.0 331,774.1

0.7 3.0 24.3 (-05) Administration 2,194.5 3,149.7
7.5 23.5 (-10) Budget Development and Planning 1,964.3 5,032.0
(-11) Contingencies and One-Time 91,100.0 252,573.4
Items
1.0 69.0 (-32) Pensions 10,682.6 30,318.3
Government Support Services
8.0 (-40) Mail/Courier Services 2,243.8 747.8
32.0 (-42) Fleet Management 24,843.5
1.5 24.5 (-44) Contracting 258.7 2,558.3
4.0 (-45) Delaware Surplus Services 507.4
2.0 3.3 3.7 (-46) Food Distribution 913.1 372.5
5.5 5.5 35.0 (-47) PHRST 738.9 4,309.0
2.0 102.0 (-50) Facilities Management 585.2 32,713.1
9.2 127.8 221.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 136,032.0 331,774.1

(10-07-00) Criminal Justice
(10-07-01) Criminal Justice Council
17.0 15.0 Personnel Costs 1,892.6
Contractual Services 71.1
Supplies and Materials 3.6
Other Items:
Videophone Fund 212.5
Domestic Violence Coordinating 42.7
Council
2.0 Other Grants 143.9
2.0 Board of Parole 250.9
Public Attorney Student Loan Repayment Program 500.0
2.0 Marijuana Control Act 138.0
2.0 Family Justice Centers 229.5
17.0 2.0 21.0 TOTAL -- Criminal Justice Council 350.5 3,134.3

(10-07-02) Delaware Justice Information System
16.0 Personnel Costs 1,796.0
Travel 5.3
Contractual Services 2,596.3
Supplies and Materials 92.1
Other Items:
2.0 Expungement Acts 191.7
VINE 172.1
1.0 Permit to Purchase 64.0
19.0 TOTAL -- Delaware Justice Information System 4,917.5


Year ending June 30, 2026
(10-00-00) EXECUTIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(10-07-03) Statistical Analysis Center
7.0 Personnel Costs 647.9
Travel 0.7
Contractual Services 50.4
Supplies and Materials 3.1
7.0 TOTAL -- Statistical Analysis Center 702.1

17.0 2.0 47.0 TOTAL -- Criminal Justice 350.5 8,753.9

(10-08-01) Delaware State Housing Authority
2.0 Personnel Costs 405.6
Other Items:
Student Housing Emergency Assistance Fund 50.0
Housing Development Fund 14,000.0 4,000.0
State Rental Assistance Program 4,000.0
2.0 TOTAL -- Delaware State Housing Authority 14,405.6 8,050.0


26.2 131.8 297.0 TOTAL -- EXECUTIVE 150,788.1 352,904.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(11-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(11-01-00) Office of the Chief Information Officer
9.0 Personnel Costs 1,598.6
Travel 0.5
Contractual Services 93.0
Supplies and Materials 0.3
Hardware and Software 20.0
Technology 800.0
9.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Chief Information Officer 2,512.4

9.0 (-01) Chief Information Officer 2,512.4
9.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 2,512.4

(11-02-00) Security Office
12.0 9.0 Personnel Costs 1,604.9 1,070.6
Travel 25.0 1.3
Contractual Services 2,663.5 8.4
Supplies and Materials 48.5 2.3
Hardware and Software 2,679.5 234.4
Technology 436.5
12.0 9.0 TOTAL -- Security Office 7,021.4 1,753.5

12.0 9.0 (-01) Chief Security Officer 7,021.4 1,753.5
12.0 9.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 7,021.4 1,753.5

(11-03-00) Operations Office
33.5 71.5 Personnel Costs 3,079.0 9,551.3
Travel 134.7 12.2
Contractual Services 15,306.8 1,240.9
Energy 504.7
Supplies and Materials 97.0 166.1
Capital Outlay 138.6 9.3
Hardware and Software 10,481.7 5,530.3
Technology 13,194.6
33.5 71.5 TOTAL -- Operations Office 29,237.8 30,209.4

1.0 (-01) Chief Operating Officer 10,575.2 131.7
4.0 5.0 (-02) Administration 1,040.5 5,106.7
6.5 27.5 (-04) Data Center and Operations 6,265.9 14,420.6
14.0 15.0 (-05) Telecommunications 9,398.3 5,062.8
8.0 24.0 (-06) Systems Engineering 1,957.9 5,487.6
33.5 71.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 29,237.8 30,209.4


Year ending June 30, 2026
(11-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(11-04-00) Technology Office
40.2 101.8 Personnel Costs 5,271.1 14,506.6
Travel 40.0 1.9
Contractual Services 2,375.0 1,290.1
Supplies and Materials 5.0 3.4
Hardware and Software 870.0 3,879.8
Technology 380.0
40.2 101.8 TOTAL -- Technology Office 8,561.1 20,061.8

13.0 (-01) Innovation & Architecture 29.0 2,224.3
4.0 13.0 (-02) Senior Project Management Team 571.4 2,242.7
27.2 40.8 (-04) Application Delivery & Support 5,754.3 7,423.0
4.0 27.0 (-06) Enterprise Solutions 1,559.6 6,534.9
5.0 8.0 (-08) Enterprise Data Management 646.8 1,636.9
40.2 101.8 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 8,561.1 20,061.8

(11-05-00) Office of Policy and Communications
5.0 Personnel Costs 613.6
5.0 TOTAL -- Office of Policy and Communications 613.6

5.0 (-01) Chief Policy Officer 613.6
5.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 613.6

(11-06-00) Chief of Partner Services
21.9 52.1 Personnel Costs 1,946.2 5,703.9
Hardware and Software 100.0
Technology 500.0
21.9 52.1 TOTAL -- Chief of Partner Services 1,946.2 6,303.9

16.0 41.0 (-01) End User Services 1,118.2 4,696.8
5.9 11.1 (-02) Partner Engagement Services 828.0 1,607.1
21.9 52.1 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 1,946.2 6,303.9


107.6 248.4 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY 46,766.5 61,454.6
AND INFORMATION


Year ending June 30, 2026
(12-00-00) OTHER ELECTIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(12-01-01) Lieutenant Governor
5.0 7.0 Personnel Costs 1,078.6
Travel 1.3
Contractual Services 136.2
Supplies and Materials 2.1
Other Item:
Expenses - Lieutenant Governor 7.7
5.0 7.0 TOTAL -- Lieutenant Governor 1,225.9

(12-02-01) Auditor of Accounts
4.0 23.0 Personnel Costs 380.2 2,856.9
Travel 14.7 4.9
Contractual Services 791.5 926.5
Supplies and Materials 4.4 44.4
Capital Outlay 29.0 10.7
4.0 23.0 TOTAL -- Auditor of Accounts 1,219.8 3,843.4

(12-03-00) Insurance Commissioner
(12-03-01) Regulatory Activities
14.0 Personnel Costs 1,363.2
Travel 2.4
Contractual Services 402.0
Supplies and Materials 8.8
Capital Outlay 5.4
Other Item:
Malpractice Review 5.0
14.0 TOTAL -- Regulatory Activities 1,786.8

(12-03-02) Bureau of Examination,
Rehabilitation and Guaranty
3.7 90.3 Personnel Costs 8,378.7
Travel 85.0
Contractual Services 2,233.3
Supplies and Materials 99.7
Capital Outlay 67.1
Other Items:
Captive Insurance Fund 3,533.4
Arbitration Program 36.5
Contract Examiners 17,000.0
IHCAP 30.0
3.7 90.3 TOTAL -- Bureau of Examination, 31,463.7
Rehabilitation and Guaranty

3.7 104.3 TOTAL -- Insurance Commissioner 33,250.5


Year ending June 30, 2026
(12-00-00) OTHER ELECTIVE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(12-05-00) State Treasurer
(12-05-01) Administration
5.0 4.0 Personnel Costs 506.8 737.1
Travel 24.5
Contractual Services 266.6 206.0
Supplies and Materials 9.1 5.3
Capital Outlay 25.5
5.0 4.0 TOTAL -- Administration 832.5 948.4

(12-05-02) Operations and Fund Management
9.0 Personnel Costs 943.6
Other Item:
Banking Services 4,236.0
9.0 TOTAL -- Operations and Fund Management 5,179.6

(12-05-03) Debt Management
Debt Service 263,334.0
Expense of Issuing Bonds 354.1
Financial Advisor 130.0
Debt Service - Local Schools 79,167.4
TOTAL -- Debt Management 79,167.4 263,818.1

(12-05-05) Reconciliation and Transaction Management
6.0 4.0 Personnel Costs 455.7 541.1
Contractual Services 83.0
Other Item:
Data Processing 527.1
6.0 4.0 TOTAL -- Reconciliation and Transaction Management 1,065.8 541.1

(12-05-06) Contributions and Plan Management
4.0 Personnel Costs
Other Items:
403(b) Plans 75.0
1.0 EARNS 139.7
4.0 1.0 TOTAL -- Contributions and Plan Management 139.7 75.0

4.0 21.0 8.0 TOTAL -- State Treasurer 86,385.0 265,382.6


12.7 129.3 38.0 TOTAL -- OTHER ELECTIVE 120,855.3 270,451.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(15-00-00) LEGAL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(15-01-00) Department of Justice
47.1 74.6 360.3 Personnel Costs 1,750.5 48,787.2
Travel 12.3
Contractual Services 2,696.8
Energy 62.1
Supplies and Materials 67.8
Capital Outlay 9.0
Other Items:
Extradition 166.0
Victims Rights 192.1 272.6
Securities Administration 1,167.8
Child Support 1,646.8
Consumer Protection 3,055.5
AG Opinion Fund 15.0
Transcription Services 170.0
National Mortgage Settlement 1,390.2
22.0 Body Camera Program 3,105.5
False Claims 660.1
2.0 Expungement Acts 188.8
1.0 Firearm Transaction Approval Program 183.5
Tobacco Fund:
2.0 Personnel Costs 278.1
2.0 Marijuana Control Act 356.0
Victim Compensation Assistance Program:
8.0 Personnel Costs 550.0
Travel 24.0
Contractual Services 82.3
Supplies and Materials 20.0
Capital Outlay 6.0
Revenue Refund 1.5
Violent Crime Grants 2,500.0
47.1 86.6 385.3 TOTAL -- Department of Justice 13,695.9 55,721.6

47.1 86.6 385.3 (-01) Department of Justice 13,695.9 55,721.6
47.1 86.6 385.3 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 13,695.9 55,721.6


Year ending June 30, 2026
(15-00-00) LEGAL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(15-02-00) Office of Defense Services
177.0 Personnel Costs 24,597.2
Travel 15.6
Contractual Services 2,157.3
Supplies and Materials 59.7
Capital Outlay 3.4
Other Items:
Conflict Attorneys 6,316.5
16.0 Body Camera Program 3,150.4
193.0 TOTAL -- Office of Defense Services 36,300.1

46.0 (-01) Central Administration 6,639.0
137.0 (-02) Public Defender 21,840.9
10.0 (-03) Office of Conflicts Counsel 7,820.2
193.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 36,300.1


47.1 86.6 578.3 TOTAL -- LEGAL 13,695.9 92,021.7


Year ending June 30, 2026
(16-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(16-01-00) Office of the Secretary
2.0 31.5 50.5 Personnel Costs 3,225.3 6,904.0
Travel 0.2 23.0
Contractual Services 649.5 1,267.6
Supplies and Materials 18.3
Capital Outlay 7.5
2.0 31.5 50.5 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 3,875.0 8,220.4

2.0 31.5 50.5 (-01) Office of the Secretary 3,875.0 8,220.4
2.0 31.5 50.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 3,875.0 8,220.4

(16-02-00) Division of Talent Management
3.0 41.0 Personnel Costs 325.2 4,161.4
Travel 2.0
Contractual Services 4.6 3.1
Supplies and Materials 0.2
3.0 41.0 TOTAL -- Division of Talent Management 331.8 4,164.7

3.0 41.0 (-01) Division of Talent Management 331.8 4,164.7
3.0 41.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 331.8 4,164.7

(16-03-00) Division of Diversity, Equity and Inclusion
1.0 3.0 Personnel Costs 1.9 364.8
Travel 2.0
Contractual Services 59.6 5.6
Supplies and Materials 1.0
1.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Division of Diversity, Equity and Inclusion 61.5 373.4

1.0 3.0 (-01) Division of Diversity, Equity and 61.5 373.4
Inclusion
1.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 61.5 373.4

(16-04-00) Division of Employee and Labor
Relations
3.0 18.0 Personnel Costs 363.1 2,220.3
Travel 1.1 0.9
Contractual Services 40.0
Supplies and Materials 0.2
3.0 18.0 TOTAL -- Division of Employee and Labor 364.2 2,261.4
Relations

3.0 18.0 (-01) Division of Employee and Labor 364.2 2,261.4
Relations
3.0 18.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 364.2 2,261.4


Year ending June 30, 2026
(16-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(16-05-00) Division of Statewide Benefits and
Insurance Coverage
33.0 Personnel Costs
Contractual Services 11,000.0
Other Item:
Self Insurance 11,000.0
33.0 TOTAL -- Division of Statewide Benefits and 22,000.0
Insurance Coverage

26.0 (-01) Division of Statewide Benefits
7.0 (-02) Insurance Coverage Office 22,000.0
33.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 22,000.0

(16-06-00) Office of Women's Advancement
and Advocacy
1.0 2.0 Personnel Costs 211.4 131.8
Travel 2.0
Contractual Services 17.3 18.8
Supplies and Materials 0.5
1.0 2.0 TOTAL -- Office of Women's Advancement 228.7 153.1
and Advocacy

1.0 2.0 (-01) Office of Women's Advancement 228.7 153.1
and Advocacy
1.0 2.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 228.7 153.1

(16-07-00) Division of Training and Human
Resource Solutions
1.0 9.0 14.0 Personnel Costs 940.7 1,341.7
Travel 3.3 0.1
Contractual Services 657.3 295.8
Supplies and Materials 15.9
Other Items:
Blue Collar 100.0
Training Expenses 55.0
GEAR Award 25.0
First State Quality Improvement Fund 350.0
1.0 9.0 14.0 TOTAL -- Division of Training and Human 1,772.2 2,012.6
Resource Solutions

1.0 9.0 14.0 (-01) Division of Training and Human 1,772.2 2,012.6
Resource Solutions
1.0 9.0 14.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,772.2 2,012.6


Year ending June 30, 2026
(16-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(16-08-00) Division of Classification,
Compensation and Talent Acquisition
11.5 28.5 Personnel Costs 1,196.7 2,958.9
Travel 2.0
Contractual Services 198.4 248.0
Supplies and Materials 1.2
Other Item:
12.0 Agency Aide 562.6
11.5 40.5 TOTAL -- Division of Classification, 1,397.1 3,770.7
Compensation and Talent Acquisition

11.5 40.5 (-01) Division of Classification, 1,397.1 3,770.7
Compensation and Talent
Acquisition
11.5 40.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,397.1 3,770.7


36.0 60.0 169.0 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES 8,030.5 42,956.3


Year ending June 30, 2026
(20-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF STATE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(20-01-00) Office of the Secretary
13.5 39.5 Personnel Costs 1,071.2 3,250.0
Travel 44.1 17.5
Contractual Services 3,252.2 681.5
Energy 74.9
Supplies and Materials 108.3 43.5
Capital Outlay 168.0
Other Items:
Hispanic Affairs 50.0
International Trade of Delaware 180.0
Veterans Commission Trust Fund 100.0
Assistance for Needy and Homeless Veterans 42.2
Filing Fees/Lobbyists 6.0
E-Government 500.0
Equity Ombudsperson Program 1,000.0
13.5 39.5 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 5,149.8 5,439.6

11.0 7.0 (-01) Administration 3,765.1 2,081.8
25.0 (-02) Delaware Commission of 220.0 2,475.6
Veterans Affairs
2.5 1.5 (-06) Government Information Center 1,158.7 162.9
2.0 (-08) Public Integrity Commission 6.0 223.6
4.0 (-09) Employment Relations Boards 495.7
13.5 39.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 5,149.8 5,439.6

(20-02-00) Human and Civil Rights
1.0 7.0 Personnel Costs 655.2
Travel 4.0
Contractual Services 142.3
Supplies and Materials 7.8
Capital Outlay 0.6
Other Item:
Human Relations Annual Conference 6.0
1.0 7.0 TOTAL -- Human and Civil Rights 6.0 809.9

1.0 7.0 (-01) Human and Civil Rights 6.0 809.9
1.0 7.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 6.0 809.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(20-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF STATE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(20-03-00) Delaware Public Archives
15.0 16.0 Personnel Costs 1,160.8 1,347.6
Travel 3.8
Contractual Services 385.1 232.0
Supplies and Materials 52.4
Capital Outlay 35.0
Other Items:
Delaware Heritage Commission 14.7
Document Conservation Fund 10.0
Historical Marker Maintenance 40.8
Operations 60.0
15.0 16.0 TOTAL -- Delaware Public Archives 1,747.9 1,594.3

15.0 16.0 (-01) Delaware Public Archives 1,747.9 1,594.3
15.0 16.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,747.9 1,594.3

(20-04-00) Regulation and Licensing
0.5 77.5 Personnel Costs 7,504.5
Travel 151.4
Contractual Services 6,730.0
Energy 8.0
Supplies and Materials 147.9
Capital Outlay 256.4
Other Items:
Real Estate Guaranty Fund 100.0
Examination Costs 54.5
Motor Vehicle Franchise Fund 15.0
0.5 77.5 TOTAL -- Regulation and Licensing 14,967.7

45.0 (-01) Professional Regulation 9,685.3
0.5 27.5 (-02) Public Service Commission 4,191.5
5.0 (-03) Public Advocate 1,090.9
0.5 77.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 14,967.7

(20-05-00) Corporations
119.0 Personnel Costs 8,444.3
Travel 27.0
Contractual Services 5,361.9
Supplies and Materials 63.0
Capital Outlay 505.0
Other Items:
Computer Time Costs 2,170.0
Technology Infrastructure Fund 10,600.0
119.0 TOTAL -- Corporations 27,171.2

119.0 (-01) Corporations 27,171.2
119.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 27,171.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(20-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF STATE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(20-06-00) Historical and Cultural Affairs
5.4 13.1 30.5 Personnel Costs 1,033.6 2,864.1
Travel 8.2 1.3
Contractual Services 1,209.6 487.3
Energy 74.9 330.3
Supplies and Materials 14.1 100.6
Capital Outlay 0.2 2.7
Other Items:
Museum Operations 24.0
Museum Conservation Fund 9.5
Conference Center Operations 32.1
Museum Sites 29.6
Dayett Mills 12.6 28.0
5.4 13.1 30.5 TOTAL -- Historical and Cultural Affairs 2,414.9 3,847.8

5.4 13.1 30.5 (-01) Office of the Director 2,414.9 3,847.8
5.4 13.1 30.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 2,414.9 3,847.8

(20-07-00) Arts
3.0 2.0 3.0 Personnel Costs 167.2 350.1
Travel 0.9
Contractual Services 3.4 61.9
Supplies and Materials 1.0
Other Items:
Art for the Disadvantaged 10.0
Delaware Art 1,321.0 419.2
Delaware Arts Trust Fund 3,600.0
3.0 2.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Arts 5,091.6 843.1

3.0 2.0 3.0 (-01) Office of the Director 5,091.6 843.1
3.0 2.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 5,091.6 843.1

(20-08-00) Libraries
7.0 4.0 4.0 Personnel Costs 285.2 477.3
Travel 0.5
Contractual Services 2.9 59.6
Supplies and Materials 18.4
Capital Outlay 5.4
Other Items:
Library Standards 2,346.4 4,358.0
Delaware Electronic Library 700.0
DELNET- Statewide 50.0 585.0
Public Education Project 1,215.0 1,000.0
Corporation Technology 750.0
Scholarships and Grants 220.0
7.0 4.0 4.0 TOTAL -- Libraries 5,349.5 6,724.2

7.0 4.0 4.0 (-01) Libraries 5,349.5 6,724.2
7.0 4.0 4.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 5,349.5 6,724.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(20-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF STATE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(20-09-00) Veterans Home
80.0 145.0 Personnel Costs 4,201.0 13,689.7
Travel 3.4
Contractual Services 1,522.1 1,083.7
Energy 528.7
Supplies and Materials 848.4 779.9
Capital Outlay 9.9 80.6
80.0 145.0 TOTAL -- Veterans Home 6,584.8 16,162.6

80.0 145.0 (-01) Veterans Home 6,584.8 16,162.6
80.0 145.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 6,584.8 16,162.6

(20-10-00) Small Business
7.0 19.0 Personnel Costs 805.7 2,618.5
Travel 20.0 6.3
Contractual Services 910.3 15.6
Supplies and Materials 20.9 14.0
Capital Outlay 24.8 6.6
Other Items:
Main Street 25.0
Delaware Small Business Development Center 400.0 150.5
1.0 Blue Collar 1,700.1
General Operating 320.9
Delaware Business Marketing Program 300.0
Financial Development Operations 379.5
National HS Wrestling Tournament 9.6
Tourism Marketing 1,025.0
Angel Investor 78.0
Business Incubators 625.0
8.0 19.0 TOTAL -- Small Business 6,019.8 3,436.5

1.0 19.0 (-01) Delaware Economic Development 3,329.8 3,436.5
Authority
7.0 (-02) Delaware Tourism Office 2,690.0
8.0 19.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 6,019.8 3,436.5

(20-15-00) State Banking Commission
36.0 Personnel Costs 2,758.2
Travel 80.0
Contractual Services 986.3
Supplies and Materials 20.0
Capital Outlay 67.5
36.0 TOTAL -- State Banking Commission 3,912.0

36.0 (-01) State Banking Commission 3,912.0
36.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 3,912.0


Year ending June 30, 2026
(20-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF STATE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(20-16-00) Office of the Alcoholic
Beverage Control Commissioner
8.0 Personnel Costs 815.8
Travel 8.0 0.5
Contractual Services 72.9 16.7
Supplies and Materials 3.0 7.1
8.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Alcoholic 83.9 840.1
Beverage Control Commissioner

8.0 (-10) Office of the Alcoholic Beverage 83.9 840.1
Control Commissioner
8.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 83.9 840.1


16.9 368.1 272.0 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF STATE 78,499.1 39,698.1


Year ending June 30, 2026
(25-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(25-01-00) Office of the Secretary
13.0 Personnel Costs 1,793.0
Travel 3.5
Contractual Services 418.0
Supplies and Materials 3.7
Capital Outlay 37.8
Other Items:
16.0 Information System Development 20,779.7
30.0 Escheat 55,749.7
DMHRA Board 5.5
46.0 13.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 76,529.4 2,261.5

46.0 13.0 (-01) Office of the Secretary 76,529.4 2,261.5
46.0 13.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 76,529.4 2,261.5

(25-05-00) Accounting
21.8 42.2 Personnel Costs 2,345.9 4,613.1
Travel 12.0 1.5
Contractual Services 826.6 712.7
Supplies and Materials 93.5 10.3
Capital Outlay 5.0
Other Item:
ERP Operational Funds 917.5
21.8 42.2 TOTAL -- Accounting 3,283.0 6,255.1

21.8 42.2 (-01) Accounting 3,283.0 6,255.1
21.8 42.2 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 3,283.0 6,255.1

(25-06-00) Revenue
75.0 Personnel Costs 7,226.3
Travel 4.0
Contractual Services 1,192.7
Energy 9.4
Supplies and Materials 85.4
Capital Outlay 203.4
Other Items:
7.0 Marijuana Control Act 678.0
67.0 Delinquent Collections 14,183.0
74.0 75.0 TOTAL -- Revenue 14,861.0 8,721.2

74.0 75.0 (-01) Revenue 14,861.0 8,721.2
74.0 75.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 14,861.0 8,721.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(25-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(25-07-00) State Lottery Office
56.0 Personnel Costs 5,427.6
Travel 50.0
Contractual Services 52,808.3
Supplies and Materials 40.0
Capital Outlay 190.0
56.0 TOTAL -- State Lottery Office 58,515.9

56.0 (-01) State Lottery Office 58,515.9
56.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 58,515.9


197.8 130.2 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE 153,189.3 17,237.8


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(35-01-00) Office of the Secretary
72.0 16.9 503.2 Personnel Costs 1,928.4 45,500.3
Travel 115.5
Contractual Services 1,670.6 6,790.9
Energy 212.5 437.2
Supplies and Materials 684.7 666.8
Capital Outlay 85.0
Tobacco Fund:
DHSS Library 74.8
Other Items:
DIMER Operations 1,980.2
DIMER Loan Repayment 198.4
DIDER Operations 200.0
DIDER Loan Repayment 17.5
Revenue Management 269.2
Program Integrity 232.8
EBT 338.3
Operations 2,556.7
DHSS/IRM 3,350.0
IRM License and Maintenance 638.0
Health Care Innovation 582.8
Technology Operations 445.0
Health Care Provider State Loan Repayment Program 1,500.0
Lyme Disease Education 5.0
72.0 16.9 503.2 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 11,180.2 59,300.4

2.0 35.0 (-10) Office of the Secretary 344.0 11,450.7
70.0 16.9 273.2 (-20) Administration 8,279.5 28,092.6
195.0 (-30) Facility Operations 2,556.7 19,757.1
72.0 16.9 503.2 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 11,180.2 59,300.4


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(35-02-00) Medicaid and Medical Assistance
110.4 93.1 Personnel Costs 9,113.4
Travel 0.1
Contractual Services 4,017.1
Energy 30.7
Supplies and Materials 35.7
Capital Outlay 5.9
Tobacco Fund:
Delaware Prescription Drug Program 1,216.5
Medical Assistance Transition 487.5
Medicaid 433.6
Cancer Council Recommendations:
Breast and Cervical Cancer Treatment 147.0
Social Determinants of Health 650.0
Other Items:
Medicaid 6,000.0 1,079,935.4
Medicaid for Workers with Disabilities 10.0
DOC Medicaid 2,500.0
DPH Fees 100.0
Delaware Healthy Children Program Premiums 900.0
Medicaid Long Term Care 14,500.0
Disproportionate Share Hospital 3,901.4
Nursing Home Quality Assessment 26,000.0
Technology Operations 1,211.3
Pathways 200.0
Promise 1,750.0
Delaware Healthy Children Program 10,979.3
Renal 729.5
Hospital Quality Assessment 40,000.0
110.4 93.1 TOTAL -- Medicaid and Medical Assistance 94,894.6 1,109,959.8

110.4 93.1 (-01) Medicaid and Medical Assistance 94,894.6 1,109,959.8
110.4 93.1 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 94,894.6 1,109,959.8


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(35-05-00) Public Health
345.9 41.1 288.3 Personnel Costs 27,641.4
Contractual Services 96.7 3,904.6
Energy 337.1
Supplies and Materials 60.0 836.6
Capital Outlay 22.4
Tobacco Fund:
Personnel Costs 1,227.8
Contractual Services 4,930.1
Diabetes 189.9
New Nurse Development 2,748.2
Public Access Defibrillation Initiative 38.9
Cancer Council Recommendations 9,276.5
Uninsured Action Plan 380.5
Innovation Fund 1,200.0
Healthy Communities Delaware 325.0
Other Items:
Tuberculosis 115.0
Child Development Watch 1,501.1
Preschool Diagnosis and Treatment 59.4
Immunizations 106.4
School Based Health Centers 5,363.3
Hepatitis B 4.0
Vanity Birth Certificates 14.7
Public Water 60.0
Medicaid Enhancements 205.0
Infant Mortality 100.0
Medicaid AIDS Waiver 160.0
Family Planning 325.0
Newborn 1,620.0
Indirect Costs 1,835.1
Dental Services 1,557.3
Food Inspection 21.0
Food Permits 575.0
Medicaid Contractors/Lab Testing and Analysis 1,155.0
Water Operator Certification 22.0
Health Statistics 1,800.0
Infant Mortality Task Force 4,201.6
J-1 VISA 13.5
Distressed Cemeteries 100.0
Plumbing Inspection 1,000.3
Cancer Council 33.1
Delaware Organ and Tissue Program 7.3
Developmental Screening 103.8
Uninsured Action Plan 18.4
Health Disparities 45.5
EMS Technology and Reporting 225.0


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
14.0 18.0 Animal Welfare 4,000.0 2,538.7
Spay/Neuter Program 800.0
Nurse Family Partnership 130.0
Prescription Drug Prevention 90.0
Substance Use Disorder Services 452.7
Technology Operations 179.6
Delaware CAN 1,524.3
Toxicology 22.0
29.5 Birth to Three Program 906.6 11,504.1
6.0 Marijuana Control 476.3
Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention 924.7
345.9 61.1 335.8 TOTAL -- Public Health 38,836.5 60,276.0

3.0 21.0 55.0 (-10) Director's Office/Support Services 8,335.1 6,706.6
341.9 40.1 273.8 (-20) Community Health 30,462.5 51,382.8
1.0 7.0 (-30) Emergency Medical Services 38.9 2,186.6
345.9 61.1 335.8 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 38,836.5 60,276.0

(35-06-00) Substance Abuse and Mental Health
20.0 1.0 557.1 Personnel Costs 299.4 54,901.2
Travel 6.2
Contractual Services 1,569.9 17,376.2
Energy 1,271.8
Supplies and Materials 1,000.6 3,385.1
Capital Outlay 9.0 142.8
Vehicles 41.2
Tobacco Fund:
Delaware School Study 18.3
Other Items:
Medicare Part D 1,119.0
TEFRA 100.0
DPC Disproportionate Share 2,550.0
Kent/Sussex Detox Center 150.0
CMH Group Homes 11,258.2
Community Placements 17,450.9
Community Housing Supports 5,639.9
Substance Use Disorder Services 19,158.8
Technology Operations 1,422.4
Heroin Residential Program 287.9
Behavioral Health Crisis Intervention Services Fund 8,000.0
Needle Exchange 660.4
20.0 1.0 557.1 TOTAL -- Substance Abuse and Mental Health 14,816.2 133,003.0

7.2 73.8 (-10) Administration 60.0 9,340.6
2.0 83.0 (-20) Community Mental Health 10,305.0 56,444.4
0.8 368.3 (-30) Delaware Psychiatric Center 3,696.8 41,471.9
10.0 1.0 32.0 (-40) Substance Abuse 754.4 25,746.1
20.0 1.0 557.1 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 14,816.2 133,003.0


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(35-07-00) Social Services
206.6 301.1 Personnel Costs 26,312.8
Travel 7.8 0.8
Contractual Services 320.1 3,514.6
Energy 231.3 914.0
Supplies and Materials 64.1 165.9
Capital Outlay 39.8 52.8
Tobacco Fund:
SSI Supplement 639.6
Other Items:
Cost Recovery 75.1
TANF Cash Assistance 14,020.2
TANF Child Support Pass Through 1,200.0
Child Care 76,929.8
Emergency Assistance 1,603.9
Employment and Training 2,419.7
General Assistance 4,678.7
Technology Operations 6,417.7
Group Violence Intervention 2,900.0
Summer EBT Program 500.0
Family Access and Visitation 473.0
Community Food Program 433.7
Emergency Housing/Shelters 1,658.6
Kinship Care 60.0
Smart Food Program 1,485.0
206.6 301.1 TOTAL -- Social Services 2,577.8 144,541.2

190.6 204.5 (-01) Social Services 1,914.7 131,098.2
16.0 96.6 (-02) State Service Centers 663.1 13,443.0
206.6 301.1 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 2,577.8 144,541.2

(35-08-00) Visually Impaired
18.0 47.0 Personnel Costs 4,436.0
Travel 1.5
Contractual Services 980.7
Energy 75.1
Supplies and Materials 66.8
Capital Outlay 39.1
Other Items:
BEP Unassigned Vending 175.0
BEP Independence 450.0
BEP Vending 425.0
Education 295.0
Educational Technology 200.0
18.0 47.0 TOTAL -- Visually Impaired 1,050.0 6,094.2

18.0 47.0 (-01) Visually Impaired Services 1,050.0 6,094.2
18.0 47.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,050.0 6,094.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(35-09-00) Health Care Quality
29.7 40.3 Personnel Costs 5,395.6
Travel 0.3
Contractual Services 968.2
Energy 8.2
Supplies and Materials 15.2
Other Items:
HFLC 135.3
Renewal Fees 150.0
Background Check Center 1,250.0
LTC Survey 80.8
29.7 40.3 TOTAL -- Health Care Quality 1,616.1 6,387.5

29.7 40.3 (-01) Health Care Quality 1,616.1 6,387.5
29.7 40.3 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,616.1 6,387.5

(35-10-00) Child Support Services
127.2 2.1 53.7 Personnel Costs 188.0 4,312.7
Travel 9.6
Contractual Services 1,024.9 305.5
Energy 30.0 16.1
Supplies and Materials 23.0
Capital Outlay 162.9
Other Items:
Recoupment 25.0
Technology Operations 1,919.3
127.2 2.1 53.7 TOTAL -- Child Support Services 1,463.4 6,553.6

127.2 2.1 53.7 (-01) Child Support Services 1,463.4 6,553.6
127.2 2.1 53.7 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,463.4 6,553.6

(35-11-00) Developmental Disabilities Services
1.2 1.0 408.0 Personnel Costs 42.4 33,089.4
Travel 1.1
Contractual Services 4,163.6
Energy 919.7
Supplies and Materials 810.9
Capital Outlay 13.5
Tobacco Fund:
Family Support 36.3
Autism Supports 460.0
Other Items:
Music Stipends 1.1
Purchase of Community Services 4,843.5 30,280.4
DDDS State Match 84,046.8
1.2 1.0 408.0 TOTAL -- Developmental Disabilities Services 5,382.2 153,326.5

0.5 1.0 74.5 (-10) Administration 502.4 8,371.8
204.8 (-20) Stockley Center 18,851.5
0.7 128.7 (-30) Community Services 4,879.8 126,103.2
1.2 1.0 408.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 5,382.2 153,326.5


Year ending June 30, 2026
(35-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(35-14-00) Services for Aging and Adults
with Physical Disabilities
24.8 579.9 Personnel Costs 49,740.7
Travel 1.1
Contractual Services 22,304.6
Energy 1,258.5
Supplies and Materials 2,225.6
Capital Outlay 50.5
Tobacco Fund:
Attendant Care 369.5
Caregivers Support 133.2
Respite Care 25.0
Other Items:
Community Based Services 500.0
Nutrition Program 789.9
Long Term Care 249.1
Long Term Care Prospective Payment 469.5
IV Therapy 559.0
Medicare Part D 1,674.3
Hospice 25.0
Senior Trust Fund 15.0
Medicare Part C - DHCI 250.0
Technology Operations 83.2
Respite Care 110.0
24.8 579.9 TOTAL -- Services for Aging and Adults 4,020.5 76,813.2
with Physical Disabilities

24.8 103.3 (-01) Administration/Community Services 1,042.7 30,649.4
476.6 (-20) Hospital for the Chronically Ill 2,977.8 46,163.8
24.8 579.9 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 4,020.5 76,813.2


955.8 82.1 2,919.2 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF 175,837.5 1,756,255.4
HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES


Year ending June 30, 2026
(37-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR CHILDREN,
YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(37-01-00) Management Support Services
6.8 7.0 204.3 Personnel Costs 471.4 21,481.3
Travel 22.2
Contractual Services 1,526.5 4,876.7
Energy 22.2
Supplies and Materials 311.6
Capital Outlay 8.4
Other Items:
MIS Development 8,466.6
Agency Operations 613.9
Background Check Center 120.0
Population Contingency 2,500.0
Services Integration 61.1
6.8 7.0 204.3 TOTAL -- Management Support Services 2,117.9 38,364.0

8.0 (-10) Office of the Secretary 3,958.6
4.3 0.5 61.0 (-15) Office of the Director 220.0 6,436.8
2.5 6.5 37.1 (-20) Fiscal Services 371.4 3,568.2
13.0 (-25) Facilities Management 4,230.4
(-30) Human Resources 69.8
7.0 (-35) Center for Professional 753.8
Development
58.0 (-40) Education Services 7,780.4
20.2 (-50) Management Information Systems 1,526.5 11,566.0
6.8 7.0 204.3 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 2,117.9 38,364.0

(37-04-00) Prevention and Behavioral Health Services
8.0 30.8 176.0 Personnel Costs 3,192.7 17,929.2
Travel 44.9
Contractual Services 2,500.0 28,757.6
Energy 137.2
Supplies and Materials 318.5
Capital Outlay 14.9
Tobacco Fund:
Prevention Programs for Youth 40.0
Other Items:
2.0 Birth to Three Program 165.6
57.0 K-5 Early Intervention 6,015.7
Targeted Prevention Programs 1,725.0
Middle School Behavioral Health Consultants 2,964.3
8.0 30.8 235.0 TOTAL -- Prevention and Behavioral Health Services 5,732.7 58,072.9

5.0 4.0 23.0 (-10) Managed Care Organization 1,036.0 3,960.6
3.0 1.5 69.5 (-20) Prevention/Early Intervention 405.1 13,450.9
24.8 53.0 (-30) Periodic Treatment 2,691.6 18,905.0
0.5 89.5 (-40) 24 Hour Treatment 1,600.0 21,756.4
8.0 30.8 235.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 5,732.7 58,072.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(37-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR CHILDREN,
YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(37-05-00) Youth Rehabilitative Services
1.0 393.0 Personnel Costs 36,709.0
Travel 16.8
Contractual Services 14,416.2
Energy 898.1
Supplies and Materials 1,438.7
Capital Outlay 6.7
1.0 393.0 TOTAL -- Youth Rehabilitative Services 53,485.5

10.0 (-10) Office of the Director 982.8
1.0 80.0 (-30) Community Services 18,173.9
303.0 (-50) Secure Care 34,328.8
1.0 393.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 53,485.5

(37-06-00) Family Services
16.0 6.0 402.1 Personnel Costs 653.7 38,139.8
Travel 20.4
Contractual Services 3,340.8
Energy 5.2
Supplies and Materials 73.4
Capital Outlay 13.8
Other Items:
Emergency Material Assistance 31.0
Child Welfare/Contractual Services 1,000.0 43,683.2
16.0 6.0 402.1 TOTAL -- Family Services 1,653.7 85,307.6

40.0 (-10) Office of the Director 34.7 6,020.0
9.0 2.0 212.1 (-30) Intake/Investigation 246.0 20,183.4
7.0 4.0 150.0 (-40) Intervention/Treatment 1,373.0 59,104.2
16.0 6.0 402.1 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 1,653.7 85,307.6


31.8 43.8 1,234.4 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF 9,504.3 235,230.0
SERVICES FOR CHILDREN,
YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES


Year ending June 30, 2026
(38-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(38-01-00) Administration
111.0 Personnel Costs 9,173.0
Travel 190.1
Contractual Services 4,015.4
Energy 166.6
Supplies and Materials 101.9
Capital Outlay 1.0
Other Items:
Information Technology 3,608.8
Drug Testing 112.6
4.0 Expungement Acts 219.5
115.0 TOTAL -- Administration 17,588.9

16.0 (-01) Office of the Commissioner 1,626.3
2.0 (-02) Human Resources 332.1
10.0 (-03) Planning, Research and Reentry 1,696.1
3.0 (-04) Education 499.6
26.0 (-10) Administrative Services 4,466.5
44.0 (-12) Central Offender Records 3,458.0
14.0 (-14) Information Technology 5,510.3
115.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 17,588.9

(38-02-00) Healthcare, Substance Abuse
and Mental Health Services
13.0 Personnel Costs 1,480.6
Contractual Services 12.3
Medical Services 89,987.8
13.0 TOTAL -- Healthcare, Substance Abuse 91,480.7
and Mental Health Services

13.0 (-01) Medical Treatment and Services 91,480.7
13.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 91,480.7

(38-04-00) Prisons
10.0 1,904.0 Personnel Costs 866.4 240,219.3
Travel 19.0 76.0
Contractual Services 480.2 9,886.1
Energy 7,454.6
Supplies and Materials 1,847.6 14,153.3
Capital Outlay 91.5 183.4
Other Items:
Emergency Preparedness 23.6
Gate Money 8.0
1.0 Prison Arts 123.2
JTVCC Fence 50.0
Central Supply Warehouse 96.2
Vehicles 40.5
10.0 1,905.0 TOTAL -- Prisons 3,345.2 272,273.7


Year ending June 30, 2026
(38-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF

8.0 (-01) Bureau Chief - Prisons 2,581.5
703.0 (-03) James T. Vaughn Correctional 95,828.0
Center
367.0 (-04) Sussex Correctional Institution 52,395.5
131.0 (-05) Delores J. Baylor Correctional 17,818.1
Institution
358.0 (-06) Howard R. Young Correctional 47,797.6
Institution
74.0 (-08) Special Operations 12,640.1
10.0 15.0 (-09) Delaware Correctional Industries 3,345.2 2,306.8
70.0 (-12) Steven R. Floyd Sr. Training 7,800.7
Academy
17.0 (-13) Intelligence Operations Center 2,168.8
87.0 (-20) Food Services 21,998.0
75.0 (-40) Facilities Maintenance 8,938.6
10.0 1,905.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 3,345.2 272,273.7

(38-06-00) Community Corrections
609.0 Personnel Costs 77,845.4
Travel 5.0 70.0
Contractual Services 128.0 6,316.8
Energy 30.0 1,105.1
Supplies and Materials 369.7 1,396.3
Capital Outlay 95.0 218.9
Other Item:
Riverview Cemetery Maintenance 70.0
609.0 TOTAL -- Community Corrections 627.7 87,022.5

6.0 (-01) Bureau Chief - Community 1,201.7
Corrections
361.0 (-02) Probation and Parole 52,691.4
82.0 (-07) Sussex County Community 437.7 11,711.5
Corrections
59.0 (-08) Kent County Community 95.0 9,500.4
Corrections
38.0 (-13) Hazel D. Plant Women's Treatment 38.0 4,207.6
Facility
63.0 (-14) Plummer Community Corrections 57.0 7,709.9
Center
609.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 627.7 87,022.5


10.0 2,642.0 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION 3,972.9 468,365.8


Year ending June 30, 2026
(40-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(40-01-00) Office of the Secretary
27.3 40.4 115.3 Personnel Costs 2,290.4 10,691.1
Travel 29.9 5.9
Contractual Services 1,071.3 1,203.3
Energy 77.5 658.4
Supplies and Materials 152.8 79.2
Capital Outlay 51.2
Vehicles 30.0
Internship Program 203.4
Other Items:
Non-Game Habitat 20.0
Coastal Zone Management 15.0
Special Projects/Other Items 15.0
Outdoor Delaware 105.0
Cost Recovery 20.0
SRF Future Administration 5,750.0
Other Items 120.0
27.3 40.4 115.3 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 9,748.1 12,841.3

4.0 16.0 (-01) Office of the Secretary 1,064.0 3,341.9
0.5 6.8 6.7 (-03) Community Affairs 687.2 1,388.2
1.0 (-05) Office of Innovation and 618.3 713.2
Technology Services
19.7 2.3 1.0 (-06) Environmental Finance 5,780.0 94.2
2.0 39.0 (-07) Fiscal Management 1,598.6 2,558.8
7.1 25.3 51.6 (-08) Natural Resources Police 4,745.0
27.3 40.4 115.3 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 9,748.1 12,841.3


Year ending June 30, 2026
(40-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(40-03-00) Office of Natural Resources
49.7 77.9 161.4 Personnel Costs 10,249.2 21,181.3
Travel 65.8 8.1
Contractual Services 9,668.5 3,863.7
Energy 281.9 1,055.9
Supplies and Materials 1,910.6 789.8
Capital Outlay 232.7 2.0
Other Items:
Aquaculture 5.0
Spraying and Insecticides 789.9
Oyster Recovery Fund 10.0
Beaver Control, Phragmites and Deer Management 72.9
Boat Repairs 40.0
Non-Game Habitat 50.0
Natural Heritage Program 19.0 192.4
Clean Vessel Program 32.4
Duck Stamp 180.0
Junior Duck Stamp 5.0
Trout Stamp 50.0
Finfish Development 130.0
Fisheries Restoration 600.0
Northern Delaware Wetlands 277.5
Revenue Refund 38.0
1.0 Tick Control Program 167.7
Killens Pond Water Park 520.0
Cape Enterprise 275.0
Beach Erosion Control Program 8,000.0
Sand Bypass System 80.0
Tax Ditches* 225.0
Director's Office Personnel 72.4
Director's Office Operations 51.8
Wildlife and Fisheries Personnel 1,092.3
Wildlife and Fisheries Operations 2,442.8
Conservation Access Pass 50.0
Enforcement Personnel 553.9
Enforcement Operations 581.1
Waterway Management Fund 1,300.0
Auburn Valley 20.0
Sediment and Stormwater 554.9
Other Items 1,653.5
49.7 77.9 162.4 TOTAL -- Office of Natural Resources 41,013.3 28,428.7

11.5 50.5 82.0 (-02) Parks and Recreation 23,300.5 12,666.3
28.3 24.4 31.3 (-03) Fish and Wildlife 6,363.6 7,513.1
9.9 3.0 49.1 (-04) Watershed Stewardship 11,349.2 8,249.3
49.7 77.9 162.4 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 41,013.3 28,428.7
*Pursuant to 7 Del. C. § 3921


Year ending June 30, 2026
(40-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(40-04-00) Office of Environmental Protection
98.4 122.0 89.6 Personnel Costs 3,604.6 10,133.1
Travel 53.0
Contractual Services 1,785.9 1,236.1
Energy 118.5
Supplies and Materials 106.4 299.8
Capital Outlay 130.0
Other Items:
Local Emergency Planning Committees 343.0
AST Administration 851.6
HSCA - Clean-up 20,121.1
HSCA - Brownfields 5,051.7
HSCA - Administration 2,595.7
SARA 30.0 14.3
UST Administration 390.6
UST Recovered Costs 100.0
Stage II Vapor Recovery 75.0
Extremely Hazardous Substance Program 253.1
Environmental Response 525.8
Non-Title V 804.2
Enhanced I and M Program 241.2
Public Outreach 20.0
Tire Administration 196.7
Tire Clean-up 1,500.0
Whole Basin Management/TMDL 643.8
Board of Certification 14.0
Environmental Labs Personnel 1,100.0
Environmental Labs Expenditures 467.0
Surface Water Personnel 362.2
Surface Water Expenditures 1,509.9
Groundwater Personnel 59.1
Groundwater Expenditures 2,601.0
Water Supply Personnel 220.9
Water Supply Expenditures 201.0
Wetlands Personnel 497.2
Wetlands Expenditures 152.2
Hazardous Waste Transporter Fees 91.6
Waste End Personnel 30.4
Waste End Assessment 184.7
Hazardous Waste Personnel 170.3
Hazardous Waste Fees 66.9
Solid Waste Transporter Personnel 92.9
Solid Waste Transporter Fees 21.2
Solid Waste Personnel 427.4
Solid Waste Fees 188.2
Polly Drummond Yard Waste Site 490.0
SRF Future Administration 450.0


Year ending June 30, 2026
(40-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
RGGI LIHEAP 780.0
RGGI CO2 Emissions 10,140.0
RGGI Administration 10% 1,579.9
RGGI Reduction Project 1,560.0
RGGI Weatherization 1,560.0
Other Items 1,174.8
98.4 122.0 89.6 TOTAL -- Office of Environmental Protection 64,482.4 12,935.6

19.0 32.0 11.0 (-02) Air Quality 5,093.8 2,074.5
19.8 39.9 44.3 (-03) Water 7,868.9 5,954.6
32.8 41.9 19.3 (-04) Waste and Hazardous Substances 34,881.9 3,176.1
26.8 8.2 15.0 (-05) Climate, Coastal, and Energy 16,637.8 1,730.4
98.4 122.0 89.6 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 64,482.4 12,935.6


175.4 240.3 367.3 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF 115,243.8 54,205.6
NATURAL RESOURCES AND
ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL


Year ending June 30, 2026
(45-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(45-01-00) Office of the Secretary
43.0 10.5 121.7 Personnel Costs 3,239.3 13,977.2
Travel 39.0 22.7
Contractual Services 355.3 3,782.8
Energy 18.7 477.4
Supplies and Materials 42.0 826.7
Capital Outlay 5.0 52.6
Other Items:
Police Training Council 11.8
0.8 Local Emergency Planning Councils 62.4
2.0 School Safety Plans 346.7
ITC Funds 15.0
Brain Injury Trust Fund 50.0
Body Camera Program 500.3
Fund to Combat Violent Crimes - State Police 2,125.0
Fund to Combat Violent Crimes - Local Law Enforcement 2,125.0
System Support 888.2
Hazardous Waste Cleanup 100.0
Resale - Communication Parts 336.0
Vehicles 170.4
Other Items 0.7
Retired Canines 36.0
POST/DEPAC 69.1
43.0 10.5 124.5 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 9,444.6 20,230.7

2.0 20.0 (-01) Administration 4,350.0 3,607.9
3.5 23.5 (-20) Communication 1,635.6 4,640.4
30.0 14.0 (-30) Delaware Emergency 1,521.6
Management Agency
8.0 2.0 (-40) Highway Safety 219.4
3.0 1.0 (-50) Developmental Disabilities 127.0
Council
2.0 (-60) State Council for Persons with 367.5
Disabilities
7.0 (-70) Division of Gaming Enforcement 3,459.0
62.0 (-80) Division of Forensic Science 9,746.9
43.0 10.5 124.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 9,444.6 20,230.7


Year ending June 30, 2026
(45-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(45-02-00) Capitol Police
1.0 114.0 Personnel Costs 135.4 13,027.8
Travel 5.5
Contractual Services 514.1
Supplies and Materials 138.6
Other Item:
Special Duty 271.9
1.0 114.0 TOTAL -- Capitol Police 407.3 13,686.0

1.0 114.0 (-10) Capitol Police 407.3 13,686.0
1.0 114.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 407.3 13,686.0

(45-04-00) Division of Alcohol
and Tobacco Enforcement
1.5 2.0 11.5 Personnel Costs 43.1 1,832.8
Travel 2.8 0.5
Contractual Services 36.6 304.5
Supplies and Materials 10.0 25.2
Capital Outlay 1.0 1.1
Tobacco Fund:
4.0 Personnel Costs 482.3
Contractual Services 101.1
Supplies and Materials 24.1
Other Items 110.0
13.0 Marijuana Control Act 2,458.8
1.5 19.0 11.5 TOTAL -- Division of Alcohol 3,269.8 2,164.1
and Tobacco Enforcement

1.5 19.0 11.5 (-10) Division of Alcohol 3,269.8 2,164.1
and Tobacco Enforcement
1.5 19.0 11.5 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 3,269.8 2,164.1

(45-05-00) Office of the Marijuana
Commissioner
3.0 Personnel Costs 414.0
Contractual Services 6.3
4.0 Marijuana Control Act 877.1
2.0 Medical Marijuana 480.1
6.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Marijuana 1,357.2 420.3
Commissioner

6.0 3.0 (-10) Office of the Marijuana 1,357.2 420.3
Commissioner
6.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 1,357.2 420.3


Year ending June 30, 2026
(45-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(45-06-00) State Police
51.8 70.0 880.2 Personnel Costs 6,428.4 168,416.7
Travel 136.8
Contractual Services 1,570.4 8,673.0
Energy 145.7
Supplies and Materials 1,391.1 7,497.0
Capital Outlay 1,046.0 146.0
Other Items:
Vehicles 79.8 3,609.6
Real Time Crime Reporting 48.1
Other Items 112.5
Crime Reduction Fund 110.0
Special Duty Fund 7,069.2
20.0 Fund to Combat Violent Crimes - State Police
15.0 Body Camera Program 2,500.7
15.0 Expungement Acts 1,278.1
19.0 Firearm Transaction Approval Program 2,485.2
5.0 Lethal Firearms Safety Program 586.4
10.0 Permit to Purchase 4,101.9
51.8 90.0 944.2 TOTAL -- State Police 17,882.3 199,550.3

60.0 (-01) Executive 226.7 11,076.3
5.0 (-02) Building Maintenance and 710.4
Construction
32.0 384.0 (-03) Patrol 4,183.6 81,735.2
35.5 12.0 155.5 (-04) Criminal Investigation 6,426.3 37,961.3
10.0 63.0 (-05) Special Investigation 588.7 15,942.2
28.0 (-06) Aviation 8,659.7
13.3 16.0 2.7 (-07) Traffic 3,165.4 1,908.1
17.0 117.0 (-08) State Bureau of Identification 1,455.2 14,376.1
11.0 (-09) Training 340.7 3,564.4
1.0 3.0 95.0 (-10) Communications 212.1 11,104.1
13.0 (-11) Transportation 1,283.6 10,130.6
2.0 10.0 (-12) Community Relations 2,381.9
51.8 90.0 944.2 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 17,882.3 199,550.3


96.3 126.5 1,197.2 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF 32,361.2 236,051.4
SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY


Year ending June 30, 2026
(55-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Personnel $ Line Item
NSF TFO TFC GF TFO
(55-01-00) Office of the Secretary
(55-01-01) Office of the Secretary
36.0 Personnel Costs 3,319.1
Travel 24.1
Contractual Services 153.8
Supplies and Materials 6.5
Salary Contingency 366.8
36.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 3,870.3

(55-01-02) Finance
57.0 Personnel Costs 14,319.4
Travel 7.1
Contractual Services 6,259.2
Energy 1,021.9
Supplies and Materials 383.2
57.0 TOTAL -- Finance 21,990.8

(55-01-03) Community Relations
7.0 Personnel Costs 907.9
Travel 10.0
Contractual Services 124.8
Supplies and Materials 27.0
7.0 TOTAL -- Community Relations 1,069.7

(55-01-04) Human Resources
Travel 6.2
Contractual Services 283.5
Supplies and Materials 47.7
TOTAL -- Human Resources 337.4

100.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 27,268.2

(55-02-01) Technology and Innovation
18.0 Personnel Costs 1,575.5
Travel 24.1
Contractual Services 15,085.2
Supplies and Materials 1,137.4
18.0 TOTAL -- Technology and Innovation 17,822.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(55-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Personnel $ Line Item
NSF TFO TFC GF TFO
(55-03-01) Planning
50.0 10.0 Personnel Costs 4,967.5
Travel 25.4
Contractual Services 1,847.3
Energy 7.0
Supplies and Materials 128.3
Capital Outlay 10.0
50.0 10.0 TOTAL -- Planning 6,985.5

(55-04-00) Maintenance and Operations
(55-04-70) Maintenance Districts
687.0 30.0 Personnel Costs 50,645.9
Travel 16.9
Contractual Services 12,099.9
Energy 2,486.1
Supplies and Materials 9,272.4
Capital Outlay 210.0
Snow/Storm Contingency 10,000.0
687.0 30.0 TOTAL -- Maintenance Districts 84,731.2

687.0 30.0 TOTAL -- Maintenance and Operations 84,731.2

(55-06-01) Delaware Transportation Authority
Delaware Transit Corporation
Transit Operations 118,564.7
Taxi Services Support "E & D" 148.5
Kent and Sussex Transportation "E & D" 1,494.3
TOTAL -- Delaware Transit Corporation 120,207.5

DTA Indebtedness
Debt Service:
Transportation Trust Fund 95,138.3
TOTAL -- DTA Indebtedness 95,138.3

TOTAL -- Delaware Transportation Authority* 215,345.8
*Delaware Transportation Authority, 2 Del. C. c. 13.
These funds, except the Regulatory Revolving Funds, are not deposited with the State Treasurer.

(55-07-01) US 301 Maintenance Operations
9.0 Personnel Costs 732.9
Contractual Services 3,397.2
Energy 98.5
Supplies and Materials 222.0
Debt Service 18,833.9
9.0 TOTAL -- US 301 Maintenance Operations 23,284.5


Year ending June 30, 2026
(55-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Personnel $ Line Item
NSF TFO TFC GF TFO
(55-08-00) Transportation Solutions
(55-08-30) Project Teams
64.0 253.0 Personnel Costs 6,913.0
Travel 6.0
Contractual Services 800.9
Energy 34.9
Supplies and Materials 207.2
Capital Outlay 171.4
64.0 253.0 TOTAL -- Project Teams 8,133.4

(55-08-40) Traffic
141.0 3.0 Personnel Costs 12,087.8
Contractual Services 4,606.6
Energy 586.8
Supplies and Materials 553.1
Capital Outlay 47.7
141.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Traffic 17,882.0

205.0 256.0 TOTAL -- Transportation Solutions 26,015.4

(55-11-00) Motor Vehicles
(55-11-10) Administration
411.0 Personnel Costs 29,341.4
Travel 20.0
Contractual Services 5,610.1
Supplies and Materials 703.3
Capital Outlay 53.1
Motorcycle Safety 154.0
411.0 TOTAL -- Administration 35,881.9

(55-11-60) Toll Administration
106.0 Personnel Costs 8,379.9
Travel 3.0
Contractual Services 3,062.3
Energy 273.3
Supplies and Materials 306.3
Capital Outlay 41.0
Contractual - E-ZPass Operations 5,000.0 15,281.2
106.0 TOTAL -- Toll Administration 5,000.0 27,347.0

517.0 TOTAL -- Motor Vehicles 5,000.0 63,228.9


1,586.0 296.0 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 5,000.0 464,681.7


Year ending June 30, 2026
(60-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(60-01-00) Administration
17.6 50.8 4.6 Personnel Costs 5,857.4 484.4
Travel 20.0
Contractual Services 1,544.6 374.5
Energy 11.4
Supplies and Materials 91.0 6.0
Capital Outlay 40.0
17.6 50.8 4.6 TOTAL -- Administration 7,553.0 876.3

1.0 6.6 0.4 (-10) Office of the Secretary 1,605.9 349.5
8.0 1.0 (-20) Office of Occupational and 106.9
Labor Market Information
8.6 17.2 3.2 (-40) Administrative Support 2,144.1 419.9
27.0 (-50) Paid Family Medical Leave 3,803.0
17.6 50.8 4.6 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 7,553.0 876.3

(60-06-00) Unemployment Insurance
120.0 3.0 Personnel Costs 188.3
Travel 0.1
Contractual Services 210.9
Energy 1.0
Supplies and Materials 2.5
Capital Outlay 2.2
Other Item:
Revenue Refund 71.9
120.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Unemployment Insurance 476.9

120.0 3.0 (-01) Unemployment Insurance 476.9
120.0 3.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 476.9

(60-07-00) Industrial Affairs
12.6 60.8 18.6 Personnel Costs 7,047.2 1,652.5
Travel 60.3
Contractual Services 6,801.9 169.6
Supplies and Materials 53.6
Capital Outlay 43.6
Wage Theft 17.0
12.6 60.8 18.6 TOTAL -- Industrial Affairs 14,023.6 1,822.1

1.1 38.9 (-01) Office of Workers' Compensation 6,349.8
2.0 20.4 9.6 (-02) Office of Labor Law Enforcement 7,336.1 960.7
6.5 1.5 (-03) Occupational Safety and Health 337.7
Administration/Bureau of
Labor Statistics
3.0 9.0 (-04) Anti-Discrimination 861.4
12.6 60.8 18.6 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 14,023.6 1,822.1


Year ending June 30, 2026
(60-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(60-08-00) Vocational Rehabilitation
128.5 1.5 2.0 Personnel Costs 449.4 172.2
Travel 0.5
Contractual Services 566.0 3,634.4
Supplies and Materials 32.0 76.9
Other Item:
Supported Employment 560.7
128.5 1.5 2.0 TOTAL -- Vocational Rehabilitation 1,047.4 4,444.7

74.5 1.5 2.0 (-10) Vocational Rehabilitation Services 1,047.4 4,444.7
54.0 (-20) Disability Determination Services
128.5 1.5 2.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 1,047.4 4,444.7

(60-09-00) Employment and Training
67.0 4.0 25.0 Personnel Costs 310.2 2,224.8
Travel 5.0 3.0
Contractual Services 187.6 936.9
Energy 7.3
Supplies and Materials 20.0 21.4
Other Items:
Summer Youth Program 625.0
Welfare Reform 863.1
Blue Collar Skills 3,930.0
Workforce Development 630.0
Learning for Careers Program 500.0
Elevate Delaware 500.0
Advancement Through Pardons and Expungements 175.0
67.0 4.0 25.0 TOTAL -- Employment and Training 4,452.8 6,486.5

67.0 4.0 25.0 (-20) Employment and Training Services 4,452.8 6,486.5
67.0 4.0 25.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 4,452.8 6,486.5


345.7 120.1 50.2 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 27,553.7 13,629.6


Year ending June 30, 2026
(65-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(65-01-00) Agriculture
19.7 46.7 82.6 Personnel Costs 4,675.6 7,971.3
Travel 131.5 26.8
Contractual Services 1,391.6 726.8
Energy 33.1 22.7
Supplies and Materials 275.8 131.1
Capital Outlay 348.3 20.5
Other Items:
2.0 Marijuana Control Act 126.6
Nutrient Management Program 823.3
Agriculture Development Program 139.6
Plant Pest Survey and Control 10.0
Cover Crops 19.6
Poultry Health Surveillance 497.2
Carvel Center/Irrigation 260.0
Educational Assistance 15.0
Revenue Refund 7.7
Fingerprints 110.0
Fingerprinting 75.5
Equine Drug Testing 1,015.0
Research and Development 75.0
Purses and Promotions 35.0
Pet Food Registration Software 5.0
Ag Production Assistance Program 2,000.0
Dairy Risk Management 87.9
19.7 48.7 82.6 TOTAL -- Agriculture 8,320.7 12,736.8

1.5 16.5 (-01) Administration 327.5 4,976.3
7.0 (-02) Agriculture Compliance 45.0 775.1
7.7 13.7 4.6 (-03) Food Products Inspection 1,174.1 539.2
5.0 2.5 17.5 (-04) Forest Service 801.7 1,662.5
1.0 11.0 (-05) Harness Racing Commission 2,434.8
2.0 7.0 (-06) Pesticides 893.0
0.5 1.0 3.5 (-07) Planning 380.6
2.0 10.0 (-08) Plant Industries 162.3 995.0
1.0 9.0 (-09) Animal Health 995.8
10.0 (-10) Thoroughbred Racing Commission 1,877.5
1.0 8.0 (-11) Weights and Measures 63.3 896.3
0.5 5.5 (-12) Nutrient Management 1,452.6
1.0 1.0 (-13) Agricultural Lands Preservation 541.5 63.4
Foundation
19.7 48.7 82.6 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 8,320.7 12,736.8


19.7 48.7 82.6 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 8,320.7 12,736.8


Year ending June 30, 2026
(70-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF ELECTIONS

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(70-01-01) State Election Commissioner
45.0 Personnel Costs 4,343.0
Travel 8.3
Contractual Services 2,835.0
Energy 125.4
Supplies and Materials 33.3
Other Items:
Technology Development 20.0
Voting Machines 1,642.0
Voter Purging 15.0
School Elections 267.4
45.0 TOTAL -- State Election Commissioner 9,289.4


45.0 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF ELECTIONS 9,289.4


Year ending June 30, 2026
(75-00-00) FIRE PREVENTION COMMISSION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(75-01-01) Office of the State Fire Marshal
25.5 26.5 Personnel Costs 2,180.2 3,240.6
Travel 34.0
Contractual Services 366.8 482.3
Energy 62.6
Supplies and Materials 81.0 23.4
Capital Outlay 196.2
Other Item:
Revenue Refund 1.5
25.5 26.5 TOTAL -- Office of the State Fire Marshal 2,859.7 3,808.9

(75-02-01) State Fire School
22.0 Personnel Costs 2,921.3
Contractual Services 426.0
Energy 118.2
Supplies and Materials 160.0
Capital Outlay 35.5
Other Items:
Stress Management 4.6
EMT Training 156.4
Local Emergency Planning Commission 50.0
Educational Assistance 120.0
22.0 TOTAL -- State Fire School 50.0 3,942.0

(75-03-01) State Fire Prevention Commission
12.0 Personnel Costs 1,016.9
Travel 13.0
Contractual Services 240.5
Supplies and Materials 16.1
Other Items:
Statewide Fire Safety Education 75.0
Delaware State Fire Chiefs Association 52.0
12.0 TOTAL -- State Fire Prevention Commission 1,413.5


25.5 60.5 TOTAL -- FIRE PREVENTION COMMISSION 2,909.7 9,164.4


Year ending June 30, 2026
(76-00-00) DELAWARE NATIONAL GUARD

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(76-01-01) Delaware National Guard
97.5 31.5 Personnel Costs 4,077.8
Travel 18.0
Contractual Services 778.0
Energy 736.6
Supplies and Materials 140.0
Other Items:
Unit Fund Allowance 27.1
Educational Assistance 457.4
Joint Enlistment Enhancement Program 85.0
97.5 31.5 TOTAL -- Delaware National Guard 6,319.9


97.5 31.5 TOTAL -- DELAWARE NATIONAL GUARD 6,319.9


Year ending June 30, 2026
(77-00-00) ADVISORY COUNCIL FOR EXCEPTIONAL CITIZENS

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(77-01-01) Advisory Council for Exceptional Citizens
3.0 Personnel Costs 341.8
Travel 3.1
Contractual Services 51.7
Supplies and Materials 5.0
3.0 TOTAL -- Advisory Council for Exceptional Citizens 401.6


3.0 TOTAL -- ADVISORY COUNCIL FOR 401.6
EXCEPTIONAL CITIZENS


Year ending June 30, 2026
(90-00-00) HIGHER EDUCATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(90-01-00) University of Delaware
(90-01-01) University of Delaware
Operations 108,627.2
Scholarships 19,042.8
SEED Scholarship 4,600.0
Nursing Expansion 247.3
College of Business and Economics 1,841.6
College of Agriculture and Natural Resources 6,385.0
College of Arts and Sciences 1,341.4
College of Earth, Ocean and Environment 878.1
College of Health Sciences 598.5
College of Engineering 2,709.0
College of Education and Human Development 2,914.8
Biden School of Public Policy 1,274.3
Other Programs 784.5
TOTAL -- University of Delaware 151,244.5

(90-01-02) Delaware Geological Survey
Operations 2,238.7
River Master Program 127.3
Water Resources Agency 185.9
TOTAL -- Delaware Geological Survey 2,551.9

TOTAL -- University of Delaware 153,796.4

(90-03-00) Delaware State University
(90-03-01) Operations
Operations 49,946.6
Nursing Expansion 434.5
Work Study 211.7
Mishoe Scholarships 50.0
Cooperative Extension 1,201.7
Cooperative Research 1,273.1
Cooperative Forestry 88.8
Title VI Compliance 220.0
Academic Incentive 50.0
General Scholarships 786.0
Inspire Scholarships 13,000.0
Athletic Grant 225.4
Aid to Needy Students 2,057.4
Energy 2,195.9
Racial Equity Consortium 350.0
TOTAL -- Operations 72,091.1

(90-03-05) Sponsored Programs and Research

TOTAL -- Delaware State University 72,091.1


Year ending June 30, 2026
(90-00-00) HIGHER EDUCATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(90-04-00) Delaware Technical Community College
(90-04-01) Office of the President
42.0 57.0 Personnel Costs 17,533.4
Contractual Services 100.0
Aid to Needy Students 39.3
Academic Incentive 50.0
Associate in Arts Program - Operations 236.0
Associate in Arts Program - Academic 1,496.9
SEED Scholarship 13,937.6
Career Pathways 1,000.0
Nursing Program 1,250.0
42.0 57.0 TOTAL -- Office of the President 35,643.2

(90-04-02) Owens Campus
76.0 219.0 Personnel Costs 25,818.6
Contractual Services 519.9
Environmental Training Center 125.0
Aid to Needy Students 244.8
Grants 48.2
Work Study 31.2
76.0 219.0 TOTAL -- Owens Campus 26,787.7

(90-04-04) George Campus
71.0 166.0 Personnel Costs 18,552.3
Contractual Services 392.8
Aid to Needy Students 199.8
Grants 32.5
Work Study 40.1
71.0 166.0 TOTAL -- George Campus 19,217.5

(90-04-05) Stanton Campus
76.0 197.0 Personnel Costs 22,618.5
Aid to Needy Students 184.8
Grants 27.5
Work Study 41.1
76.0 197.0 TOTAL -- Stanton Campus 22,871.9

(90-04-06) Terry Campus
95.0 154.0 Personnel Costs 17,193.4
Aid to Needy Students 218.3
Grants 21.0
Work Study 21.7
95.0 154.0 TOTAL -- Terry Campus 17,454.4

360.0 793.0 TOTAL -- Delaware Technical Community College 121,974.7


360.0 793.0 TOTAL -- HIGHER EDUCATION 347,862.2


Year ending June 30, 2026
(95-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(95-01-00) Department of Education
(95-01-01) Office of the Secretary
18.0 Personnel Costs 2,890.9
Travel 13.0
18.0 TOTAL -- Office of the Secretary 2,903.9

(95-01-02) Academic Support
12.1 27.9 Personnel Costs 4,743.7
Operations 27.9
Digital Learning Operations 1,129.7
1.0 Unique Alternatives 191.3
Student Assessment System 5,916.5
4.0 Statewide Autism Support 700.6
12.1 1.0 31.9 TOTAL --Academic Support 191.3 12,518.4

(95-01-03) Student Support
12.3 20.7 Personnel Costs 3,484.4
3.0 1.0 Delaware Interscholastic Athletic Fund 1,254.0 152.0
12.3 3.0 21.7 TOTAL -- Student Support 1,254.0 3,636.4

(95-01-04) Workforce Support
2.8 32.2 Personnel Costs 4,907.7
Contractual Services 500.5
Operations 1,084.6
Educator Certification and Development 483.5
Higher Education Operations 381.2
2.8 32.2 TOTAL -- Workforce Support 7,357.5

(95-01-05) Operations Support
4.0 47.0 Personnel Costs 7,152.5
Contractual Services 2,297.9
Energy 77.7
Supplies and Materials 34.6
Capital Outlay 10.0
Technology Operations 4,490.7
2.0 Delaware Science Coalition 221.5
4.0 2.0 47.0 TOTAL -- Operations Support 221.5 14,063.4

(95-01-06) Early Childhood Support
13.0 29.0 Personnel Costs 3,550.3
OCCL Operations 153.0
13.0 29.0 TOTAL -- Early Childhood Support 3,703.3

(95-01-20) Office of Equity and Innovation
1.0 Personnel Costs 208.3
Operations 120.0
1.0 TOTAL -- Office of Equity and Innovation 328.3


Year ending June 30, 2026
(95-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
(95-01-30) Professional Standards Board
1.0 Personnel Costs 220.9
Professional Standards Board 71.0
1.0 TOTAL -- Professional Standards Board 291.9

(95-01-40) State Board of Education
1.0 Personnel Costs 143.9
State Board of Education 70.0
P-20 Council 4.0
1.0 TOTAL -- State Board of Education 217.9

44.2 6.0 182.8 TOTAL -- Department of Education 1,666.8 45,021.0

(95-02-00) District and Charter Operations
Division I Units (11,353):
16,686.1 Personnel Costs 1,516,116.5
Cafeteria Funds 24,260.6
Division II Units (12,559):
All Other Costs 11,693.8
Energy 29,733.0
Division III:
Equalization 113,583.6
Other Items:
General Contingency 25,168.3
School Improvement Funds 2,500.0
Special School Supports 750.4
Delmar Tuition 186.7
Skills, Knowledge and Responsibility Pay Supplements 7,168.1
Educational Sustainment Fund 28,150.9
Odyssey of the Mind 48.4
Teacher of the Year 61.9
Educational Support Professional of the Year 9.0
Delaware Science Coalition 1,720.5 960.3
Student Organization 491.3
World Language Expansion 1,780.5
College Access 1,400.0
CPR Instruction 40.0
Student Discipline Program 5,335.2
Related Services for Students with Disabilities 4,171.5
Exceptional Student Unit - Vocational 360.0
Unique Alternatives 711.4 14,591.8
Opportunity Funding 66,840.4
Math Coaches 1,957.5
Year Long Residencies 1,000.0
Delaware Literacy Plan 850.0
Child Safety Awareness 286.0


Year ending June 30, 2026
(95-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
Pathways 250.0
Mental Health Services 72,722.2
Redding Consortium/Wilmington Learning Collaborative 20,200.0
Behavioral Health Professional of the Year 9.0
Teacher Recruitment/Retention 4,000.0
Recognition Ceremonies 100.0
Mid Year Unit Count 1,000.0
Delaware Math Plan 200.0
School Safety and Security 1,000.0
Substitute Reimbursement 2,420.8
Early Literacy Coaches 3,000.0
Child Nutrition 247.0
Education Block Grants:
Professional Accountability and Instructional 7,045.1
Advancement Fund
Academic Excellence Block Grant 60,887.4
Technology Block Grant 3,767.5
Student Success Block Grant 4,692.0
Substitute Teacher Block Grant 2,000.0
Athletic Trainer Block Grant 2,000.0
Public School Transportation 186,129.2
16,686.1 TOTAL -- District and Charter Operations 2,431.9 2,231,165.9

16,686.1 (-01) Division Funding 1,695,387.5
(-02) Other Items 2,431.9 269,257.2
(-05) Education Block Grants 80,392.0
(-06) Public School Transportation 186,129.2
16,686.1 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 2,431.9 2,231,165.9

(95-03-00) Pass Through and Other Support Programs
Pass Through Programs:
On-Line Periodicals 516.8
Speech Pathology 700.0
Center for Excellence and Equity in Teacher Preparation 150.0
Summer School - Gifted and Talented 126.0
Center for Economic Education 203.3
Special Needs Programs:
Early Childhood Assistance 15,774.3
12.0 Children Services Cost Recovery Project 1,668.8
47.5 Prison Education 6,878.2
Early Childhood Initiatives 36,416.6
2.0 Interagency Resource Management Committee 267.9
Parents as Teachers 1,065.5
Reading Interventions 500.0
Driver Training:
0.2 9.8 Driver's Education 42.0 2,936.2
Scholarships:
Scholarships and Grants 2,218.4


Year ending June 30, 2026
(95-00-00) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION

Personnel $ Program $ Line Item
NSF ASF GF ASF GF ASF GF
SEED/Inspire Marketing 50.0
Loan Forgiveness - Educators 700.0
Mental Health and Speech Language Programs 300.0
Veterinary Tuition Assistance 497.6
Adult Education and Work Force Training:
Adult Education and Work Force Training 9,028.8
Craft Training 60.0
12.2 59.3 TOTAL -- Pass Through and Other Support Programs 1,770.8 78,329.6

(-15) Pass Through Programs 1,696.1
12.0 49.5 (-20) Special Needs Programs 1,668.8 60,902.5
0.2 9.8 (-30) Driver Training 42.0 2,936.2
(-40) Scholarships 3,766.0
(-50) Adult Education and Work Force 60.0 9,028.8
Training
12.2 59.3 TOTAL -- Internal Program Units 1,770.8 78,329.6

(95-06-00) Delaware Advisory Council on
Career and Technical Education
3.0 Personnel Costs 419.3
Travel 6.2
Contractual Services 59.8
Supplies and Materials 3.0
3.0 TOTAL -- Delaware Advisory Council on 488.3
Career and Technical Education

3.0 (-01) Advisory Council 488.3
3.0 TOTAL -- Internal Program Unit 488.3


44.2 18.2 16,931.2 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 5,869.5 2,355,004.8


Year ending June 30, 2026
Personnel $
TFO TFC NSF ASF GF TFO ASF GF

TOTALS

1,586.0 296.0 1,879.4 1,888.5 11,732.5 TOTAL -- DEPARTMENTS 464,681.7 959,331.1 3,849,646.6

360.0 793.0 TOTAL -- HIGHER EDUCATION 347,862.2

44.2 18.2 16,931.2 TOTAL -- PUBLIC EDUCATION 5,869.5 2,355,004.8

1,586.0 296.0 2,283.6 1,906.7 29,456.7 GRAND TOTAL 464,681.7 965,200.6 6,552,513.6


GENERAL
Section 2. Any previous act inconsistent with the provisions of this Act is hereby suspended to the extent
of such inconsistency.
Section 3. If any provision of this Act, or of any rule, regulation or order thereunder, or the application of
such provision to any person or circumstances, shall be invalid, the remainder of this Act and the application of such
provisions of this Act or of such rule, regulation or order to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is
held invalid shall not be affected thereby.
Section 4. The monies appropriated in Section l of this Act shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the
General Fund, except as otherwise referenced in Section l.
Section 5. The provisions of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, any section, chapter or title of the
Delaware Code and any Laws of Delaware providing for the application of "Sunset" shall be operative for those
agencies, commissions or boards effective during the current fiscal year.
Section 6. Due to the budget format, the restructuring of divisions into programs within divisions has
created more exempt positions per division than allowed by law for the participating departments; therefore, all
exempt positions authorized by 29 Del. C. § 5903, prior to July 1, 1987, shall remain exempt for this current fiscal
year, except as otherwise specified in this Act.
Section 7. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6334(c), for the current fiscal year, the
proposed budget plan, as prepared by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, shall be in such a
format that it can readily be analyzed and comprehensive in nature.
(b) This Act has been prepared in conformance with 78 Del. Laws, c. 90. For all sections with the
exception of Section 1, all comparisons to the previous year’s Budget Act are shown noting insertions by
underlining and deletions by strikethrough.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6340(a), Section 1 of this Act summarizes salary and
wage and other employment costs into a single line entitled Personnel Costs.
(d) For the current fiscal year, the payroll recovery rate for the Workers’ Compensation Program shall be
1.40 percent unless a separate memorandum of agreement exists.
(e) Notwithstanding 29 Del. C. c. 60A or any other provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the
contrary, the employer contribution from state agencies and non-state entities to qualified participants of the


Deferred Compensation Program shall be suspended beginning July 1, 2008. It is the intent of the General Assembly
that this program be reinstated when funding becomes available.
(f) Effective January 1, 2025, the other employment cost rate will increase by 0.08 percent Section 1 of
this Act provides funding for family caregiving leave benefits per SS1 for SB1 of the 151st General Assembly at a
rate of 0.08 percent through December 31, 2025. Effective January 1, 2026, the family caregiver leave benefit rate
shall be split equally between employee and employer at a rate of 0.04 percent.
(g) Section 1 of this Act provides funding for a state employee pension rate of 24.10 24.19 percent. The
components of the rate are 13.33 13.28 percent for pension liability, 10.41 percent for retiree health insurance costs
and 0.36 0.50 percent for the Other Post-Employment Benefits fund.
(h) Section 1 of this Act provides funding for a judicial pension rate of 17.03 17.97 percent.
(i) Section 1 of this Act provides funding for a New State Police pension rate of 34.37 33.04 percent.
(j) Section 1 of this Act provides funding for Group Health Insurance costs in the Department of Human
Resources, Division of Statewide Benefits (16-05-01). The appropriation provides for the State’s active and retired
employee health benefits as follows:
FY23 Actual FY24 Projected FY25 Projected
$ in millions Expense Expense Expense
Active Employees $ 785.9 $ 851.2 $ 932.8
Non-Medicare Retirees $ 147.7 $ 141.4 $ 155.0
Medicare Retirees $ 256.1 $ 286.3 $ 310.4
Total $ 1,189.7 $ 1,278.9 $ 1,398.2
FY24 Actual FY25 Projected FY26 Projected
$ in millions Expense Expense Expense
Active Employees $ 855.6 $ 980.6 $ 1,086.1
Non-Medicare Retirees $ 141.1 $ 160.2 $ 177.7
Medicare Retirees $ 282.5 $ 313.0 $ 343.5
Total $ 1,279.2 $ 1,453.8 $ 1,607.3
(k) Section 1 of this Act includes an appropriation for Salary/OEC Contingency in Executive, Office of
Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). Included in said appropriation is funding
to establish a long-term, financially sustainable plan to provide post-retirement increases. It is the intent of the
General Assembly to work jointly with the Governor to phase-in the implementation of this plan with the goal to
fully implement by June 30, 2026.


(l) (k) The abbreviations set forth in this Act for authorized positions or funding mean the following:
GF - General Fund
ASF - Appropriated Special Funds
NSF - Non-appropriated Special Funds
TFO - Trust Fund Operations
TFC - Trust Fund Capital
FTE - Full-time Equivalent
All Merit Rules referenced in this Act refer to the Merit Rules in effect June 30, 2024 2025.
Section 8. MERIT SYSTEM, NON-MERIT SYSTEM, AND MERIT COMPARABLE SALARY
SCHEDULES.
(a) All provisions of subsections (a) (1), (b), (c) and (i) through (l) of this section shall not apply to those
Merit System employees who are covered by a final collective bargaining agreement under 19 Del. C. § 1311A and
19 Del. C. c. 16. The effective dates of agreements pursuant to 19 Del. C. § 1311A and 19 Del. C. c. 16 shall occur
simultaneously with the fiscal year following final agreement between the State of Delaware and ratification of that
agreement by the respective certified bargaining unit, provided funds are appropriated in Section 1 of this Act for
said agreements. All pay changes shall become effective on the first day of a full pay cycle. Section 1 of this Act
makes no appropriation, and no subsequent appropriation shall be made during the fiscal year, for any compensation
items as defined in 19 Del. C. § 1311A, and for positions organized under 19 Del. C. c. 16, reached as a result of
negotiations, mediation or interest arbitration. Should a bargaining agreement not be finalized by December 1 or
May 1 of each fiscal year, employees represented by the bargaining unit negotiating said agreement shall receive
compensation pursuant to the provisions of this section until such time as an agreement takes effect. A final
bargaining agreement shall be defined as an agreement between the State of Delaware and a certified bargaining
unit, which is not retroactive and in which the agreement’s completion is achieved through ratification by the
respective bargaining unit, mediation or binding interest arbitration.
(1) Effective the first day of the first full pay period of the fiscal year, the following pay plans are
established for state Merit System employees:


Annual Salary
STATE OF DELAWARE PAY PLAN*
(Standard Work Schedule of 37.5 Hours per Work Week)
PAY 80% of 100% of 120% of
GRADE Midpoint Midpoint Midpoint
3 29,250** 30,755 36,906
4 29,250** 32,727 39,272
5 29,250** 34,825 41,790
6 29,646 37,058 44,470
7 31,546 39,433 47,320
8 33,569 41,961 50,353
9 35,721 44,651 53,581
10 38,010 47,513 57,016
11 40,446 50,558 60,670
12 43,039 53,799 64,559
13 45,798 57,248 68,698
14 48,734 60,917 73,100
15 51,858 64,822 77,786
16 55,182 68,978 82,774
17 58,719 73,399 88,079
18 62,483 78,104 93,725
19 66,489 83,111 99,733
20 70,750 88,438 106,126
21 75,286 94,107 112,928
22 80,112 100,140 120,168
23 85,246 106,558 127,870
24 90,710 113,388 136,066
25 96,526 120,657 144,788
26 102,710 128,388 154,066
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.
**Fiscal Year 2025 Minimum Pay Policy.


Annual Salary
STATE OF DELAWARE PAY PLAN*
(Standard Work Schedule of 37.5 Hours per Work Week)
PAY 80% of 100% of 120% of
GRADE Midpoint Midpoint Midpoint
3 29,835** 31,370 37,644
4 29,835** 33,382 40,058
5 29,835** 35,522 42,626
6 30,239 37,799 45,359
7 32,178 40,222 48,266
8 34,240 42,800 51,360
9 36,435 45,544 54,653
10 38,770 48,463 58,156
11 41,255 51,569 61,883
12 43,900 54,875 65,850
13 46,714 58,393 70,072
14 49,708 62,135 74,562
15 52,894 66,118 79,342
16 56,286 70,358 84,430
17 59,894 74,867 89,840
18 63,733 79,666 95,599
19 67,818 84,773 101,728
20 72,166 90,207 108,248
21 76,791 95,989 115,187
22 81,714 102,143 122,572
23 86,951 108,689 130,427
24 92,525 115,656 138,787
25 98,456 123,070 147,684
26 104,765 130,956 157,147
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.
**Fiscal Year 2026 Minimum Pay Policy.


STATE OF DELAWARE PAY PLAN*
(Standard Work Schedule of 40 Hours per Work Week)
PAY 80% of 100% of 120% of
GRADE Midpoint Midpoint Midpoint
3 31,200** 32,805 39,366
4 31,200** 34,908 41,890
5 31,200** 37,146 44,575
6 31,622 39,527 47,432
7 33,649 42,061 50,473
8 35,806 44,757 53,708
9 38,101 47,626 57,151
10 40,543 50,679 60,815
11 43,142 53,927 64,712
12 45,907 57,384 68,861
13 48,850 61,062 73,274
14 51,981 64,976 77,971
15 55,313 69,141 82,969
16 58,858 73,573 88,288
17 62,631 78,289 93,947
18 66,646 83,307 99,968
19 70,918 88,647 106,376
20 75,464 94,330 113,196
21 80,301 100,376 120,451
22 85,448 106,810 128,172
23 90,926 113,657 136,388
24 96,754 120,942 145,130
25 102,955 128,694 154,433
26 109,555 136,944 164,333
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.
** Fiscal Year 2025 Minimum Pay Policy.


STATE OF DELAWARE PAY PLAN*
(Standard Work Schedule of 40 Hours per Work Week)
PAY 80% of 100% of 120% of
GRADE Midpoint Midpoint Midpoint
3 31,824** 33,461 40,153
4 31,824** 35,606 42,727
5 31,824** 37,889 45,467
6 32,254 40,318 48,382
7 34,322 42,902 51,482
8 36,522 45,652 54,782
9 38,863 48,579 58,295
10 41,354 51,693 62,032
11 44,005 55,006 66,007
12 46,826 58,532 70,238
13 49,826 62,283 74,740
14 53,021 66,276 79,531
15 56,419 70,524 84,629
16 60,035 75,044 90,053
17 63,884 79,855 95,826
18 67,978 84,973 101,968
19 72,336 90,420 108,504
20 76,974 96,217 115,460
21 81,907 102,384 122,861
22 87,157 108,946 130,735
23 92,744 115,930 139,116
24 98,689 123,361 148,033
25 105,014 131,268 157,522
26 111,746 139,683 167,620
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.
** Fiscal Year 2026 Minimum Pay Policy.


(2) Merit Rule 4.13.3 notwithstanding, the standard work week for employees in the following
classification series as approved by the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, Director
of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General shall be 40 hours:
DEPARTMENT CLASS SERIES
Department of Finance Gaming Inspector Series
Gaming Inspection Supervisor
Department of Correction Community Work Program Coordinator
Correctional Food Services Administrator
Food Service Quality Control Administrator
Director of Probation and Parole
Probation and Parole Officer Series
Probation and Parole Regional Manager
Probation and Parole Officer Supervisor
Probation and Parole Operations Administrator
Fiscal Manager (DOC)
Trainer/Educator Series
Correctional Treatment Administrator-JTVCC
Correctional Treatment Administrator-SCI
Correctional Treatment Administrator-BWCI
Correctional Treatment Administrator-HRYCI
Correctional Officer Series
Correctional Security Superintendent
Correctional Operations Manager
Warden and Deputy Warden
Correctional Facility Maintenance Manager
Capital Program Administrator – Prisons/Facilities
Correctional Construction Manager/Facility Inspector
Prison Industries Director
Intelligence Analyst


Management Analyst III – Bureau of Prisons/Special
Ops
Bureau Chief – Prisons
Assistant Bureau Chief – Prisons
Bureau Chief – Community Corrections
Assistant Bureau Chief – Community Corrections
Department of Natural Resources and Natural Resources Police Officer Series
Environmental Control
Department of Safety and Homeland Alcohol and Tobacco Police Officer Series
Security
Alcohol and Tobacco Police Lieutenant
Deputy Principal Assistant – Drug and Alcohol
Drug Control and Enforcement Agent
Chief Drug Control and Enforcement Agent
Division Director – Drug and Alcohol
Telecommunications Specialist (ERC)
Telecommunications Shift Supervisor
Capitol Police Officer Series
DSHS Security Officer Series
Communications Dispatcher
Assistant Manager State Police Telecommunications
Manager State Police Telecommunications
ERC Supervisors
Telecommunications Central Control Operations
Supervisor
Department of Transportation Toll Collector
Toll Plaza Operations Manager
Toll Corporal
Toll Sergeant
TMC EPS Technician


TMC Planner IV
Department of Agriculture Agricultural Commodity Inspectors - Food Products
Inspection
Food Product Inspection Field Supervisor
Meat Inspector
Meat Inspection Field Supervisor
Meat Compliance Investigation Officer
Food Products Inspection Administrator
Fire Prevention Commission Training Administrator I
Deputy Fire Marshal Series I-V
Fire Marshal
Director, Fire School
(3) During the fiscal year, the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General may designate other appropriate
classes or groups of employees to work and be paid according to a standard work week of 40
hours. Such designation shall be based upon the operational necessity of agencies to require
employees to regularly and consistently work in excess of 37.5 hours per week and upon the
availability of any required funding.
(4) To the extent or where an employee is covered by an existing collective bargaining agreement
pursuant to 19 Del. C. § 1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16, the provisions contained within said agreement
pertaining to compensation shall apply.
(i) Merit employees covered by an existing collective bargaining agreement under 19 Del. C. §
1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16 may not bargain for pay rate increases that exceed the pay ranges
for the respective pay grades.
(ii) Merit employees covered by an existing collective bargaining agreement under 19 Del. C. §
1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16 may not bargain for benefits programs established pursuant to 29
Del. C. c. 52 and 96, items listed in 29 Del. C. § 5938c, position classification, shift
differential, leave accrual, or workers compensation.


(b) SELECTIVE MARKET VARIATIONS.
Recognizing the need for flexibility to respond to critical external market pressures, selective market
variations are permitted to the uniform pay plan structure for job classes that are key to the performance of
state functions.
(1) The appointing authority shall identify job classes or job families to be considered for selective
market variations according to turnover rates, recruitment problems, vacancy rates, feasibility for
the work to be performed on a contractual basis and other criteria established by the Secretary of
the Department of Human Resources.
(2) Upon receipt of the identified classes, the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources shall
survey the appropriate labor market to determine the State's position in this labor market.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management
and Budget and the Controller General shall review the information provided in Sections 8(b) (1)
and (2) and shall recommend approval or disapproval for the classes for selective market
compensation variations.
(4) Upon approval, the minimum, midpoint and maximum salary values shall be raised according to
the results of the labor market surveys for the job class. For the purposes of this section, the
minimum value of the salary scale shall remain at 75 percent of midpoint and the maximum value
shall remain at 125 percent unless the minimum value under the selective market range for a class
is less than the minimum value of the Merit System Pay Plan. The minimum for the class on
selective market shall be no less than the Merit System Pay Plan minimum value.
(5) Employees assigned to job classifications approved under the Selective Market Variation program
shall have their salaries adjusted in accordance with the following:
(i) The salary of employees in positions added to the Selective Market Variation program whose
salary is in effect as of the last day of the last full pay cycle prior to implementation, shall be
adjusted to the minimum salary or given a 5 percent increase whichever is greater or an
advanced starting salary recommended by the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources. The effective date shall be the first day of the first full pay cycle following
approval.


(6) All classes assigned to selective market variation shall have their selective market variation pay
ranges adjusted as recommended by the Department of Human Resources. All classes shall remain
on Selective Market until the selective market ranges meet the Merit System Pay Plan ranges or
until such time as the classes become covered by a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to the
provisions of 19 Del. C. § 1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16.
(7) Effective the first day of the first full pay cycle of the fiscal year, the shift differential rates paid to
registered nurses in accordance with the provisions of Merit Rule 4.15 shall reflect the salary scale
in effect for the current fiscal year or that which is superseded by a collective bargaining
agreement pursuant to the provisions of 19 Del. C. § 1311A.
(c) SALARIES FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025 2026
(1) The amount appropriated by Section 1 of this Act for salaries provides for departments 01 through
77 and Delaware Technical Community College Plan B as follows:
(i) Effective the first day of the first full pay cycle of the fiscal year, the salary of each employee
shall be increased by 2.0 percent.
(ii) The salary of employees which, after the application of the general salary increase in Section
8 (c)(1)(i), is below the minimum salary of the assigned pay grade of the pay plan shall be
raised to the minimum salary.
(iii) Salaries of employees employed in accordance with 29 Del. C. § 5903(17) shall be excluded
from subsection (c)(1)(i) of this Section and may receive a salary increase at the discretion of
the agency.
(iv) Any Merit System employee who is denied the salary increase referred to in Section 8(c)(1)(i)
due to an unsatisfactory performance rating in accordance with Merit Rule 13.3 shall become
eligible for the salary increase upon meeting job requirements as defined by their supervisor,
but the salary increase will not be retroactive.
(2) The provisions of subsection (c) of this Section shall not apply to the employees of the General
Assembly-House or the General Assembly-Senate. Salaries for those employees will be
established by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro-tempore of the
Senate, respectively.


(3) The provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to the Governor, Uniformed State
Police, all full-time and regular part-time non-Merit Telecommunications Specialists, Senior
Telecommunications Central Control Specialists and Telecommunications Central Control Shift
Supervisors employed in the Communications Section of the Division of State Police in the
Department of Safety and Homeland Security, non-uniformed support staff within the Delaware
State Police covered under the Communication Workers of America, employees covered by
collective bargaining agreements under 19 Del. C. § 1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16, employees of the
Department of Technology and Information, employees of the University of Delaware, Delaware
State University, and members and employees of the Delaware National Guard, excluding the
Adjutant General. Funds have been appropriated in Section 1 of this Act for Delaware State
University and for the University of Delaware to provide for a 2.0 percent increase in salaries paid
from the General Fund.
(4) The amount appropriated by Section 1 of this Act for salaries provides for:
(i) Statutory step increases for eligible district educators and staff as provided in 14 Del. C. c. 13.
Statutory step increases for Department of Education employees, as provided in 14 Del. C. c.
13.
(ii) Statutory step increases for Delaware Technical Community College plans A and D as
provided in 14 Del. C. c. 13.
(iii) The Department of Justice and the Office of Defense Services salary matrix amounts will be
adjusted as recommended by the Department of Human Resources, effective the first day of
the first full pay cycle of the fiscal year. Employees who are paid according to the matrix shall
have their salaries increased by a minimum of 2.0 percent pay policy or the eligible step
within the matrix as approved by the Department of Human Resources. Salary matrix
increases within pay grades will continue. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, to
retain the most experienced Deputy Attorneys General and Assistant Public Defenders, a
Deputy Attorney General V shall not be limited to an amount less than the Attorney General’s
salary, and Assistant Public Defender V shall not be limited to an amount less than the Chief
Defender’s salary as specified in Section 10 upon approval of the Secretary of the Department


of Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the
Controller General.
(iv) Salary matrices not contained in Section 8(c)(4) of this act will continue as recommended by
the Department of Human Resources. Employees who are paid according to this matrix shall
have their salaries increased in accordance with the approved matrix, effective the first day of
the first full pay cycle of the fiscal year. Salary matrix increases within paygrades will
continue.
(v) Negotiated, collective bargaining increases for uniformed members of the Delaware State
Police and full-time and regular part-time non-Merit Telecommunications Specialists, Senior
Telecommunications Specialists, Telecommunication Shift Supervisors, Telecommunication
Central Control Specialists, Senior Telecommunications Central Control Specialists and
Telecommunications Central Control Shift Supervisors employed in the Communications
Section of the Division of State Police in the Department of Safety and Homeland Security,
non-uniformed support staff within the Delaware State Police covered under the
Communication Workers of America and employees covered by collective bargaining
agreements under 19 Del. C. c. 13 § 1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16.
(vi) A lump sum amount for the Department of Technology and Information.
(vii) Delaware National Guard employees are to be paid consistent with the federal salary plan.
(viii) A lump sum amount for the University of Delaware and Delaware State University. The
resultant lump sum amount may be distributed at the discretion of each institution.
(d) MAINTENANCE REVIEWS.
(1) Any such reclassifications/regrades that the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources
determines to be warranted as a result of the classification maintenance reviews regularly
scheduled by the Department of Human Resources shall be designated to become effective the
first day of the first full pay cycle following approval, provided that such reclassifications/regrades
have been processed as part of the regular budgetary process and the funds for such
reclassifications/regrades have been appropriated. Maintenance review classification
determinations may be appealed to the Merit Employee Relations Board in accordance with 29
Del. C. § 5915. Pay grade determinations shall not be appealed.


(2) Any such title changes that the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources determines to be
warranted as a result of a consolidation review shall be implemented as they are completed with
the concurrence of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General. A consolidation review is for the specific purpose of combining current class titles and
class specifications that are in the same occupational area and require sufficiently similar
knowledge, skills, abilities and minimum qualifications. A consolidation review will not impact
the current levels of work and corresponding pay grades in a class series. It will only affect the
current title assigned to positions; the corresponding class specification, levels of work and
minimum qualifications will be written general in nature rather than agency or program specific.
(e) CRITICAL RECLASSIFICATIONS.
The classification of any position whose salary is covered by the appropriations in Section 1 of this Act
may be changed to be effective the first day of the first full pay cycle following the approval date if the requested
change is certified critical by the appointing authority and is approved by the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General prior to the effective
date. Critical reclassification determinations, pay grade determinations and grievances alleging working out of class
which arose out of a denial of a critical reclass shall not be appealed to the Merit Employee Relations Board.
(f) OTHER RECLASSIFICATIONS.
Other than those reclassifications/regrades approved in accordance with Section 8(d) or 8(e), no position
shall be reclassified or regraded during the fiscal year.
(g) STATE AGENCY TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS.
Teachers and administrators employed by state agencies and who are paid based on the Basic Schedule
contained in 14 Del. C. § 1305, as amended by this Act, shall receive as a salary an amount equal to the index value
specified in the appropriate training and experience cell multiplied by the base salary amount defined in 14 Del. C. §
1305(b), divided by 0.7 for 10 months employment. If employed on an 11 or 12 month basis, the 10 month amount
shall be multiplied by 1.1 or 1.2, respectively. In addition to the above calculation, teachers and administrators
qualifying for professional development clusters in accordance with 14 Del. C. § 1305(l) shall receive an additional
amount equal to the approved cluster percentage multiplied by the base salary amount defined in 14 Del. C. §
1305(b). This calculation shall not be increased for 11 or 12 month employment. The percentage shall only be
applied to the base 10 month salary for 10, 11 and 12 month employees. In accordance with 14 Del. C. § 1305(p),


the cluster percentage is capped at 15 percent. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to those Merit
System employees who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement which has met all provisions of 19 Del. C.
§ 1311A.
(h) ADMINISTRATIVE REGULATIONS.
(1) The administrative regulations and procedures necessary to implement this section shall be
promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Director of the Office
of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(2) Consistent with Chapter 13.0 of the Merit Rules, all state agencies shall implement the
performance review prescribed by the Department of Human Resources after applicable training
by the Department of Human Resources. A performance review shall be completed for employees
each calendar year.
(3) Employees who retain salary upon voluntary demotion in accordance with Merit Rule 4.7 shall be
ineligible for a promotional increase upon promotion to a pay grade lower than or equal to their
original pay grade prior to voluntary demotion for a one-year period from the date of their
voluntary demotion.
(i) HOLIDAY PAY - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TOLL COLLECTION AND
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT CENTER EMPLOYEES.
Merit Rule 4.14 notwithstanding, all Department of Transportation employees directly engaged in toll
collection operations, or directly engaged in the Transportation Management Center’s 24-hour operation, shall be
entitled to receive compensation at their normal rate of pay for holidays in lieu of compensatory time, and they shall
also be entitled to receive compensation in accordance with the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA). To the extent or
where an employee is covered by a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to 19 Del. C. § 1311A, the terms and
conditions in said agreement shall supersede this subsection.
(j) OVERTIME.
(1) Merit Rule Chapter 4.0 notwithstanding, overtime at the rate of time and one-half will commence
after the employee has accrued 40 compensable hours that week, except for transportation
employees compensated pursuant to 29 Del. C. § 5916(g). This Act makes no appropriation, nor
shall any subsequent appropriation or payment be made during the fiscal year, for overtime


compensation based on hours worked during prior fiscal years that did not comply with Section
8(j) of the Fiscal Year 2010 Appropriations Act.
(2) FLSA exempt employees must receive approval by the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget to be paid for overtime
services.
(3) To the extent or where an employee is covered by a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to
19 Del. C. § 1311A or 19 Del. C. c. 16, the terms and conditions in said agreement shall supersede
this subsection.
(i) Department of Transportation personnel responding to emergencies and who are not subject
to the Fair Labor Standards Act shall be entitled to receive compensation at one-and-one-half
times their normal rate of pay for all overtime services performed beyond 40 hours per week.
This shall apply to employees classified through the Area Supervisor II level, the District
Maintenance Superintendent classification, and specific safety and critical Engineering,
Survey and Planning Technician positions as designated by the Secretary of Transportation.
All other personnel assigned to assist the area yards during emergencies and who are above
the level of Area Supervisor II shall be entitled to receive compensation at their straight time
rate of pay for all overtime services performed beyond the normal work week. The
Department of Transportation, Office of the Secretary (55-01-01) shall maintain an overtime
expenditure report and shall provide such report quarterly to the Secretary of the Department
of Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General. The report shall include the number of overtime hours worked and the
amount of overtime salary expended within the department on the emergency events.
(ii) Office of Management and Budget, Facilities Management and Department of Health and
Social Services, Management Services personnel who respond to weather-related emergencies
and who are not covered under the Fair Labor Standards Act shall be entitled to receive
compensation at their straight time rate of pay for all overtime services beyond the standard
work week. The method of compensation is subject to the availability of funds and/or the
operational needs of the respective department.


(iii) Delaware Emergency Management Agency personnel responding to emergencies or working
at the State Emergency Operations Center, personnel working for the State Health Operations
Center (SHOC), and state employees activated by SHOC, during activation for weather,
technological, health or terrorist-related incidents, who are not covered by the Fair Labor
Standards Act, shall be entitled to receive compensation at their normal rate of pay for all
overtime services beyond the standard work week.
(iv) Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control personnel who are activated for
weather and/or public health related incidents and who are not covered by the Fair Labor
Standards Act, shall be entitled to receive compensation at their normal rate of pay for all
overtime services beyond the standard work week. The method of compensation is subject to
the availability of funds and/or the operational needs of the department.
(k) CALL BACK PAY - HIGHWAY EMERGENCY RESPONSE TEAM.
Merit Rule 4.16 notwithstanding, employees designated as Highway Emergency Response Team members
shall be eligible for call back pay regardless of their classification. To the extent or where an employee is covered by
a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to 19 Del. C. § 1311A, the terms and conditions in said agreement shall
supersede this subsection.
(l) STANDBY PAY - HIGHWAY EMERGENCY RESPONSE TEAM.
Merit Rule 4.17 notwithstanding, employees designated as Highway Emergency Response Team members
shall be eligible for standby pay regardless of their classification. To the extent or where an employee is covered by
a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to 19 Del. C. § 1311A, the terms and conditions in said agreement shall
supersede this subsection.
(m) SALARY PLAN - PUBLIC EDUCATION.
Salary schedules and staffing formulas contained in 14 Del. C. c. 13 shall be revised as specified in this
subsection.
(1) Each school district shall continue to use salary schedules not less than those in 14 Del. C. § 1322,
for all school lunch employees.
(2) Effective July 1, 2006, the State shall pay 73 percent of the annual salary rate for school lunch
employees as set forth in the salary schedules in 14 Del. C. § 1322(a) and (b), and 62 percent of
salary rate for school lunch employees as set forth in the salary schedule 14 Del. C. § 1322(c).


The remaining percentage of the hourly salary rate for school lunch employees shall be paid from
local funds. The State shall pay other employment costs for school lunch employees at the ratio of
state supported salaries to total salaries, provided for by this section, for school lunch employees.
(3) No provision in this Act shall be construed as affecting the eligibility of school lunch employees
as an employee under 29 Del. C. § 5501.
(4) Section 1 of this Act provides an amount for salaries and other employment costs for Formula
Employees in Public Education. Additional amounts are included in Pass Through and Other
Support Programs (95-03-00) and District and Charter Operations (95-02-00). Local school
districts must charge payroll for local share salary supplements and other employment costs and
fringe benefits simultaneously with state-share charges. The amount of salary and other
employment costs that can be charged to state appropriations for any one-day period or for any
one individual cannot exceed the amount the individual is entitled to receive based on the state
salary schedules provided by this Act and 14 Del. C. c. 13, divided by the number of pays the
individual has chosen to schedule per year. The provisions of this section do not apply to Division
III - Equalization (appropriation 05186), which may be charged for local contractual obligations
before local current operating funds are used.
(5) All pay changes, in future agreements reached between a public school district and any exclusive
representative organization, shall become effective on the first day of a full pay cycle.
(6) All salary schedules and staffing formulas contained in 14 Del. C. c. 13 shall remain the same as
Fiscal Year 2024 2025 until the revisions are effective on the first day of the first full pay cycle of
the fiscal year. Salary schedules and staffing formulas contained in 14 Del. C. c. 13, shall be
revised as specified in this subsection and be effective as of the first day of the first full pay cycle
of the fiscal year.
(i) Amend 14 Del C. § 1305(b) by making deletions as shown by strikethrough and insertions as
shown by underline as follows:
(b) The base salary amount for this section, from the first day of the first full pay cycle of the
fiscal year, through the last day of the pay cycle that contains the last day of the fiscal
year, shall be $34,266 $36,760. The Bachelor's Degree, 0-year experience point on the
index is defined as the base and has an index value of 1.000. This amount is intended to


be the equivalent of 70 percent of a recommended average total competitive starting
salary. All other salary amounts shall be determined by multiplying the base salary
amount by the index value that corresponds with the appropriate training and experience
cell, and then rounding to the nearest whole dollar.
(ii) Salary schedules contained in 14 Del. C. § 1305(a) shall remain as follows:
Step No Bach. Bach. Bach. Mast. Mast. Mast. Mast. Doctor’s Yrs
Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Of
Plus 15 Plus 30 Plus 15 Plus 30 Plus 45 Exp.
Grad Grad Grad Grad Grad
Credits Credits Credits Credits Credits
1 0.96171 1.00000 1.03829 1.07662 1.13408 1.17241 1.21071 1.24911 1.28744 0
2 0.97122 1.00962 1.04795 1.08624 1.14370 1.18203 1.22032 1.25865 1.29695 1
3 0.97985 1.01916 1.05746 1.09579 1.15325 1.19154 1.22987 1.26827 1.30657 2
4 1.01436 1.05265 1.09098 1.12938 1.18684 1.22513 1.26346 1.30176 1.34009 3
5 1.04314 1.07857 1.11308 1.14851 1.20021 1.23468 1.27778 1.31611 1.35441 4
6 1.07857 1.11308 1.14851 1.18302 1.23468 1.27015 1.30462 1.34009 1.37456 5
7 1.11308 1.14851 1.18302 1.21750 1.27015 1.30462 1.34009 1.37456 1.40904 6
8 1.14851 1.18302 1.21750 1.25296 1.30462 1.34009 1.37456 1.40904 1.44450 7
9 1.18302 1.21750 1.25296 1.28744 1.39185 1.42633 1.46169 1.49627 1.53163 8
10 1.21750 1.25296 1.28744 1.32191 1.42633 1.46169 1.49627 1.53163 1.56610 9
11 1.25296 1.28949 1.32191 1.35738 1.46169 1.49627 1.53163 1.56610 1.60069 10
12 1.35738 1.39185 1.49627 1.53163 1.56610 1.60069 1.63605 11
13 1.39380 1.42633 1.53163 1.56610 1.60069 1.63605 1.67052 12
14 1.46169 1.56610 1.60069 1.63605 1.67052 1.70500 13
15 1.49793 1.60069 1.63605 1.67052 1.70500 1.74046 14
16 1.63605 1.67222 1.70500 1.74046 1.77494 15
17 1.74018 1.77671 1.81012 16


(iii) Amend 14 Del. C. § 1308 by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as shown by
strikethrough as follows:
(a) Each administrative assistant I, II, and III who works and is paid for 12 months per year shall be
paid in accordance with the following schedule:
Step Administrative Administrative Administrative Years of
Assistant I* Assistant II* Assistant III* Experience
1 23,436 24,882 25,735 0
2 24,062 25,465 26,326 1
3 24,640 26,046 26,916 2
4 25,216 26,628 27,505 3
5 25,793 27,212 28,164 4
6 26,370 27,821 28,829 5
7 26,946 28,479 29,499 6
8 27,521 29,136 30,162 7
9 28,168 29,793 30,830 8
10 28,819 30,449 31,495 9
11 29,469 31,110 32,161 10
12 30,120 31,767 32,826 11
13 30,770 32,422 33,494 12
14 31,422 33,081 34,158 13
15 32,074 33,740 34,823 14
16 32,726 34,394 35,493 15
17 33,374 35,050 36,158 16
18 34,026 35,710 36,823 17
19 34,676 36,364 37,490 18
20 35,328 37,026 38,156 19
21 35,977 37,682 38,821 20
22 36,643 38,354 39,502 21
23 37,324 39,039 40,196 22
24 38,020 39,738 40,908 23
25 38,728 40,453 41,635 24
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.


Step Administrative Administrative Administrative Years of
Assistant I* Assistant II* Assistant III* Experience
1 23,905 25,380 26,250 0
2 24,544 25,975 26,853 1
3 25,133 26,567 27,455 2
4 25,721 27,161 28,056 3
5 26,309 27,757 28,728 4
6 26,898 28,378 29,406 5
7 27,485 29,049 30,089 6
8 28,072 29,719 30,766 7
9 28,732 30,389 31,447 8
10 29,396 31,058 32,125 9
11 30,059 31,733 32,805 10
12 30,723 32,403 33,483 11
13 31,386 33,071 34,164 12
14 32,051 33,743 34,842 13
15 32,716 34,415 35,520 14
16 33,381 35,082 36,203 15
17 34,042 35,751 36,882 16
18 34,707 36,425 37,560 17
19 35,370 37,092 38,240 18
20 36,035 37,767 38,920 19
21 36,697 38,436 39,598 20
22 37,376 39,122 40,293 21
23 38,071 39,820 41,000 22
24 38,781 40,533 41,727 23
25 39,503 41,263 42,468 24
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.


(iv) Amend 14 Del. C. § 1311 by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as
shown by strikethrough as follows:
(a) Custodians who have the qualifications required by the certifying board and who work and
are paid for 12 months per year shall be paid in accordance with the following:
Step* Custodian* Assistant Chief Chief Skilled Yrs of
Custodian* Custodian* Maintenance/ Exp.
Craftsperson*
1 25,479 26,059 27,521 28,800 0
2 25,917 26,498 27,960 29,463 1
3 26,355 26,936 28,417 30,119 2
4 26,792 27,376 28,910 30,777 3
5 27,232 27,812 29,405 31,436 4
6 27,668 28,248 29,901 32,095 5
7 28,109 28,746 30,390 32,751 6
8 28,580 29,243 30,883 33,409 7
9 29,076 29,734 31,379 34,068 8
10 29,568 30,227 31,873 34,727 9
11 30,063 30,720 32,365 35,385 10
12 30,555 31,217 32,856 36,044 11
13 31,058 31,725 33,356 36,720 12
14 31,573 32,245 33,868 37,411 13
15 32,099 32,777 34,389 38,120 14
16 32,634 33,315 34,919 38,843 15
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.


Skilled
Assistant Chief Maintenance/ Yrs of
Step* Custodian* Chief Custodian* Custodian* Craftsperson* Exp.
1 25,989 26,581 28,072 29,376 0
2 26,436 27,028 28,520 30,053 1
3 26,883 27,475 28,986 30,722 2
4 27,328 27,924 29,489 31,393 3
5 27,777 28,369 29,994 32,065 4
6 28,222 28,813 30,500 32,737 5
7 28,672 29,321 30,998 33,407 6
8 29,152 29,828 31,501 34,078 7
9 29,658 30,329 32,007 34,750 8
10 30,160 30,832 32,511 35,422 9
11 30,665 31,335 33,013 36,093 10
12 31,167 31,842 33,514 36,765 11
13 31,680 32,360 34,024 37,455 12
14 32,205 32,890 34,546 38,160 13
15 32,741 33,433 35,077 38,883 14
16 33,287 33,982 35,618 39,620 15
*Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.


(v) Amend 14 Del. C. § 1322(a) by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as shown by
strikethrough as follows:
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE MANAGERS*
Number of Pupils in School Served by Cafeteria
Step Below 351 351-500 501-800 801-1200 1201-1600 1601-2000 2000+ Yrs. of
Exp.
1 23,251 24,325 25,395 26,463 27,518 28,816 29,459 0
2 23,788 24,856 25,931 26,999 28,000 28,973 29,945 1
3 24,325 25,395 26,463 27,518 28,487 29,459 30,431 2
4 24,856 25,931 26,999 28,000 28,973 29,945 30,917 3
5 25,395 26,463 27,518 28,508 29,459 30,431 31,403 4
6 25,931 26,999 28,000 28,973 29,945 30,917 31,889 5
7 26,463 27,518 28,487 29,459 30,431 31,403 32,416 6
8 26,999 28,000 28,973 29,945 30,917 31,889 32,954 7
9 27,518 28,487 29,459 30,431 31,403 32,416 33,492 8
10 28,000 28,973 29,945 30,917 31,889 32,954 34,028 9
11 28,487 29,459 30,431 31,403 32,416 33,492 34,560 10
12 28,973 29,945 30,917 31,889 32,954 34,028 35,095 11
13 29,459 30,431 31,403 32,416 33,492 34,560 35,634 12
14 29,945 30,917 31,889 32,954 34,028 35,095 36,169 13
15 30,431 31,403 32,416 33,492 34,560 35,634 36,709 14
16 30,917 31,889 32,954 34,028 35,095 36,169 37,247 15
17 31,416 32,435 33,500 34,574 35,643 36,713 37,794 16
18 31,926 32,996 34,061 35,131 36,203 37,268 38,353 17
19 32,449 33,572 34,633 35,699 36,773 37,833 38,921 18
20 32,978 34,160 35,213 36,277 37,354 38,407 39,497 19
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.


SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE MANAGERS*
Number of Pupils in School Served by Cafeteria
Step Below 351 351-500 501-800 801-1200 1201-1600 1601-2000 2000+ Yrs. of
Exp.
1 23,717 24,812 25,903 26,993 28,069 29,393 30,049 0
2 24,264 25,354 26,450 27,539 28,560 29,553 30,544 1
3 24,812 25,903 26,993 28,069 29,057 30,049 31,040 2
4 25,354 26,450 27,539 28,560 29,553 30,544 31,536 3
5 25,903 26,993 28,069 29,079 30,049 31,040 32,032 4
6 26,450 27,539 28,560 29,553 30,544 31,536 32,527 5
7 26,993 28,069 29,057 30,049 31,040 32,032 33,065 6
8 27,539 28,560 29,553 30,544 31,536 32,527 33,614 7
9 28,069 29,057 30,049 31,040 32,032 33,065 34,162 8
10 28,560 29,553 30,544 31,536 32,527 33,614 34,709 9
11 29,057 30,049 31,040 32,032 33,065 34,162 35,252 10
12 29,553 30,544 31,536 32,527 33,614 34,709 35,797 11
13 30,049 31,040 32,032 33,065 34,162 35,252 36,347 12
14 30,544 31,536 32,527 33,614 34,709 35,797 36,893 13
15 31,040 32,032 33,065 34,162 35,252 36,347 37,444 14
16 31,536 32,527 33,614 34,709 35,797 36,893 37,992 15
17 32,045 33,084 34,170 35,266 36,356 37,448 38,550 16
18 32,565 33,656 34,743 35,834 36,928 38,014 39,121 17
19 33,098 34,244 35,326 36,413 37,509 38,590 39,700 18
20 33,638 34,844 35,918 37,003 38,102 39,176 40,287 19
* Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.


(vi) Amend 14 Del. C. § 1322(c) by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as
shown by strikethrough as follows:
SCHOOL LUNCH COOKS AND GENERAL WORKERS
Step General Cook/Baker Years of Experience
Worker
1 15.31 16.24 0
2 15.46 16.38 1
3 15.64 16.51 2
4 15.74 16.63 3
5 15.87 16.80 4
6 16.07 16.98 5
7 16.23 17.10 6
8 16.35 17.20 7
9 16.43 17.32 8
10 16.53 17.46 9
11 16.66 17.62 10
12 16.89 17.76 11
13 17.02 17.92 12
14 17.17 18.06 13
15 17.32 18.18 14
16 17.46 18.35 15
17 17.63 18.54 16
18 17.79 18.65 17
19 17.96 18.74 18
20 18.12 18.88 19
21 18.30 18.99 20
22 18.47 19.11 21


SCHOOL LUNCH COOKS AND GENERAL WORKERS
Step General Cook/Baker Years of Experience
Worker
1 15.62 16.57 0
2 15.77 16.71 1
3 15.96 16.85 2
4 16.06 16.97 3
5 16.19 17.14 4
6 16.40 17.32 5
7 16.56 17.45 6
8 16.68 17.55 7
9 16.76 17.67 8
10 16.87 17.81 9
11 17.00 17.98 10
12 17.23 18.12 11
13 17.37 18.28 12
14 17.52 18.43 13
15 17.67 18.55 14
16 17.81 18.72 15
17 17.99 18.92 16
18 18.15 19.03 17
19 18.32 19.12 18
20 18.49 19.26 19
21 18.67 19.37 20
22 18.84 19.50 21


(vii) Amend 14 Del. C. § 1324(a) and 14 Del. C. § 1324(c) by making insertions as shown by
underlining and deletions as shown by strikethrough as follows:
(a) Each service and instructional paraprofessional actually working and paid 10 months
per year shall receive annual salaries in accordance with the following schedule,
provided that the Step 1 of the salary schedule for Service Paraprofessionals to be
equivalent to at least 85 percent of the Step 1 for Instructional Paraprofessionals, in
accordance with the Public Education Compensation Committee report dated May 15,
2007:
Step Service Instructional Years of
Paraprofessionals* Paraprofessionals* Experience
1 24,555 27,633 0
2 25,488 28,701 1
3 26,460 29,818 2
4 27,477 30,983 3
5 28,537 32,198 4
6 29,646 33,468 5
7 30,802 34,797 6
8 32,013 36,182 7
9 33,275 37,628 8
10 34,592 39,139 9
*Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.
Step Service Instructional Years of
Paraprofessionals* Paraprofessionals* Experience
1 25,047 28,186 0
2 25,998 29,276 1
3 26,990 30,415 2
4 28,027 31,603 3
5 29,108 32,842 4
6 30,239 34,138 5
7 31,419 35,493 6
8 32,654 36,906 7
9 33,941 38,381 8
10 35,284 39,922 9
*Annual Salary in Whole Dollars.
(c) Instructional or service paraprofessionals, paid under this section who have received an
associate degree, completed a minimum of 60 semester credits or have successfully passed a
comprehensive testing mechanism to be defined by the Department of Education, shall
receive an annual salary supplement in the amount of $1,000. Any instructional or service


paraprofessionals, paid under this section who have received a bachelor’s degree or higher
shall receive an annual salary supplement in the amount of $2,000. Any paraprofessional who
is eligible for both salary supplements shall receive the higher of the two.
(viii) Amend 14 Del. C. §1336(a) by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as
shown by strikethrough as follows:
Step Childcare Licensing Specialist Childcare Licensing Supervisor Administrator
1 33,293 37,650 40,059
2 33,949 38,392 40,848
3 34,604 39,131 41,639
4 35,259 39,876 42,430
5 35,915 40,619 43,220
6 36,570 41,361 44,010
7 37,306 42,197 44,900
8 38,043 43,031 45,790
9 38,780 43,867 46,678
10 39,517 44,701 47,567
11 40,254 45,536 48,457
12 41,074 46,465 49,445
13 41,892 47,391 50,432
14 42,712 48,320 51,421
15 43,530 49,247 52,409
16 44,349 50,175 53,397
*Annual Salary in Whole Dollars
Step Childcare Licensing Specialist Childcare Licensing Supervisor Administrator
1 33,959 38,403 40,861
2 34,628 39,160 41,665
3 35,297 39,914 42,472
4 35,965 40,674 43,279
5 36,634 41,432 44,085
6 37,302 42,189 44,891
7 38,053 43,041 45,798
8 38,804 43,892 46,706
9 39,556 44,745 47,612
10 40,308 45,596 48,519
11 41,060 46,447 49,427
12 41,896 47,395 50,434
13 42,730 48,339 51,441
14 43,567 49,287 52,450
15 44,401 50,232 53,458
16 45,236 51,179 54,465
*Annual Salary in Whole Dollars


(n) Amend 14 Del. C. § 9219(a) by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as shown by
strikethrough as follows:
§ 9219. Basic salary schedule for Plan A employees
(a) Salaries paid to Delaware Technical and Community College Salary Plan A employees shall, upon
full implementation, be based on the following index schedule:
DELAWARE TECHNICAL AND COMMUNITY COLLEGE INDEX SCHEDULE FOR PLAN A EMPLOYEES
Yrs. No Assoc. Bach. Bach. Bach. Mast. Mast. Mast. Mast. Doctor's
of Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree Degree
Exp. Plus 15 Plus 30 Plus 15 Plus 30 Plus 45
Grad. Grad. Grad. Grad. Grad.
Credits Credits Credits Credits Credits
0 0.90316 0.96147 1.00000 1.03853 1.07806 1.11661 1.15515 1.19467 1.23321 1.25199
1 0.92786 0.98616 1.02469 1.06325 1.10178 1.14131 1.18084 1.21937 1.25792 1.27768
2 0.95158 1.01088 1.04842 1.08598 1.12648 1.16503 1.20357 1.24309 1.28163 1.30237
3 0.95849 1.01384 1.05041 1.08695 1.13637 1.17490 1.21246 1.25000 1.28856 1.30634
4 0.96542 1.01878 1.05336 1.08795 1.14725 1.18479 1.22135 1.25693 1.29447 1.31226
5 1.00099 1.05336 1.08795 1.12452 1.15910 1.19467 1.23025 1.26483 1.30140 1.31819
6 1.03558 1.08795 1.12452 1.15910 1.19467 1.23025 1.26483 1.30140 1.33598 1.35377
7 1.07214 1.12452 1.15910 1.19467 1.23025 1.26483 1.30140 1.33598 1.37056 1.38935
8 1.10673 1.15910 1.19467 1.23025 1.26483 1.30140 1.33598 1.37056 1.40713 1.42393
9 1.14131 1.19467 1.23025 1.26483 1.30140 1.33598 1.37056 1.40713 1.44172 1.45950
10 1.15020 1.23025 1.26483 1.30140 1.33598 1.37056 1.40713 1.44172 1.47630 1.49409
11 1.15910 1.23914 1.30140 1.33598 1.37056 1.40713 1.44172 1.47630 1.51287 1.52966
12 “ 1.24804 1.30930 1.37056 1.40713 1.44172 1.47630 1.51287 1.54745 1.56524
13 “ “ “ 1.37946 1.44172 1.47630 1.51287 1.54745 1.58303 1.59982
14 “ “ “ 1.37946 1.45061 1.51287 1.54745 1.58303 1.61860 1.63639
15 “ “ 1.35476 1.39824 1.48619 1.54745 1.58303 1.61860 1.65318 1.67097
16 “ “ 1.36266 1.40713 1.49508 1.58303 1.61860 1.65318 1.68975 1.70655
17 “ “ 1.37056 1.41603 1.49508 1.59093 1.62750 1.66208 1.69765 1.71544
18 “ “ “ “ 1.50397 “ “ “ “ “
19 “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “
20 “ “ “ “ “ 1.61860 1.66208 1.70655 1.75002 1.79549
21 “ “ “ “ “ 1.62750 1.67197 1.71544 1.75991 1.80438
22 “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “
23 “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “
24 “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “ “
25 “ “ “ “ “ 1.66208 1.70655 1.75002 1.79549 1.83896
26 “ “ “ “ “ 1.67197 1.71544 1.75991 1.80438 1.84786
27+ “ “ “ “ “ 1.68183 1.72434 1.76980 1.81327 1.85675
INDEX DERIVATION Base = 1.00
The base salary for 10-month employees shall be calculated by taking the salary derived at
Bachelor's degree, 0 years from §1305(b) of this title, and dividing by 0.618013 to account for 100
percent state funding.


(o) (n) Delaware Technical Community College may adjust the Administrative Responsibility Index
Schedule set forth in 14 Del C. §9219(g) to respond to employment market conditions for recruitment and
retention of employees, without impact to the general fund appropriation limit as provided in Section 1 of this Act.
Adjustments to the Administrative Responsibility Index resulting in a salary increase greater than five percent
shall require the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the Controller General and the
Secretary of the Department of Human Resources.
(p) (o) Upon the recommendations of the Public Education Compensation Committee, the basic salary
schedule for Plan A employees at Delaware Technical Community College shall be reevaluated to maintain
competitiveness in compensation for recruitment and retention of faculty that meets the workforce needs
throughout the State.
Section 9. Salaries and wage rates for state employees who are not covered by the provisions of 14 Del.
C. c. 13, 19 Del. C. § 1311A, 19 Del. C. c. 16 or by the Merit System pay plan, excluding employees of the
General Assembly - House or the General Assembly - Senate, Uniformed State Police, all full-time and regular
part-time non-Merit Telecommunications Specialists, Senior Telecommunications Specialists, Telecommunication
Shift Supervisors, Telecommunications Central Control Specialists, Senior Telecommunications Central Control
Specialists and Telecommunications Central Control Shift Supervisors employed in the Communications section
of the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, Delaware State Police, employees of the University of
Delaware, employees of Delaware State University, employees of Delaware Technical Community College who
are paid on the Administrative Salary Plan or Faculty Plan, Plans D and A, respectively, members and employees
of the Delaware National Guard and employees whose salaries are governed by Section 10 of this Act, shall have
the following:
(a) The salary of employees shall be comparable to salaries and wage rates paid from funds appropriated
by the State to employees with similar training and experience who serve in similar positions in the Merit System.
In the event that there are no similar positions in the Merit System, the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources shall establish an exempt position classification only for the purpose of assigning a salary or wage rate to
said position. On or before August 15, the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources shall publish a list of
exempt positions and the comparable Merit System class and/or pay grade for each position. In addition, such listing
shall show the name of the incumbent, if the position is filled, and shall show the statutory citation that authorizes
the establishment of the exempt position(s). The Secretary of the Department of Human Resources shall provide


copies of such listing to members of the Joint Finance Committee, the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget and the Controller General. No exempt employee shall be hired until an approved comparability has been
assigned to the position. No reclassification/regrading change in pay grade comparability of a filled or vacant
exempt position, or change of a Merit System position to an exempt position otherwise permitted under Delaware
Law shall become effective unless approved by the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. In order to permit the development of the
comparability list, state agencies shall provide to the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources job
descriptions of all exempt positions and position classification questionnaires describing the duties and
responsibilities of each of the positions. The certification of comparability by the Secretary of the Department of
Human Resources shall not be withheld unreasonably. Those positions assigned on a list of comparability that are
assigned a comparable class and/or pay grade in the Merit System shall be paid in accordance with Sections 8(b) and
(c) of this Act and Merit System Rules 4.4.3, 4.5, 4.6, 4.12 and 4.13.6; no other salary increases shall be given to
such employees unless specifically authorized in this Act.
(b) The salary of employees whose salary is below the minimum salary of the assigned pay grade of the
pay plan shall be raised to the minimum salary.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Law or this Act to the contrary, civilian
employees of the Delaware National Guard shall be compensated at a salary and wage rate established by the
Federal Civil Service Commission.
Section 10. (a) The salaries displayed below represent the salary effective on the first day of the first full
pay cycle of the fiscal year.
General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(01-01-01) Representative 51,692
(01-02-01) Senator 51,692
(02-00-00) Judicial Secretaries 61,999
(02-00-00) Judicial Secretaries to Presiding Judges 64,684
(02-01-00) Chief Justice - Supreme Court 236,327
(02-01-00) Justice - Supreme Court 223,064
(02-01-00) Judicial Secretary to the Chief Justice 65,418


General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(02-01-00) Supreme Court Judicial Secretary 64,684
(02-02-00) Chancellor - Court of Chancery 222,490
(02-02-00) Vice Chancellor - Court of Chancery 211,358
(02-03-00) President Judge - Superior Court 222,490
(02-03-00) Associate Judge - Superior Court 211,358
(02-03-00) Commissioner - Superior Court 139,532
(02-03-00) New Castle County Prothonotary 86,758
(02-03-00) Kent County Prothonotary 79,068
(02-03-00) Sussex County Prothonotary 79,068
(02-06-00) Chief Judge - Court of Common Pleas 216,416
(02-06-00) Judge - Court of Common Pleas 198,619
(02-06-00) Commissioner - Court of Common Pleas 133,496
(02-08-00) Chief Judge - Family Court 222,490
(02-08-00) Associate Judge - Family Court 211,358
(02-08-00) Commissioner - Family Court* 139,532
(02-13-00) Chief Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court 155,847
(02-13-00) Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court - 1st Term 84,673
(02-13-00) Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court - 2nd Term 87,651
(02-13-00) Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court - 3rd Term 90,406
* - Family Court Commissioner positions may be funded with Special Funds.
(02-13-00) Judicial Secretary to the Chief Magistrate 64,684
(02-17-00) State Court Administrator - Office of the State Court 156,060
Administrator
(02-17-00) Judicial Secretary to the State Court Administrator 64,684
(02-18-00) Public Guardian 113,951
(02-18-05) Child Advocate 130,481
(02-18-05) Investigation Coordinator 124,694
(10-01-01) Governor 171,000


General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(10-02-00) Director - Office of Management and Budget 167,054
(10-02-50) Executive Secretary - Architectural Accessibility Board 59,754
(10-07-01) Executive Director - Criminal Justice Council 107,161
(10-07-01) Director - Domestic Violence Coordinating Council 79,139
(10-07-02) Executive Director - DELJIS 107,161
(10-08-01) Director - Delaware State Housing Authority 145,001
(11-00-00) Chief Information Officer 182,181
(12-01-01) Lieutenant Governor 89,892
(12-02-01) Auditor 136,947
(12-03-01) Insurance Commissioner 136,947
(12-05-01) State Treasurer 136,947
(15-01-01) Attorney General 163,840
(15-01-01) Chief Deputy Attorney General 149,632
(15-02-01) Chief Defender 158,240
(15-02-02) Chief Deputy Public Defender 145,067
(16-01-00) Secretary - Human Resources 146,423
(20-01-00) Secretary - State 163,011
(20-01-00) Executive Director - Employment Relations Boards 109,505
(20-02-00) Director - Human and Civil Rights 96,630
(20-03-00) Director - Division of Archives 96,630
(20-04-00) Public Advocate 109,505
(20-04-00) Director - Public Service Commission 128,994
(20-04-00) Director - Professional Regulation 118,457
(20-05-00) Director - Corporations 137,825
(20-06-00) Director - Historical and Cultural Affairs 114,073
(20-07-00) Director - Arts 99,211
(20-08-00) State Librarian 102,014


General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(20-06-00) Director - Historical and Cultural Affairs 114,073
(20-07-00) Director - Arts 99,211
(20-08-00) State Librarian 102,014
(20-15-00) State Banking Commissioner 134,658
(20-16-00) Commissioner - Alcoholic Beverage Control 128,960
(25-01-00) Secretary - Finance 167,054
(25-05-00) Director - Accounting 131,391
(25-06-00) Director - Revenue 141,672
(25-07-00) Director - State Lottery 123,446
(35-01-00) Secretary - Health and Social Services 178,644
(35-01-00) Director - Management Services 122,918 13,658
(35-02-00) Director - Medicaid and Medical Assistance 68,408 68,407
(35-05-00) Director - Public Health 215,373
(35-06-00) Director - Substance Abuse and Mental Health 170,225
(35-07-00) Director - Division of Social Services 68,408 68,407
(35-08-00) Director - Visually Impaired 105,745
(35-09-00) Director - Health Care Quality* 110,782
(35-10-00) Director - Child Support Services 37,625 73,038
(35-11-00) Director - Developmental Disabilities Services 136,695
(35-14-00) Director - Services for Aging and Adults 136,817
with Physical Disabilities
(37-01-00) Secretary - Services for Children, 160,625
Youth and Their Families
(37-01-00) Director - Management Support Services 124,225
(37-04-00) Director - Prevention and Behavioral Health Services 124,225
(37-05-00) Director - Youth Rehabilitative Services 124,225
(37-06-00) Director - Family Services 124,225
(38-01-00) Commissioner - Correction 165,425
*- Director of Health Care Quality position funding split may vary based on caseloads billable to Medicaid.


General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(38-01-00) Bureau Chief - Administrative Services 121,982
(38-02-00) Bureau Chief - Healthcare, Substance Abuse and 124,225
Mental Health Services
(38-04-00) Bureau Chief - Prisons 145,938
(38-06-00) Bureau Chief - Community Corrections 139,598
(40-01-00) Secretary - Natural Resources and Environmental Control 146,423
(40-01-00) Deputy Secretary - Natural Resources and 133,952
Environmental Control
(40-03-02) Director - Parks and Recreation 113,718
(40-03-03) Director - Fish and Wildlife 56,859 56,859
(40-03-04) Director - Watershed Stewardship 113,718
(40-04-02) Director - Air Quality 113,718
(40-04-03) Director - Water 113,718
(40-04-04) Director - Waste and Hazardous Substances 113,718
(40-04-05) Director - Climate, Coastal, and Energy 113,718
(45-01-00) Secretary - Safety and Homeland Security 160,625
(45-01-00) Director - Delaware Emergency Management Agency 70,240 70,240
(45-04-00) Director - Alcohol and Tobacco Enforcement 101,070
(45-05-00) Commissioner - Marijuana 128,960
(45-06-00) Superintendent - State Police 225,453
(45-06-00) Assistant Superintendent - State Police 206,838
(55-01-01) Secretary - Transportation 156,602
(55-01-02) Director - Finance 132,712
(55-02-01) Director - Technology and Innovation 132,712
(55-03-01) Director - Planning 132,712
(55-04-70) Director - Maintenance and Operations 132,712
(55-08-30) Chief Engineer 142,890
(55-11-10) Director - Motor Vehicles 132,712
(60-01-00) Secretary - Labor 14,500 130,501


General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(60-06-00) Director - Unemployment Insurance 118,308
(60-07-00) Director - Industrial Affairs 115,293
(60-08-00) Director - Vocational Rehabilitation 115,293
(60-09-00) Director - Employment and Training 23,058 92,235
(65-01-00) Secretary - Agriculture 145,001
(65-01-00) Deputy Secretary - Agriculture 103,722
(70-01-01) State Election Commissioner 99,309
(70-01-01) Director, New Castle County Elections 86,758
(70-01-01) Deputy Director, New Castle County Elections 85,077
(70-01-01) Director, Kent County Elections 86,758
(70-01-01) Deputy Director, Kent County Elections 85,077
(70-01-01) Director, Sussex County Elections 86,758
(70-01-01) Deputy Director, Sussex County Elections 85,077
(75-01-01) State Fire Marshal 128,520
(75-02-01) Director - State Fire School 105,930
(76-01-01) Adjutant General 145,001
(95-01-00) Secretary of Education 182,181
(95-01-00) Deputy Secretary of Education 145,811
(95-06-00) Executive Secretary - Advisory Council on Career 109,843
and Technical Education


General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(01-01-01) Representative 52,726
(01-02-01) Senator 52,726
(02-00-00) Judicial Secretaries 63,239
(02-00-00) Judicial Secretaries to Presiding Judges 65,978
(02-01-00) Chief Justice - Supreme Court 241,054
(02-01-00) Justice - Supreme Court 227,525
(02-01-00) Judicial Secretary to the Chief Justice 66,726
(02-01-00) Supreme Court Judicial Secretary 65,978
(02-02-00) Chancellor - Court of Chancery 226,940
(02-02-00) Vice Chancellor - Court of Chancery 215,585
(02-03-00) President Judge - Superior Court 226,940
(02-03-00) Associate Judge - Superior Court 215,585
(02-03-00) Commissioner - Superior Court 142,323
(02-03-00) New Castle County Prothonotary 88,493
(02-03-00) Kent County Prothonotary 80,649
(02-03-00) Sussex County Prothonotary 80,649
(02-06-00) Chief Judge - Court of Common Pleas 220,744
(02-06-00) Judge - Court of Common Pleas 202,591
(02-06-00) Commissioner - Court of Common Pleas 136,166
(02-08-00) Chief Judge - Family Court 226,940
(02-08-00) Associate Judge - Family Court 215,585
(02-08-00) Commissioner - Family Court* 142,323
(02-13-00) Chief Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court 158,964
(02-13-00) Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court - 1st Term 86,366
(02-13-00) Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court - 2nd Term 89,404
(02-13-00) Magistrate - Justice of the Peace Court - 3rd Term 92,214
* - Family Court Commissioner positions may be funded with Special Funds.
100

General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(02-13-00) Judicial Secretary to the Chief Magistrate 65,978
(02-17-00) State Court Administrator - Office of the State Court 159,181
Administrator
(02-17-00) Judicial Secretary to the State Court Administrator 65,978
(02-18-00) Public Guardian 116,230
(02-18-05) Child Advocate 133,091
(02-18-05) Investigation Coordinator 127,188
(10-01-01) Governor 174,420
(10-02-00) Director - Office of Management and Budget 170,395
(10-02-50) Executive Secretary - Architectural Accessibility Board 60,949
(10-07-01) Executive Director - Criminal Justice Council 109,304
(10-07-01) Director - Domestic Violence Coordinating Council 80,722
(10-07-02) Executive Director - DELJIS 109,304
(10-08-01) Director - Delaware State Housing Authority 147,901
(11-00-00) Chief Information Officer 185,825
(12-01-01) Lieutenant Governor 91,690
(12-02-01) Auditor 139,686
(12-03-01) Insurance Commissioner 139,686
(12-05-01) State Treasurer 139,686
(15-01-01) Attorney General 167,117
(15-01-01) Chief Deputy Attorney General 152,625
(15-02-01) Chief Defender 161,405
(15-02-02) Chief Deputy Public Defender 147,968
(16-01-00) Secretary - Human Resources 149,351
(20-01-00) Secretary - State 166,271
(20-01-00) Executive Director - Employment Relations Boards 111,695
(20-02-00) Director - Human and Civil Rights 98,563
101

General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(20-03-00) Director - Division of Archives 98,563
(20-04-00) Public Advocate 111,695
(20-04-00) Director - Public Service Commission 131,574
(20-04-00) Director - Professional Regulation 120,826
(20-05-00) Director - Corporations 140,582
(20-06-00) Director - Historical and Cultural Affairs 116,354
(20-07-00) Director - Arts 101,195
(20-08-00) State Librarian 104,054
(20-15-00) State Banking Commissioner 137,351
(20-16-00) Commissioner - Alcoholic Beverage Control 131,539
(25-01-00) Secretary - Finance 170,395
(25-05-00) Director - Accounting 134,019
(25-06-00) Director - Revenue 144,505
(25-07-00) Director - State Lottery 125,915
(35-01-00) Secretary - Health and Social Services 182,217
(35-01-00) Director - Management Services 125,376 13,931
(35-02-00) Director - Medicaid and Medical Assistance 69,776 69,775
(35-05-00) Director - Public Health 219,680
(35-06-00) Director - Substance Abuse and Mental Health 173,630
(35-07-00) Director - Division of Social Services 69,776 69,775
(35-08-00) Director - Visually Impaired 107,860
(35-09-00) Director - Health Care Quality* 112,998
(35-10-00) Director - Child Support Services 38,378 74,499
(35-11-00) Director - Developmental Disabilities Services 139,429
(35-14-00) Director - Services for Aging and Adults 139,553
with Physical Disabilities
* - Director of Health Care Quality position funding split may vary based on caseloads billable to Medicaid.
102

General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(37-01-00) Secretary - Services for Children, 163,838
Youth and Their Families
(37-01-00) Director - Management Support Services 126,710
(37-04-00) Director - Prevention and Behavioral Health Services 126,710
(37-05-00) Director - Youth Rehabilitative Services 126,710
(37-06-00) Director - Family Services 126,710
(38-01-00) Commissioner - Correction 168,734
(38-01-00) Bureau Chief - Administrative Services 124,422
(38-02-00) Bureau Chief - Healthcare, Substance Abuse and 126,710
Mental Health Services
(38-04-00) Bureau Chief - Prisons 148,857
(38-06-00) Bureau Chief - Community Corrections 142,390
(40-01-00) Secretary - Natural Resources and Environmental Control 149,351
(40-01-00) Deputy Secretary - Natural Resources and 136,631
Environmental Control
(40-03-02) Director - Parks and Recreation 115,992
(40-03-03) Director - Fish and Wildlife 57,996 57,996
(40-03-04) Director - Watershed Stewardship 115,992
(40-04-02) Director - Air Quality 115,992
(40-04-03) Director - Water 115,992
(40-04-04) Director - Waste and Hazardous Substances 115,992
(40-04-05) Director - Climate, Coastal, and Energy 115,992
(45-01-00) Secretary - Safety and Homeland Security 163,838
(45-01-00) Director - Delaware Emergency Management Agency 71,645 71,645
(45-04-00) Director - Alcohol and Tobacco Enforcement 103,091
(45-05-00) Commissioner - Marijuana 131,539
(45-06-00) Superintendent - State Police 266,767
(45-06-00) Assistant Superintendent - State Police 244,740
(55-01-01) Secretary - Transportation 159,734
103

General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(55-01-02) Director - Finance 135,366
(55-02-01) Director - Technology and Innovation 135,366
(55-03-01) Director - Planning 135,366
(55-04-70) Director - Maintenance and Operations 135,366
(55-08-30) Chief Engineer 145,748
(55-11-10) Director - Motor Vehicles 135,366
(60-01-00) Secretary - Labor 14,790 133,111
(60-06-00) Director - Unemployment Insurance 120,674
(60-07-00) Director - Industrial Affairs 117,599
(60-08-00) Director - Vocational Rehabilitation 117,599
(60-09-00) Director - Employment and Training 23,519 94,080
(65-01-00) Secretary - Agriculture 147,901
(65-01-00) Deputy Secretary - Agriculture 107,440
(70-01-01) State Election Commissioner 101,295
(70-01-01) Director, New Castle County Elections 88,493
(70-01-01) Deputy Director, New Castle County Elections 86,779
(70-01-01) Director, Kent County Elections 88,493
(70-01-01) Deputy Director, Kent County Elections 86,779
(70-01-01) Director, Sussex County Elections 88,493
(70-01-01) Deputy Director, Sussex County Elections 86,779
(75-01-01) State Fire Marshal 131,090
(75-02-01) Director - State Fire School 108,049
(76-01-01) Adjutant General 147,901
(95-01-00) Secretary of Education 185,825
(95-01-00) Deputy Secretary of Education 148,727
(95-06-00) Executive Secretary - Advisory Council on Career 112,040
and Technical Education
104

(b) (i) Salaries of designated positions in Section 10(a) of this Act shall have no further increase
applied by any other section of this Act, except as provided in Section 10(b)(ii), (iii), (iv), (v),
(vi), and (vii).
(ii) In reviewing requests made pursuant to this section, the Secretary of the Department of
Human Resources shall provide an analysis of the request and shall solicit the advice and
written consent of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General in the event the salary is higher than the amount listed in Section 10(a).
(iii) Positions designated in Section 10(a) of this Act may be paid a salary that is less than the
designated salary if the position is filled on an "acting" basis.
(iv) An agency may request a dual incumbency for a division director or equivalent position in
Section 10(a), provided that the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General determine that
the position is essential to fill during the interim period it would otherwise be vacant. The
agency shall submit a request to the Department of Human Resources. The Secretary of the
Department of Human Resources shall review this request and seek the advice and written
consent of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(v) If the incumbent in the position of Secretary - Health and Social Services holds a state
medical license, the salary listed in Section 10(a) of this Act for that position shall be
increased by $12.0. Additionally, if the incumbent in the position of Secretary - Health and
Social Services is a board-certified physician, a $3.0 supplement shall be added to the annual
salary listed in Section 10(a) of this Act.
(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or Section of this Act to the contrary, positions
designated in Section 10(a) that were reviewed and recommended for salary adjustment
during the prior fiscal year will be eligible to receive the recommended increase retroactively
to the first full pay period of fiscal year upon the approval of the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(vii) In accordance with the 2021 Delaware Compensation Commission Report recommendation,
the salary for the Governor shall increase by a 2.0 percent market adjustment each year for
four years effective with the Governor’s oath of office.
105

(vii) Amend 29 Del. C. §3304 by making insertions as shown by underlining and deletions as
shown by strikethrough as follows:
The renumeration for all offices specified in § 3303 of this title established by the report shall
take effect and have the force and effect of law as of the first day of the first full pay period of
the fiscal year July 1 following submission, unless the General Assembly shall by joint
resolution reject the report in its entirety within 30 days following the commencement of its
session.
(c) By May 1, the Department of Human Resources shall submit to the Joint Finance Committee a listing
of employees designated in Section 10(a). The listing shall indicate for each position the number of Hay points
applicable for Fiscal Year 2024 and the number of Hay points of any recommended changes for any position for
Fiscal Year 2025.
(d) For this fiscal year, the following represent the maximum salaries appropriated within Section 1 of this
Act. These maximum salaries may be increased upon approval of the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General to accommodate
changes in statutory requirements.
General All Other
Budget Unit Line Item Fund Funds
(10-02-32) Board Members - Pensions $15.0
(10-02-50) Board Members - Architectural Accessibility Board $2.3
(15-01-01) Board Members - Consumer Protection 3.5
(20-01-00) Board Members - Public Employment Relations Board 7.4
(20-01-00) Board Members - Merit Employee Relations Board 20.0
(20-02-00) Board Members - Human Relations 2.5
(20-04-00) Board Members - Professional Regulation 71.5
(20-04-00) Board Members - Public Service Commission 188.1
(20-16-00) Board Members - Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission 8.6
(25-01-00) Board Members - Revenue 33.0
(35-01-10) Board Members - Diamond State Hospital Cost Review Board 285.0
(38-04-00) Board Members - Institutional Classification 12.0
(60-07-00) Board Members - Industrial Accident Board 245.4
106

(65-01-05) Harness Racing Commission 13.6
(65-01-10) Thoroughbred Racing Commission 13.6
(65-01-12) Nutrient Management Commission 22.4
(70-01-01) Board Members - State Board of Elections 21.5
(95-01-40) Board Members - State Board of Education 21.6
Section 11. In an effort to ensure the efficiency of operations of state government, the Office of
Management and Budget will work with agencies to identify positions within their organizations that can be targeted
for reallocation and/or attrition. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Office
of Management and Budget shall, upon the concurrence of the Controller General, have the authority to reallocate
personnel costs, as well as positions, throughout and among respective state agencies, including the Judiciary and
Other Elective offices, in order to meet critical workforce needs. Further, the Director of the Office of Management
and Budget, upon the concurrence of the Controller General, shall de-authorize targeted positions, where
appropriate, as they become vacant throughout the fiscal year.
Section 12. With the exception of the custodial work associated with Legislative Hall and the Governor's
Office, the Office of Management and Budget may not hire any permanent, full-time custodial employees in any
fiscal year without the concurrence of the Controller General.
Section 13. All agencies receiving an Energy appropriation in Section 1 of this Act must work through
Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control and the Office of Management and Budget to attain
any contract(s) dealing with the retail wheeling of natural gas or electricity. This includes agencies 01 through 95
with the exception of the University of Delaware.
During the current fiscal year, all energy use systems for new facilities and/or rental/leasing changes must
be coordinated with the Division of Climate, Coastal, and Energy within the Department of Natural Resources and
Environmental Control and with the Office of Management and Budget.
Any internal program unit/budget unit having energy funding (electricity, natural or propane gas and
heating oils) for the purpose of reimbursing a host internal program unit/budget unit must release the remaining
sums to the host internal program unit/budget unit in the event that the tenant internal program unit/budget unit
vacates the premises. It is the responsibility of the host internal program unit/budget unit to initiate the transfer
request. Those agencies which are budgeted energy as a result of occupying a portion of a host facility’s property,
and do not directly pay energy bills, may not transfer energy funds other than to the host agency.
107

Section 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, the
Office of Management and Budget, subject to the approval of the Controller General, is authorized to make technical
adjustments to the personnel complement of any agency as appropriated in Section 1 of this Act in those situations
where, due to the rounding of split-funded positions, such an adjustment is necessary so that an agency may
establish its authorized complement.
Section 15. Notwithstanding Merit Rules 4.4.2 and 4.4.3, approval of a rate higher than 80 percent of the
midpoint which results in a need for leveling-up to address pay compression or pay equity, as defined by a criteria
established by the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, shall only occur with the concurrence of the
Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General, provided that sufficient funds exist within the agency’s base budget to fund such actions.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this Act or the Delaware Code to the contrary, no provision of Chapter 4.0 of the
Merit Rules shall be considered compensation for the purposes of collective bargaining under 19 Del. C. § 1311A or
for Merit Employees organized under 19 Del. C. c. 16. The Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General, with the concurrence of the Co-
Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, shall promulgate policies and procedures to implement this section.
Section 16. In an effort to reduce the financial impact of workers’ compensation and property losses to the
State, agencies and school districts shall work with the Insurance Coverage Office to implement safety and return to
work policies. Any employee who has been on workers’ compensation shall be a preferential hire for any position
for which the employee is qualified. In accordance with state law, the employee shall receive a salary supplement
based on that employee’s prior earnings in the event the new salary is less than their current salary.
Section 17. In accordance with the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 5106, effective for all fiscal years
commencing after June 30, 2003, exceptions to the standard practice of paycheck deductions shall be made for
employees paying dues to the Delaware State Education Association (DSEA). All employees designating that DSEA
membership dues be deducted from their bi-weekly paycheck shall have those dues deducted from the 22 pay
periods occurring within the 10 month school year. This change will facilitate the maintenance of the state payroll
system, as well as establish a consistent process for managing the collection of dues from members of DSEA.
Section 18. Notwithstanding Chapter 10.0 and Chapter 19.0 of the Merit Rules, upon approval by the
Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
108

Controller General, temporary appointees may be assigned to the same position as that already assigned to a
permanent employee.
Section 19. Employees of the State of Delaware who are enrolled in a health insurance benefit plan must
actively participate in the open enrollment process each fiscal year by selecting a health plan or waiving coverage.
Should such employee(s) neglect to enroll in a plan of their choice during the open enrollment period or waive
coverage, said employee(s) and any spouse or dependents enrolled at the time will be enrolled into the default health
plan(s) as determined by the State Employee Benefits Committee.
Section 20. Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code to the contrary, 29 Del. C. § 5207 shall
not apply to individuals employed in accordance with 29 Del. C. § 5903(17).
Section 21. Any group defined in 29 Del. C. § 5209(a), (d) or (e) that elects to participate in the State of
Delaware Group Health Insurance Program (GHIP) is required to submit a letter of intent to the Director of
Statewide Benefits and Insurance Coverage at least four months prior to their effective date of coverage. Groups
who choose to join the GHIP will be required to execute a Participating Group Agreement in the form required by
the Statewide Benefits Office.
Section 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or the Delaware Code to the contrary, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget, with the concurrence of the Secretary of the Department of
Human Resources and the Controller General, is authorized to transfer funds from unaffiliated participant premium
revenues as repayment for any State-funded Group Health Insurance deficit.
Section 23. The responsibilities and authorities established by 75 Del. Laws, c. 243 shall remain in effect
through the current fiscal year or upon passage of legislation by the General Assembly. The following provisions
shall apply:
(a) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall provide the Controller General with a
detailed description of any significant change in energy procurement strategy and procedures previously approved
by the Controller General. The detailed description shall be provided to the Controller General at least two weeks
prior to the execution of an energy supply contract that incorporates the changes.
(b) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall have the authority to enter into wholesale
or retail supply contracts for natural gas and other types of fuel and energy in accordance with the responsibilities
and authorities established for the purchase of electricity as per 75 Del. Laws, c. 243.
109

(c) Aggregation partner, as defined in 75 Del. Laws, c. 243, shall also be construed to mean public
libraries, corporations and authorities established by the General Assembly including, but not limited to, the
Delaware Riverfront Development Corporation, Delaware River and Bay Authority and Diamond State Port
Corporation upon approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(d) The provisions of 75 Del. Laws, c. 243, § 1(b) shall be construed to include electricity, gas and other
sources of fuel and energy procured on both retail and wholesale energy markets.
Section 24. (a) For the purposes of meeting the public notice and advertising requirements of 29 Del. C. c.
69, the announcement of bid solicitations and associated notices for the required duration on a single site accessible
to the public and administered by the Section shall satisfy the public notice and advertisement requirements under
this chapter.
(b) The Office of Management and Budget, Department of Education, local school districts and the Data
Service Center shall continue to meet, at least quarterly, to identify and implement purchasing opportunities that will
increase cost savings, improve efficiencies and maximize flexibility. Where two or more districts procure materials
and services of similar nature, districts shall aggregate these purchasing efforts through the Office of Management
and Budget.
Section 25. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, 29 Del. C. c. 101 or any
other laws to the contrary, the State Employee Benefits Committee is authorized to amend the rules for Employees
Eligible to Participate in the State Group Health Insurance Program and the State Disability Insurance Program by
approving such amendments and causing the amendments to be published in the Register of Regulations with such
amendments to be effective as of the date of such publication unless otherwise specified by the State Employee
Benefits Committee.
Section 26. During the current fiscal year, the State Employee Health Fund and Department of Health and
Social Services, Division of Medicaid and Medical Assistance (35-02-01) shall participate in the Delaware Health
Information Network (DHIN). Charges for participation shall be established as a result of 16 Del. C. § 10303.
Section 27. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall report to the Co-Chairs of the
Joint Finance Committee on January 15 of each fiscal year the number of vacancies in each agency and the vacancy
rate of each agency. Additionally, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall report the total
number of General Fund positions authorized July 1 and January 1 of each fiscal year to the members of the Joint
Finance Committee.
110

Section 28. State Employees in full-time appointed exempt positions except elected officials, judges
(excluding justices of the peace), casual and seasonal employees, temporary employees and interns enumerated on
the comparability list that are assigned a comparable class and/or pay grade in the Merit System, who are otherwise
eligible for annual and sick leave accrual per Delaware Code, that are approved to work a standard work week of 40
hours, shall accrue annual leave at the rate of 14.0 hours and sick leave at the rate of 10 hours for each completed
calendar month of state service. Agencies who have granted annual leave to employees in excess of 13.25 hours and
sick leave to employees in excess of 9.5 hours per month based on a 40-hour work week shall not be required to
recoup accruals. These employees shall be compensated for unused annual leave and sick leave to be consistent with
Merit rules and 29 Del. C. § 5905(c).
Section 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or the Delaware Code to the contrary, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget, with the concurrence of the Controller General and the Secretary
of the Department of Human Resources, is authorized to make changes to pay matrices should such changes be
required to meet critical shortages in direct service areas of operation.
Section 30. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall transfer amounts to the Budget
Stabilization Fund, if any, in accordance with the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6533(k)(2). No amount shall be
subtracted from the Budget Stabilization Fund for inclusion in estimated unencumbered funds for Fiscal Year 2026
pursuant to this Act.
Section 31. (a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in the following accounts shall
remain as continuing appropriations and shall not be subject to reversion until June 30, 2025 2026. Any
appropriation listed below that has a balance of zero on June 30, 2024 2025, shall not continue:
Fiscal Year(s) Appropriation Description
2023/24/25 01-01-01-00140 Travel
2021/22/23/24/25 01-01-01-00141 Legislative Travel
2019/20/21/ 2024/25 01-01-01-00145 House Member Expenses
2023/24/25 01-01-01-00150 Contractual Services
2022/ 2023/24/25 01-01-01-00160 Supplies and Materials
2020/21/22/24 2025 01-01-01-00180 House Committee Expenses
2024/25 01-02-01-00140 Travel
2023/24/25 01-02-01-00141 Legislative Travel
111

2024/25 01-02-01-00145 Senate Member Expenses
2023/ 2024/25 01-02-01-00150 Contractual Services
2023/ 2024/25 01-02-01-00160 Supplies and Materials
2024 01-02-01-00170 Capital Outlay
2024/25 01-02-01-00180 Senate Committee Expenses
2020/ 2021/22/23/24/25 01-05-01-00140 Travel
2019/20/21/22/23/24/25 01-05-01-00141 Legislative Travel
2016/17/18/19/20/21/22/23/24/25 01-05-01-00150 Contractual Services
2020/21/22/23/24 01-05-01-00160 Supplies and Materials
2020/ 2021/23/24/25 01-05-01-00183 Eastern Trade Council
2022/ 2023/24/25 01-05-01-00184 Interstate Agriculture Commission
2024 2025 01-05-01-00240 Delaware River Basin Commission
2024 2025 01-05-01-00429 Council of State Governments
2011/12/15/18/19/20/21/22/23/24 01-05-01-00432 State and Local Legal Center, NCSL
2022/ 2023/24/25 01-05-01-00509 National Black Caucus of State Legislators
2015/16/17/18/19/20/21/22/23/24/25 01-05-01-00514 Legislation for Gaming States
2022/23/24/25 01-08-01-00140 Travel
2017/20/21/22/23/24/25 01-08-01-00150 Contractual Services
2022/23/24/25 01-08-01-00152 Printing - Laws and Journals
2018/19/ 2022/23/24/25 01-08-01-00160 Supplies and Materials
2023/ 2024/25 01-08-01-00170 Capital Outlay
2024/25 01-08-01-00185 Sunset Committee Expenses
2024 2025 01-08-01-00199 Contingency - Security
2022/23/24/25 01-08-02-00140 Travel
2021/22/23/24/25 01-08-02-00150 Contractual Services
2017/18/21/22/23/24/25 01-08-02-00160 Supplies and Materials
2025 01-08-02-00170 Capital Outlay
2023/ 2024/25 01-08-02-00189 Contingency - Legislative Council
2018/19/20/21/22/24 01-08-02-00190 Contingency - Family Law Commission Expenses
112

2018/19/20 01-08-02-00195 Contingency - Clean Air Policy Committee
2022/ 2023/24/25 01-08-02-00196 Contingency - JFC/CIP
2020 01-08-02-00197 Contingency – Internship
2024 01-08-02-08035 Fire Service Sustainability Study
2022/23/ 2024/25 01-08-02-08916 DELIS
2022/23/24/25 01-08-03-00140 Travel
2018/19/ 2020/21/22/23/24/25 01-08-03-00150 Contractual Services
2022/23/24/25 01-08-06-00140 Travel
2023 2025 01-08-06-00150 Contractual Services
2023 2024/25 02-03-10-00202 Jury Expenses
2024 02-13-10-00621 Housing/Landlord Contingency
2024 2025 02-17-01-00203 Retired Judges
2024 2025 02-17-01-00210 Court Appointed Attorneys/Involuntary Commitment
2024 2025 02-17-01-00211 Interpreters
2024 2025 02-17-01-00212 New Castle County Courthouse
2024/25 02-17-04-00201 Technology Maintenance
2024 2025 02-18-05-00207 Child Attorneys
2024 2025 02-18-05-00217 Ivy Davis Scholarship Fund
2024 2025 02-18-05-00616 Youth in Transition
2024 10-02-10-08916 Technology
2025 10-02-11-00150 Contractual Services
2024 2025 10-02-11-00230 Legal Fees
2023/ 2024/25 10-02-11-00232 Salary/OEC
2024 10-02-11-00236 Kids Count
2024 2025 10-02-11-00239 Elder Tax Relief and Education Expense Fund
2016 10-02-11-00270 UD Study
2023 10-02-11-00392 DSP Vehicle Replacement and Equipment
2020/21/22/23/24/25 10-02-11-00507 Behavioral Health Consortium
2022/23 10-02-11-00519 Body Camera Program
113

2024 2025 10-02-11-00597 Veteran Tax Relief Education Expense Fund
2022/23 2024 10-02-11-00607 Operations I
2024 10-02-11-00620 Marijuana Control Act
2024 10-02-11-00621 Housing/Landlord Contingency
2024 10-02-11-00622 Early Childhood and Preschool Contingency
2024 10-02-11-00623 Education Compensation Contingency
2024 10-02-11-00670 Marijuana Control Act
2020 10-02-11-08904 Behavioral Health Consortium
2024 10-02-11-08911 Primary and General Election
2019/24 10-02-11-08912 Delaware Health Care Claims Database
2022/23/ 2024 10-02-11-08916 USC Server Replacement/OMB Technology Needs
2020 10-02-11-08918 Higher Education Enhanced Land Grant/
Workforce Development Fund
2022/23 10-02-11-08922 Body Camera Program
2023/24 10-02-11-08939 Fuel Contingency/Legal Fees Contingency/Trauma
Informed Services Contingency/Medicaid
Contingency
2024 10-02-11-08940 Landlord Obligations & Tenant Remedies
2023 10-02-11-08949 Family Leave Act
2024 10-02-11-08952 Marijuana Control Act
2023/24/25 10-02-11-08953 ERP
2024 10-02-32-08916 ERP Cloud Migration
2025 10-02-42-08922 State Fleet Electric Vehicles
2024 10-02-47-08916 ERP Cloud Migration
2020 2024 10-02-50-00607 Operations I
2024/25 10-02-50-08922 Equipment
2024 10-02-50-08939 Clearfield House Engineering Study
2024 10-02-50-08940 Delaware Veteran’s Cemetery Expansion
2024 2025 10-07-01-00348 Targeted Youth Prevention Program
2024 2025 10-07-01-00539 Law Enforcement Education Fund
2024/25 10-07-01-00559 Public Attorney Student Loan Repayment
114

2023/25 10-07-01-08939 Trauma Informed Services Contingency
2025 10-07-01-00636 Family Justice Centers
2024 11-04-06-08916 ERP Cloud Migration
2024 11-05-01-08916 ERP Cloud Migration
2023 12-05-06-08939 Delaware EARNS
2024/25 12-05-06-08940 Delaware EARNS
2024 15-01-01-00620 Marijuana Control Act
2024 15-02-03-00206 Contract Conflict Attorneys
2023 16-05-01-00607 Operations I
2024 2025 16-05-02-00150 Contractual Services
2024 2025 16-05-02-00262 Self Insurance
2024/25 16-07-01-00504 First State Quality Improvement Fund
2023/24/25 16-07-01-00595 GEAR Award
2022 16-07-01-00607 GEAR Award
2021/ 2022/24/25 20-01-01-00241 International Council of Delaware
2025 20-01-01-00343 Hispanic Affairs
2024/25 20-01-01-00629 Equity Ombudsperson Program
2024 20-01-02-00259 Veterans Commission Trust
2024 20-01-02-08940 Delaware Veterans Memorial Cemetery
2023 20-01-08-08916 Online Ethics Training
2024 2025 20-03-01-00287 Delaware Heritage Commission
2022 20-03-01-08920 Renovation/Historic Site Improvements
2024/25 20-07-01-00296 Delaware Art
2024/25 20-08-01-00297 Library Standards
2024/25 20-08-01-00434 Scholarships
2024 2025 20-08-01-00538 Public Education Project
2025 20-10-01-08040 Delaware Grocery Initiative
2023 20-10-01-08939 Entertainment Industry Fund
2024 20-16-10-08922 ERP Cloud Migration
115

2024 25-05-01-08916 ERP Cloud Migration
2022/ 2023/24/25 35-01-10-00523 Health Care Provider State Loan Repayment
2024/25 35-01-10-00534 DIDER Loan Repayment
2024/25 35-01-10-00535 DIMER Loan Repayment
2023/ 2024/25 35-01-10-00610 Health Care Innovation
2022 35-01-10-08005 Health Care Provider Loan
2022 35-01-10-08939 Health Care Loan Provider State Loan Repayment
2024/25 35-02-01-00301 Non-Medicaid State Match
2024 2025 35-02-01-00308 Delaware Healthy Children Program
2024 2025 35-02-01-00367 Technology Operations
2024 2025 35-02-01-00428 Medicaid
2024 2025 35-02-01-00528 Medicaid State Match
2024 2025 35-02-01-00570 Medicaid Projects
2024 35-02-01-00625 Skilled Nursing Facility Contingency
2024 35-02-01-08912 Delaware Health Care Claims Database
2024 35-02-01-08916 Technology
2024 35-02-01-08939 Medicaid
2024 35-02-01-08940 Program Supplement
2024 35-05-10-00477 Health Disparities
2024 35-05-10-08940 Health Disparities & Health Inequity Program
2025 35-05-20-00315 School Based Health Centers
2025 35-05-20-00594 DE CAN
2024 35-05-20-00620 Marijuana Control Act
2024 35-05-20-00623 Education Salary Supplement Contingency
2024 35-05-20-00631 Childhood Lead Poisoning
2024 35-05-20-08939 Residential Lead Remediation
2024 35-05-20-08940 Evaluation and Assessment of School Facilities
2024 2025 35-05-30-00399 Substance Use Disorder Services
2024 35-06-10-08916 DMES Development
116

2024 2025 35-06-20-00302 Community Housing Support
2024 2025 35-06-20-00521 CMH Group Homes
2024 2025 35-06-20-00583 Community Placements
2024 2025 35-06-40-00399 Substance Use Disorder Services
2024 2025 35-07-01-00328 General Assistance
2024 2025 35-07-01-00330 Child Care
2025 35-07-01-00367 Technology Operations
2024/25 35-07-01-00630 Summer EBT Program
2024 2025 35-07-02-00332 Emergency Assistance
2024 35-08-01-00623 Education Salary Supplement Contingency
2022 35-09-01-00607 Operations
2024 2025 35-10-01-00367 Technology Operations
2024 2025 35-11-30-00335 Purchase of Community Services
2025 35-11-30-00528 Medicaid State Match
2024 37-01-40-00623 Education Salary Supplement Contingency
2024 2025 37-01-50-00351 MIS Development
2022 37-05-30-08930 Juvenile Re-Entry Services Fund
2024 2025 37-06-40-00354 Child Welfare/Contractual Services
2024 38-01-04-00623 Education Salary Supplement Contingency
2024 2025 38-01-14-00552 Information Technology
2024 2025 38-02-01-00359 Medical Treatment and Services
2024 2025 38-04-20-00358 Warehouse
2024 2025 40-01-01-00197 Internship Program
2023 40-01-05-08916 Permitting and Data Management Projects
2022 40-03-02-08922 Veterinary Equipment
2024 40-03-02-08922 Biden Center Equipment
2023/ 2024/25 40-03-03-00371 Spraying and Insecticides
2024 2025 40-03-03-00375 Beaver, Phragmites and Deer
2024 2025 40-03-03-00497 Tick Control Program
117

2024 2025 40-03-03-00566 Natural Heritage Program
2025 40-03-03-08939 Hunting Enforcement
2024 2025 40-03-04-00374 Sand Bypass
2024/25 40-04-04-00380 SARA
2024 40-04-05-08922 Tree for Every Delawarean
2024 40-04-05-08939 Electric Grid Study
2024 45-01-01-00519 Body Camera Program
2022 45-01-01-08922 Body Camera Program/Special Equipment
2024/25 45-01-60-00257 Brain Injury Trust Fund
2024 45-04-10-00620 Marijuana Control Act
2024 45-04-10-08952 Marijuana Control Act
2024 45-05-10-00620 Marijuana Control Act
2023/ 2024 45-06-08-00617 Firearm Transaction Approval Program
2023 45-06-08-00618 Lethal Weapons
2024 45-06-11-08922 Equipment
2024 45-06-12-08922 Vehicles and Equipment
2025 45-06-08-08940 Permit to Purchase
2023 55-01-02-93082 Prior Year Operations
2023 60-01-10-08949 Family Leave Act
2024 60-08-10-00150 Contractual Services
2024/ 2025 60-08-10-00396 Supported Employment
2025 60-09-20-00265 Welfare Reform
2024/25 60-09-20-00394 Workforce Development
2024/25 60-09-20-00397 Summer Youth Program
2024/25 60-09-20-00506 Learning for Careers
2024/25 60-09-20-00531 Elevate Delaware
2024 65-01-04-08940 Tree for Every Delawarean
2025 70-01-01-00412 School Elections
2024/25 70-01-01-08911 Primary and General Elections
118

2024 2025 70-02-01-00412 School Elections
2024/25 70-02-01-08911 Primary and General Elections
2024 2025 70-03-01-00412 School Elections
2024 2025 70-03-01-08911 Primary and General Elections
2024 2025 70-04-01-00412 School Elections
2024 2025 70-04-01-08911 Primary and General Elections
2024 75-03-01-00423 Fire Safety
2024 2025 76-01-01-00427 Educational Assistance
2024 2025 76-01-01-00612 Joint Enlistment Enhancement Program
2024 90-01-01-00424 SEED/Inspire Marketing
2024 2025 90-01-01-00589 College of Engineering
2023/24 90-01-01-00615 Redding Consortium/WLC
2025 90-03-01-00424 SEED/Inspire Marketing
2024/25 90-03-01-00474 Nursing Expansion
2024/25 90-03-01-00479 Cooperative Extension
2024/25 90-03-01-00480 Cooperative Research
2024/25 90-03-01-00516 Cooperative Forestry
2025 90-03-01-00547 Racial Equity Consortium
2022 90-03-01-00607 Operations
2022/23/24/25 90-03-01-00619 Early Childhood Innovation Center
2025 90-03-01-08041 Delaware State University Operations
2023/24/25 90-03-05-00615 Redding Consortium/WLC
2024/25 90-04-01-00443 Career Pathways
2024 95-01-01-08940 Mentoring Program Needs
2024 95-01-02-00385 Higher Education Operations
2024 2025 95-01-02-05277 Student Assessment System
2023/24 2025 95-01-03-05320 Redding Consortium/WLC
2022/23 95-01-03-08945 Redding Consortium/WLC
2025 95-01-04-00385 Higher Education Operations
119

2024 95-01-04-00627 Governor’s Summer Fellowship
2025 95-01-04-05139 Mental Health Critical Needs Reimbursement
2024 2025 95-01-04-05199 Education Certification and Development
2023/24/25 95-01-04-05320 Redding Consortium/WLC
2022 2023 95-01-04-08945 Redding Consortium/WLC
2020/21 95-01-05-00230 Legal Fees
2022 95-01-05-00607 Operations
2018 95-01-05-05215 Educator Accountability
2025 95-01-05-08045 Public Education Funding Assessment
2023 95-01-05-08939 Legal Fees
2022/23 95-01-05-08945 Redding Consortium/WLC
2022/23/ 2024/25 95-01-06-05320 Redding Consortium/WLC
2025 95-01-06-08037 Childcare Licensing System
2022/ 2023 95-01-06-08945 Redding Consortium/WLC
2025 95-01-30-05285 Professional Standards Board
2024 2025 95-01-40-05191 State Board of Education Operations
2024 2025 95-01-40-05284 P-20 Council
2024 2025 95-02-02-00231 World Language Expansion
2024 2025 95-02-02-00368 College Access
2024 2025 95-02-02-05115 Teacher Recruitment/Retention
2025 95-02-02-05135 Early Literacy Coaches
2024 2025 95-02-02-05181 Unique Alternatives
2023/ 2024/25 95-02-02-05244 School Improvement Funds
2024 2025 95-02-02-05275 Delaware Science Coalition
2024 2025 95-02-02-05301 Math Coaches
2023/24/25 95-02-02-05320 Redding Consortium/WLC
2024 2025 95-02-02-05322 DE Math Plan
2024 2025 95-02-02-05400 Year Long Residencies
2024 2025 95-02-02-05401 DE Literacy Plan
120

2023 95-02-02-08940 Education Funding Assessment
2024 2025 95-02-05-05225 Professional Accountability and Instructional
Advancement Fund
2024 95-02-05-05306 Student Success Block Grant
2024 95-03-20-00623 Education Salary Supplement Contingency
2024 2025 95-03-20-05108 Reading Interventions
2024 2025 95-03-20-05216 Early Childhood Assistance
2024 2025 95-03-20-05240 Early Childhood Initiatives
2024 95-03-30-00623 Education Salary Supplement Contingency
2024 2025 95-03-40-00591 Inspire
2024 2025 95-03-40-00613 Mental Health Services Scholarship
2024 2025 95-03-40-05247 Scholarships and Grants
2017 95-03-40-05248 Ferguson DSTP Scholarship
2024 2025 95-03-40-05252 SEED Scholarship
2024 2025 95-03-40-05304 Loan Forgiveness
2023 95-33-00-05305 Wilmington Schools Initiative
2024 95-33-00-08939 Wilmington Schools Initiative
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in Fiscal Year 2024 2025 Professional and
Curriculum Development (appropriation 05205), Driver Education (appropriation 05142), Early Childhood
Assistance (appropriation 05216), Transportation (appropriations 05138, 05149, 05150, 05152, 05177, 05179 and
05298), 4 Hour Driver Training (appropriation 05109) and 12 Hour Driver Training (appropriation 05110),
Substitute Teacher Block Grant (appropriation 05113), Athletic Trainer Block Grant (appropriation 05117), Adult
Education and Workforce Training (appropriation 05154), Related Services for Students with Disabilities
(appropriation 05190), Education Salary Supplement Contingency (appropriations 00623 and 08900), and Year
Long Residencies (appropriation 05400) programs within school districts and charter schools shall be appropriated
on a 15 month basis and not be subject to reversion until September 30, 2024 2025. For the fiscal year ending June
30, 2024 2025, any sums in Fiscal Year 2023 2024 World Languages Expansion (appropriation 00231) and Math
Coaches (appropriation 05301) within school districts and charter schools shall be appropriated on a 15 month basis
121

and not be subject to reversion until September 30, 2024 2025. Program expenses may not be incurred subsequent to
the start of the regular 2024-2025 2025-2026 school year.
(c) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in Fiscal Year 2024 Pupil Transportation
(appropriation 05242) and in Fiscal Year 2025 Driver Education (appropriation 05142) within the Department of
Education shall be appropriated on a 15-month basis and not be subject to reversion until September 30, 2024 2025.
Program expenses may not be incurred subsequent to the start of the regular 2024-2025 2025-2026 school year. For
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in the Fiscal Years 2023 and 2024 2025 Pupil Transportation
(appropriation 05242) program, within the Department of Education, shall not be subject to reversion until
December 30, 2024 June 30, 2026.
(d) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in Fiscal Year 2024 2025 Charter School
Operations (appropriation 05213), Charter Transportation Surplus (appropriation 05318), and Charter Exclusions
(appropriation 05313) shall remain as continuing and not be subject to reversion until June 30, 2025 2026.
(e) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums for Fiscal Year 2024 2025 Division II - All
Other Costs (appropriation 05165), Division II - All Other Costs for Vocational Education (appropriation 05265),
Division II - Energy (appropriation 00159), Division III - Equalization (appropriation 05186), Teacher of the Year
(appropriation 05162), World Language (appropriation 00231), Unique Alternatives (appropriation 05181), College
Access (appropriation 00368), Student Success Block Grant Reading (appropriation 05310), Dual Enrollment
(appropriation 05314), Reading Interventions (appropriation 05108), Operations (appropriation 05288), Educational
Support Professional of the Year (appropriation 05402), Mid-Year Unit Count (appropriation 05112), Behavioral
Health Professional of the Year (appropriation 05114), Teacher Recruitment/Retention (appropriation 05115), Math
Coaches (appropriation 05301), Mental Health Services (appropriation 05319), Mental Health Cash Option
(appropriation 05321), School Safety and Security (appropriation 05323), and any sums for Fiscal Year 2024 Filter
First Initiative (appropriation 08940) shall become a continuing appropriation in school districts and charter schools
and not be subject to reversion until June 30, 2025 2026.
(f) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in Fiscal Year 2023 and 2024 and 2025 School
Improvement Funds (appropriation 05244) shall become a continuing appropriation in each local district and charter
school and not be subject to reversion until June 30, 2024 2025. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any
sums in Fiscal Year 2024 2025 Contractual Sub Reimbursement (appropriation 05388), in the Fiscal Year 2022,
Fiscal Year 2023, and Fiscal Year 2024, and Fiscal Year 2025 Redding Consortium/WLC (appropriations 05320 and
122

08945), in Fiscal Year 2023, and Fiscal Year 2024, and Fiscal Year 2025 Wilmington Learning Collaborative
(appropriations 05403, 05404, 05405, 05406, 05407, 05408, 05409, and 05410), and in the Fiscal Year 2022, Fiscal
Year 2023, and Fiscal Year 2024, and Fiscal Year 2025 Opportunity Funding (appropriations 05297 and 05311)
shall become a continuing appropriation in each local district and charter school and not be subject to reversion until
June 30, 2025 2026.
(g) The Department of Transportation shall promulgate and carry out the policies and procedures necessary
to deauthorize any unexpended, unencumbered or unprogrammed operating appropriations remaining at the end of
the fiscal year.
(h) The Department of Transportation shall provide a list of operating appropriations to be continued into
the next fiscal year to include the following: 1) unprogrammed appropriations from prior years and 2)
unencumbered or unprogrammed appropriations from the immediately preceding fiscal year. The list shall be
comprised of the accounting code, fiscal year and program description for each appropriation to be continued. The
department may request additional authority, on a project by project basis, during the fiscal year. Such requests
shall be submitted to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General for approval.
(i) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums in Fiscal Year 2019 and Fiscal Year 2024
Delaware Health Care Claims Database (appropriation 08912) shall remain as continuing and not be subject to
reversion until June 30, 2025 2026. Funds shall be used for the development of the Delaware Health Care Claims
Database established and authorized pursuant to 16 Del. C. c. 103. Notwithstanding any other section of law to the
contrary, the Delaware Health Care Claims Database shall be developed as part of the Delaware Health Information
Network (DHIN), a previously funded initiative through state, federal and private resources. Said funding shall be
subject to DHIN making initial data sets available for the Delaware Health Care Claims Database, the submission of
a total project budget, including non-state resources, to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the
Chief Information Officer of the Department of Technology and Information, the Secretary of the Department of
Health and Social Services and the Controller General and DHIN submitting a written status update to the Governor
and General Assembly to include, but not be limited to, the development of the Delaware Health Care Claims
Database and the anticipated timeline that the database will be fully operational.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the DHIN may seek technical
assistance from the Department of Health and Social Services, in collaboration with the Delaware Health
123

Care Commission, in support of DHIN’s efforts to develop long-term sustainable funding strategies for the
Delaware Health Care Claims Database.
(2) In the calculation of any statewide, regional or local health care cost calculation target or
benchmark program (as defined in House Joint Resolution 7 of the 149th General Assembly), which
program or initiative shall not carry a penalty, the total cost of care calculation, report, study or formulation
shall utilize, to the fullest extent practicable, data obtained from the Delaware Health Care Claims Database
maintained by the DHIN. To the extent that any data used to develop, calculate or otherwise support any
statewide, regional or local health care cost target or benchmark program is not from the Delaware Health
Care Claims Database maintained by the DHIN, such data shall be made publicly available by the Secretary
of the Department of Health and Social Services and disclosed to the Delaware Health Care Commission in
an open meeting, subject to existing legal protections for any confidential or proprietary data.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary the Department of Health and
Social Services may require in support of any statewide, regional or local health care cost calculation target
or benchmark program, the submission of claims data, as defined in 16 Del. C. § 10312, by any health
insurer, as defined in 16 Del. C. § 10312. Such entity shall be treated as a mandatory reporting entity as
defined in 16 Del. C. § 10312 for purposes of submission of claims data pursuant to this section.
124

TOBACCO - MASTER SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT
Section 32. (a) Section 1 of this Act includes $31,086.8 $25,933.8 ASF from funds received as a result of
the Master Settlement Agreement on tobacco funds. These funds are allocated as follows:
(15-01-01) Department of Justice
$ 278.1 2.0 ASF FTEs - legal matters relating to tobacco laws and regulations
(35-01-20) Health and Social Services - Administration
$ 115.0 74.8 DHSS Library
(35-02-01) Health and Social Services - Medicaid and Medical Assistance
$ 750.0 487.5 Medical Assistance Transition (MAT) Program
$ 1,871.6 1,216.5 Delaware Prescription Drug Program
$ 667.0 433.6 Increase Medicaid eligibility for pregnant women/infants to 200 percent of poverty
$ 1,000.0 650.0 Social Determinants of Health
(35-05-10) Health and Social Services - Director’s Office/Support Services
$ 1,500.0 1,200.0 Innovation Fund
$ 5.0 Health Equity
(35-05-20) Health and Social Services - Community Health
$ 3,221.0 2,576.8 New Nurse Development Program at Delaware Technical Community College
$ 1,227.8 Personnel Costs associated with Tobacco Control Programs
$ 585.4 380.5 Uninsured Action Plan
$ 292.2 189.9 Diabetes
$ 214.3 171.4 Delaware State University Nursing Program
$ 500.0 325.0 Healthy Communities Delaware
$ 150.0 Community Mobile Health
This Act makes an appropriation to the Division of Community Health for Tobacco Fund: Contractual Services.
Of that appropriation, funds are allocated as follows:
$ 2,492.9 Tobacco Prevention through Community-Based Organizations
$ 1,040.0 676.0 Nurse Family Partnership
$ 620.4 403.3 Non Public School Nursing
$ 397.7 Women’s Health Screening Program
125

$ 350.0 280.0 Paramedic Instructional Program Expansion
$ 149.5 119.6 Nurse Home Visitors
$ 86.2 Family Planning Program
$ 73.7 Charity Care Program
$ 150.0 Hospice
$ 80.5 64.4 Polytech Adult Education Nursing Program
$ 45.0 Asthma Project
$ 200.0 Health Literacy
$ 169.9 Wellness and Prevention Program
$ 15.0 Aids Delaware
Also appropriated in this Act is $9,516.3 $9,423.5 for Cancer Council Recommendations. Of this amount, $1,000.0
is dedicated to cancer screening and treatment; in addition, funding is included for the following agencies:
$ 265.1 172.3 Cancer Council
$ 147.0 Breast and Cervical Cancer Treatment (35-02-01)
$ 138.6 Cancer Supports and Services
$ 194.8 Oncology Social Work and Psychosocial Care
$ 150.0 Breast Cancer Wellness
(35-05-30) Health and Social Services - Emergency Medical Services
$ 59.9 38.9 Public Access Defibrillation Initiative
(35-06-40) Health and Social Services - Substance Abuse
$ 18.3 University of Delaware - Delaware School Survey Study
$ 250.0 Recovery and Wellness
(35-07-01) Health and Social Services - Social Services
$ 984.0 639.6 SSI Supplement
(35-11-10) Health and Social Services - Administration
$ 575.0 460.0 Autism Supports
(35-11-30) Health and Social Services - Community Services
$ 55.9 36.3 Family Support Services
126

(35-14-01) Health and Social Services - Administration/Community Services
$ 568.5 369.5 Attendant Care
$ 153.2 133.2 Caregivers Support
$ 25.0 Recreation and Respite Care Services
(37-04-20) Services for Children, Youth and Their Families - Prevention/Early Intervention
$ 40.0 Tobacco Prevention Programs for Youth
(45-04-10) Safety and Homeland Security - Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Enforcement
$ 607.5 Enhanced Enforcement and 3.0 ASF FTEs Agent and 1.0 ASF FTE Clerical
All of the above allocations are contained in the specified budget units in Section 1 of this Act including
associated positions and line item funding. The funds herein appropriated shall be disbursed in accordance with the
recommendations of the Delaware Health Fund Advisory Committee as amended by the Joint Finance Committee.
(b) All remaining unallocated funds for the current fiscal year shall be invested by the Cash Management
Policy Board and any interest accrued shall be deposited to the credit of the funds of the Master Settlement
Agreement. All funds from the above allocations left unexpended or unencumbered shall be transferred back to the
Delaware Health Fund.
(c) These funds shall be available for the current fiscal year only.
Section 33. The Delaware Health Fund Advisory Committee is directed to submit their proposed
recommendations each fiscal year to the Governor, General Assembly and Office of Management and Budget no
later than November 15 per Senate Bill 8 as amended by the 140th General Assembly. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that the Delaware Health Fund Advisory Committee will present their proposed recommendations before
the Joint Finance Committee in a public budget hearing.
Section 34. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6082, the fiscal year interest earnings of the
Innovation Fund shall, to the extent of such interest earnings, be used to fund pilot projects to help the state respond
to emerging health trends. The Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services, after consultation with
the Delaware Health Fund Advisory Committee, shall give priority to those projects that address vaping prevention,
social determinants of health, school health, increasing dental access, and reducing obesity and increasing physical
activity throughout an individual’s lifespan. An annual report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance Committee,
the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General by May 1 of each fiscal year
which will include the number of funded projects and related expenditures.
127

LEGISLATIVE
Section 35. Of the total positions authorized in Section 1 of this Act for Legislative, Legislative Council,
Division of Research (01-08-01), the position of Research Assistant to the House and Senate Sunset Standing
Committees shall be an exempt position and shall report to the Director.
Section 36. Section l of this Act provides an appropriation to Legislative, Legislative Council, Office of
the Controller General (0l-08-02) for Contingencies: Legislative Council. Requests from the Chairs of Standing
Legislative Committees for professional staff assistance shall be submitted to the Legislative Council for approval or
disapproval. Approvals for professional staff assistance shall be allowed within the limits of the appropriation and
as provided by guidelines established by the Legislative Council.
Section 37. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Legislative, Legislative Council, Office of
the Controller General (01-08-02) for Contingencies: Legislative Council. Requests from various task forces and
committees of either the House of Representatives or the Senate for travel expenses, meeting expenses, contractual
services and any other expenses shall be submitted to the Legislative Council for consideration.
Section 38. The Controller General shall receive compensation at a rate of a Tier 1 level Cabinet position
as determined by the Compensation Commission. Such compensation may be adjusted by the Legislative Council
as defined in 29 Del. C. § 1110(e).
128

JUDICIAL
Section 39. Upon the approval of a plan submitted to the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget, the Controller General and the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, the Chief Justice shall have the
flexibility to transfer positions from individual courts to the Administrative Office of the Courts (AOC) for the
purpose of further centralizing personnel, finance, collections and filing/records management functions therein.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act or the Delaware Code to the contrary, positions and related
operating funds may be transferred from Supreme Court (02-01-00), Court of Chancery (02-02-00), Superior Court
(02-03-00), Court of Common Pleas (02-06-00), Family Court (02-08-00) and Justice of the Peace Court (02-13-00)
to the Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Services, Office of the State Court Administrator (02-17-01), the
Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Services, Office of State Court Collections Enforcement (02-17-03) or
the Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Services, Information Technology (02-17-04). Only positions from
the courts or other judicial positions located in New Castle County may be considered for transfer under this section.
In the cases where Merit System positions are transferred, the incumbents shall retain their Merit System status.
Section 40. This Act appropriates ASF authority to Judicial, Court of Chancery (02-02-00) and to Judicial,
Court of Common Pleas (02-06-00). Notwithstanding other statutes to the contrary, the Court of Chancery is
authorized to retain a portion of the fees, costs, and interest it will collect in an amount sufficient to cover the
personnel and operating costs of the statewide Register in Chancery office. Notwithstanding other statutes to the
contrary, the Court of Common Pleas is authorized to retain a portion of the fines and fees it will collect in an
amount sufficient to cover the personnel and operating costs of three Judicial Case Processors and one Controller.
Adjustments to ASF spending authority for these courts may be made upon the concurrence and approval of the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 41. The positions of Magistrate in Chancery/Chief Staff Attorney (BP#s 56683, 100226, and
135489, 139662, and 139663), as well as any additional Magistrate in Chancery/Chief Staff Attorney position(s) that
may be established in the future for the Court of Chancery (02-02-10), shall receive the same salary as a
Commissioner of Superior Court. Retired Magistrates may be designated to work on a per diem basis, similar to
retired Commissioners under 10 Del. C. § 513.
Section 42. Section 1 of this Act includes appropriations to Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts -
Non-Judicial Services, Office of the Child Advocate (02-18-05) for Child Attorneys, and Judicial, Administrative
Office of the Courts - Court Services, Office of the State Court Administrator (02-17-01) for Court Appointed
129

Attorneys. Section 1 further includes an appropriation to Judicial, Family Court (02-08-10) for Family Court Civil
Attorneys. The Chief Justice may use said appropriations to recruit and retain contract attorneys under these
programs. The Chief Justice may decide upon, but is not limited to, the following options: implementing new
contract rates, including setting regional or market-based contract rate structures; increasing the number of contracts;
or splitting full-time contracts into part-time contracts. Upon the approval by the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General, the Chief Justice may implement any combination of these or
other reasonable options in an effort to maximize the recruitment and retention of qualified attorneys to serve these
programs.
Section 43. AOC shall coordinate with the Department of Technology and Information (DTI) to develop
electronic document systems projects for the courts, subject to review and approval by the Technology Investment
Council (TIC); provided however, that such review and approval by TIC shall not apply to existing licensing
agreements, contracts or projects related to electronic document systems entered into or approved by AOC on or
prior to June 30, 2006 through the DTI Business Case process with consideration to security and infrastructure
impacts on the State of Delaware and not the technical features of the solution. Notwithstanding 29 Del. C. c. 69, or
any other law to the contrary, AOC is authorized to enter into licensing agreements or other contracts with private
companies or other entities on behalf of the courts for electronic document systems. Such systems shall include:
filing and publication of judicial opinions and related docket files, electronic tracking and researching services, as
well as Internet access for video transmission of court proceedings, video conferencing and other technological
services. Fees derived from such contracts or licensing agreements shall be applied by the respective court for
expenses related to e-filing, video conferencing, video streaming, technological or other improvements and
operational costs.
Section 44. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts -
Non-Judicial Services, Delaware Nursing Home Residents Quality Assurance Commission (02-18-07) to fund 2.0
FTEs and associated operating costs. These positions, including any casual/seasonal positions, shall report to the
commission.
Section 45. (a) Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 1.0 ASF FTE Management Analyst III
(BP# 114608) in Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts - Non-Judicial Services, Office of the Public
Guardian (02-18-01) for the Guardianship Monitoring program. The Court of Chancery (02-02-10) shall transfer
ASF cash for this position to the Office of the Public Guardian annually.
130

(b) Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 1.0 ASF FTE, former Chief of Court Security
position (BP# 88980) in the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, Capitol Police (45-02-10) for a Capitol
Police Officer in the Court of Chancery Sussex County facility. The Court of Chancery (02-02-10) shall transfer
ASF cash for this position to the Department of Safety and Homeland Security annually.
Section 46. The Contractual Child Attorney that was allocated in Fiscal Year 2012 shall be utilized for
both Kent County and Sussex County, or other arrangements to meet the needs in both counties shall be made.
Section 47. (a) Section 1 of this Act authorizes Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts - Court
Services, Office of the State Court Administrator (02-17-01) to maintain an ASF account with the State Treasurer.
Revenue generated from court fees and costs associated with court rules shall be deposited into this account, until
the balance of the account is equal to $1,200.0. From that point forward, unless otherwise designated, all revenue
generated from court fees and costs associated with court rules shall be deposited into the General Fund. By May 15
of each fiscal year, the Judiciary shall submit a plan, subject to the approval of the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General, detailing the planned expenditures for the Judiciary and the
Office of Defense Services of said $1,200.0 for the upcoming fiscal year.
(b) In the event that such collections exceed the expenditure authority in this act, the ASF authority may be
amended by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. Revenue generated
that exceeds the revised authority shall be deposited to the General Fund.
Section 48. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $1,650.0 $2,450.0 in Right to
Representation to Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts – Court Services, Office of the State Court
Administrator (02-17-01). Notwithstanding any provision of 29 Del. C. c. 69, rules, or legislation to the contrary,
this appropriation shall be provided to the Right to Representation Coordinator (“Coordinator”) from the State Court
Administrator (“Administrator”). The Administrator or the Attorney General does not need to designate or contract
with any organization(s) that will carry out the services required under 25 Del. C. c. 56. The Coordinator shall be
responsible for determining how tenants are referred to other organizations that provide services under the
aforementioned Chapter. In addition to the annual reporting requirements outlined in 25 Del. C. § 5605, the
Coordinator shall make a final accounting annually of all expenditures related to the services provided under 25 Del.
C. c. 56, including those expenditures of other organizations that may provide services utilizing funding from the
Right to Representation appropriation.
131

EXECUTIVE
Section 49. Section 1 of this Act authorizes 1.0 FTE, Administrative Management (BP# 65750), within the
Office of the Governor (10-01-01). This position shall coordinate and facilitate services for Delaware veterans,
including representing the state in concert with other states’ veteran agencies and the U.S. Veterans’ Administration;
assist in the oversight of the Delaware State Veterans Home; and pursuing and maximizing federal funding
opportunities, leveraging existing state funds, and reporting such opportunities to the Governor, the Secretary of
State, the Delaware Commission of Veterans Affairs, and the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee. Preference
in hiring for this position shall be given to a veteran qualified by training and experience to perform the
abovementioned duties.
Section 50. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $150.0 in Local Law Enforcement Education to Executive,
Office of Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for educational reimbursement
as provided for in subsection (a).
(a) A certified police officer or other law enforcement officer as defined in 11 Del. C. § 1911(a) or a State
of Delaware Probation and Parole Officer employed by the Department of Correction who is employed full-time in
the State is eligible for post-secondary education tuition reimbursement under the following conditions:
(1) The officer must apply for tuition reimbursement in accordance with rules and regulations
promulgated by the Director of the Criminal Justice Council or the Director's designee.
(2) Education benefits authorized by this section may be used only at a college or university within
the State.
(3) An officer may not attend a class or course of instruction during scheduled work hours unless
the officer uses his or her earned leave or earned compensatory time.
(4) An officer may be reimbursed under this program for only two classes or courses of instruction
for undergraduate study or one class or course for graduate study each grading period. The
classes will be reimbursed at 100 percent of the tuition paid following the completion of the
course with a grade of “C” or better at a college or university within the State for classes related
to Corrections, Public Safety, Criminal Justice, Computer Science, Psychology, Sociology,
Education and related fields. Related fields shall include any courses necessary to complete a
degree program in Criminal Justice, Corrections, Public Safety, Computer Science, Psychology,
Sociology or Education.
132

(5) A class or course of instruction taken under this section must:
(i) Improve an officer's competence and capacity in employment;
(ii) Have direct value to the State; and
(iii) Provide knowledge or skills that are not available through in-service or other professional
training.
(6) In order to receive tuition reimbursement for a post-secondary class or course of instruction
authorized by this section, an officer must:
(i) Earn a grade no lower than a 2.0 on a 4.0 scale, or its equivalent, for each class or course
of instruction for which the tuition reimbursement is granted. In any class or course of
instruction for which a specific grade is not issued, the officer must show documentation
to verify satisfactory completion; and
(ii) Submit to the Director of the Criminal Justice Council or the Director's designee within
30 days after completing a class or course of instruction proof of:
(1) Course title and grade received;
(2) Amount of tuition paid for the course; and
(3) Name of the post-secondary institution where the course was taken.
(7) The Director of the Criminal Justice Council or the designee shall adopt rules and regulations as
deemed necessary and proper for the efficient administration of this section. The rules and
regulations must contain appeal procedures.
(8) An officer who receives tuition reimbursement pursuant to this section but is terminated from
law enforcement employment for cause, or who otherwise fails to comply with any requirement
of this section, shall immediately become ineligible to receive education benefits pursuant to
this section and shall repay all tuition reimbursement previously extended to the employee,
including interest on a pro rata basis from the time of termination or noncompliance. The
Director of the Criminal Justice Council or the Director's designee shall determine the amount
of repayment due by the employee pursuant to this subsection. If law enforcement employment
is terminated for other than just cause, the officer will not be required to repay previously
reimbursed tuition.
133

(9) Nothing in this section is intended to inhibit or deny officer promotion or transfer to other law
enforcement agencies within this State.
(10) The Director of the Criminal Justice Council shall include in the agency's annual report:
(i) The number of officers who participated at each post-secondary educational institution
during the year;
(ii) The total amount of tuition expenditures made pursuant to this section during the year, not
to exceed $150.0; and
(iii) The total amount required to be repaid to the State by defaulting officers during the year;
and the total amount actually repaid by defaulting officers during the year transferred via
Intergovernmental Voucher.
Section 51. Effective July 1, 2006, BP# 879 shall receive compensation at a rate of a Tier 1 level Cabinet
position as determined by the Compensation Committee.
Section 52. (a) Notwithstanding 29 Del. C. c. 69 or any other statutory provision to the contrary, state
agencies are permitted, within the limits of funding provided to support research and education efforts, to enter into
agreements directly with the University of Delaware, Delaware State University and Delaware Technical
Community College. This authorization is limited to conducting basic or applied research; transferring knowledge
regarding scientific and technological advancements; providing practical training to the state and local governments
in the application of science or technology; and healthcare professionals education/training, and encourages these
departments to consider these three institutions as the resource of first resort in meeting any of their research and/or
educational needs.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, the Office of
Management and Budget and the Office of the Controller General is state agencies are authorized to contract with
the University of Delaware and/or Delaware State University for statistical analysis of data for state operated
programs, services, policies and/or procedures. The University of Delaware and/or Delaware State University may
not charge an overhead or administrative fee in excess of 10 percent to the state in relation to these contracts
established under this subsection.
Section 53. The General Assembly finds that the establishment of the federal Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) block grant has left the State vulnerable to deficits from caseload increases attributable to
an economic downturn. In order to minimize such exposure, the funds within the Reserve Account for Children
134

Services Cost Recovery Project (CSCRP) Disallowances (10-02-10-20268) shall be available to mitigate, to the
extent possible, projected deficits in TANF supported programs within the Department of Health and Social
Services. The use of such funds for such purposes shall require the approval of the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 54. The amount appropriated to Executive, Office of Management and Budget, Contingencies and
One-Time Items (10-02-11), Prior Years' Obligations shall be used to pay Personnel Costs and other obligations
except coding errors by a school district, which require adjustment of the State's accounts. Except for Personnel
Costs obligations, any use of the Prior Years' Obligations appropriation by any agency receiving funds in Section 1
of this Act, in excess of the amount reverted from the applicable appropriation within the requesting agency’s
internal program unit on June 30 of the fiscal year in which the expense was incurred, will require the requesting
agency or school district to reimburse the Prior Years' Obligations appropriation by the amount equal to the excess
requested. An appropriation reversion sum does not negate the necessity of encumbering sufficient funds to cover
known expenses; proof of circumstances beyond an agency's ability to encumber must be documented on the request
for transfer to be excluded from the reimbursement clause. Except for Personnel Costs obligations, all requests for
prior year funds to complete the payment of one-time items will require a reimbursement to the Prior Years'
Obligations appropriation by the requesting agency from any appropriation other than Personnel Costs. The
reimbursement shall be removed from the current fiscal year's budget. The reimbursement clause shall not apply to
legal judgments against the agency or school district. A reimbursement under this section shall not be deemed to be
prohibited by 10 Del. C. § 8111.
Section 55. (a) For the current fiscal year, 29 Del. C. § 6529 is interpreted to include the ability to
implement a hiring review process. All state agencies with the exception of Legislative, Judicial, Higher Education
and school districts shall be subject to the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6529 as interpreted by this section.
Implementation of a hiring review process shall require all positions to be reviewed and approved by the Secretary
of the Department of Human Resources and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget prior to filling.
All non-cabinet agency hiring requests shall also require the review and approval of the Controller General prior to
filling.
(b) In the event the authority granted in subsection (a) of this section is implemented, Chapters 3.0 and
13.0 of the Merit Rules notwithstanding, the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources and the Director of
the Office of Management and Budget shall have the authority to extend temporary promotions based on agency
135

need until the hiring review process has ended. At the time the hiring review process has ended, those temporary
promotions granted during the hiring review process shall be subject to the limitations identified in the Merit Rules
governing the duration of temporary promotions.
Section 56. For the current fiscal year, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, pursuant to
29 Del. C. § 6529, in conjunction with the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, may implement an
overtime management practices review process for all state agencies with the exception of Legislative, Judicial,
Higher Education and school districts. Said review shall include, but not be limited to, operational guidelines,
guidelines to prohibit excessive utilization, staffing ratios and standard work week schedules for employees. The
Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall report to the Governor and the Co-Chairs of the Joint
Finance Committee no later than May 1 of each fiscal year on the status of any review process implemented
pursuant to this section.
Section 57. The appropriation in Section 1 of this Act to Executive, Office of Management and Budget,
Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for Appropriated Special Funds for $55,000.0 $91,000.0 ASF shall
be used to make adjustments in the amount of state special fund appropriations in the event additional state special
funds are received which were not previously anticipated. Such adjustments shall be made in accordance with the
approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 58. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, for the purposes of developing, implementing,
upgrading, and modernizing the State’s Enterprise Resource Programs Planning Systems – PHRST, Time & Labor
Attendance, and other PeopleSoft modules, and related systems, necessary adjustments to existing state human
resource, benefits, and payroll, and related procedures, as well as fiscal and budget procedures shall be implemented
during the current fiscal year with the written approval of the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources and the
Controller General.
All state organizations shall use all components of the PHRST system if so designated by the State’s
Enterprise Resource Planning Executive Sponsors.
Section 59. Whenever the annual valuation of the market value of the assets of the Special Pension Fund
exceeds the actuarial value of benefits available to persons entitled to receive special pensions by a factor of at least
20 percent, the Board of Pension Trustees may transfer the excess over 20 percent or any part of it to the State
Employees Pension Fund for the benefit of that fund.
136

Section 60. The Board of Pension Trustees may allocate the pension/health insurance monies received
from the State during any month to ensure that funds are available to pay health insurance premiums for retirees in
each month and pension benefits as defined in 29 Del. C. § 8308(c)(14).
Section 61. During the fiscal year, the Office of Management and Budget, Facilities Management (10-02-
50) shall retain rental fees as ASF authority. The retained portion must be deposited as per state laws and shall be
disbursed per Section 1 of this Act.
Section 62. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 5117, state agencies may pay for employee
parking in the Government Center Parking Garage as long as such payments are continuances of payments made
prior to May 31, 1998. Such payments shall cease when the employee leaves the position he or she occupied prior to
May 31, 1998.
Section 63. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $374.0 in Technology to Executive, Office of Management
and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). These funds are to be used for the purpose of providing
ongoing replacement needs associated with statewide IT initiatives and/or wireless Internet connectivity in state
facilities (e.g., replacement of computers and network switches).
Section 64. For the current fiscal year, 29 Del. C. § 6529 is interpreted to include the ability to deposit
Special Funds into the General Fund as a measure to control expenditures but not with regard to funds raised by
local school districts. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall notify the Co-Chairs of the Joint
Finance Committee and the Controller General as to the deposit of these Special Funds into the General Fund.
Section 65. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Delaware National Guard (76-01-01) for
Educational Assistance. The General Assembly finds that the Delaware National Guard Educational Assistance
appropriation may not be sufficient during periods of heightened educational reimbursement requests from Delaware
National Guard members. In order to address such demands, the funds within the Office of Management and
Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11), shall be available to mitigate, to the extent possible,
projected deficits in the Delaware National Guard Educational Assistance. The use of funds for such purposes shall
require the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 66. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Law or this Act to the contrary, pursuant
to federal rules and regulations promulgated by the U.S. Department of the Treasury, all Coronavirus Relief Fund
and American Rescue Plan, Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery Fund, and Infrastructure Investment and
Jobs Act records and expenditures are subject to a review or audit conducted by the U.S. Department of Treasury’s
137

Inspector General, the State Auditor’s Office or designee. Any misrepresentation, misuse, or mishandling of these
funds may be subject to claw-back and other appropriate measures, including the possible reduction or withholding
of other State funds.
Section 67. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget has the authority to establish up to 61.0
FTEs for the implementation and enforcement efforts associated with Senate Substitute 2 for Senate Bill 1 of the
151st General Assembly.
Section 68. Section 1 of this Act includes appropriations for Elder Tax Relief and Education Expense
Fund and Veterans Tax Relief Education Expense Fund in the Office of Management and Budget, Contingencies
and One-Time Items (10-02-11). Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act or the Delaware Code to the
contrary, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General may transfer funds
between these appropriations on an as-needed basis.
Section 69. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funding in the Executive, Office of Management and
Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for DE Demographic Studies. Annual public school
enrollment projections and other demographic studies will be completed at the direction of the Director of the Office
of Management and Budget.
Section 70. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funding for 1.0 FTE Exempt Administrative Specialist III in
Executive, Criminal Justice, Criminal Justice Council (10-07-01) to be used as dedicated secretarial support for the
Executive Director of the Domestic Violence Coordinating Council. This position shall be an exempt position and
shall be excluded from classified service as defined under 29 Del. C. § 5903.
Section 71. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funding for personnel costs and 2.0 FTEs to Executive,
Criminal Justice, Criminal Justice Council (10-07-01) for the Board of Parole. While the Criminal Justice Council
shall provide administrative support and fiscal oversight, the Board of Parole shall otherwise operate independently
of the Criminal Justice Council. The Criminal Justice Council shall develop reporting requirements for the Board of
Parole; reports shall be submitted by the Board of Parole to the Criminal Justice Council, the Office of Management
and Budget and the Office of the Controller General.
Section 72. (a) The Delaware State Housing Authority (10-08-01) shall be responsible for administering
the Neighborhood Assistance Tax Credit as defined in 30 Del. C. § 2001-2007. The Neighborhood Assistance Tax
Credit Program is intended to foster business investment in low-income communities through financial support to
neighborhoods as well as job training, education, crime prevention and community services.
138

(b) The Delaware State Housing Authority shall submit an annual report to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General by May 1 of each fiscal year, which will include but not be
limited to a synopsis of the tax credit program, a detailed list of expenditures and a list of projects that have received
tax credit awards.
Section 73. The Delaware State Rental Assistance Program shall be administered by the Delaware State
Housing Authority to provide rental housing vouchers or affordable rental housing opportunities to program
participants referred by state or federal agencies with a need for community-based supportive services. The Director
of the Delaware State Housing Authority shall report to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and
the Controller General no later than November 15 and March 15 on the expenditures of the Delaware State Rental
Assistance Program and include any cost savings achieved by state agencies as a result of a reduction in demand on
state institutions.
139

TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION
Section 74. The Chief Information Officer shall not make any changes to the department’s compensation
plan regarding any aspect of employee compensation without the approval of the Secretary of the Department of
Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. Further,
sufficient funding within the department must be available for any change to be approved.
Section 75. The state government of Delaware recognizes the inherent value in implementing common
technology standards. In an effort to establish a single, common electronic messaging platform throughout the State,
no state agency shall migrate, change or switch to an alternative network or messaging platform without the express
written consent of the Chief Information Officer, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General. Any agency seeking exemption from this requirement must submit a request to the Chief
Information Officer clearly stating the reasons why migrating to an alternative platform is necessary.
Section 76. (a) The Department of Technology and Information (11-00-00) shall receive a lump sum
amount which shall be the product of the general salary increase in Section 8 of this Act and Personnel Costs lines
less non-salary driven Other Employment Cost components. Overtime and casual/seasonal components of the
Personnel Costs line shall not be part of the calculation. The resultant lump sum amount may be distributed to
employees as determined by the Chief Information Officer. However, in no case shall individually awarded
increases exceed 10 percent of an individual’s base salary, nor shall the aggregate amount awarded exceed the
product of the calculation as described above. Further, in no case shall individually awarded amounts be given
retroactively.
(b) Adjustments to the Department of Technology and Information pay scale will not be made during the
fiscal year without the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the Controller General and
the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources.
(c) As part of agency IT consolidation requiring the redistribution and assignment of agency personnel to
support centralized IT services within the Department of Technology and Information, employees in Merit positions
that transfer to the department will have the option to remain in a merit status or, within 60 days of transfer, may
request to be reclassified to a non-merit status. For purposes of this section, the Department may request to
reclassify incumbents choosing a non-merit status within their current budgeted position. Vacant merit positions
will be reclassified to non-merit positions with the approval of the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. Personnel funding for
140

General Fund merit positions will transfer to DTI and agencies will be charged the personnel cost for special funded
positions.
Section 77. The Department of Technology and Information shall provide the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General a complete accounting of all direct and indirect charges to state
agencies and total revenue derived for the prior fiscal year by September 15. No direct or indirect rates may be
increased, nor may additional charges be levied on a state agency without prior approval by the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 78. Notwithstanding any provisions of the Delaware Code to the contrary, the Delaware
Department of Technology and Information is hereby prohibited from accessing or providing a legislator’s e-mails,
other electronic communications, or phone calls upon the request of another state department or agency, or branch of
state government, except pursuant to the consent of the legislator, an Attorney General subpoena or a search warrant
or other court order.
141

OTHER ELECTIVE
Section 79. For the purpose of the audits contracted by the Auditor of Accounts, agencies will be
responsible for the cost of the audit written into the signed contract, if the agency was consulted and agreed to the
costs prior to the contract being signed. Any overages billed by the contracted audit will be the responsibility of the
Auditor of Accounts office unless the agency was made aware of the additional time needed for the audit and
approved the time and the additional costs.
Section 80. The Auditor of Accounts shall provide an annual plan demonstrating current ASF revenue
generation and additional ASF revenue opportunities to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General. Upon receipt and review of the plan, it is the
intent of the General Assembly to ensure funding is provided to support adequate staffing levels within the Office of
the Auditor of Accounts.
Section 81. The Department of Insurance is authorized to borrow from other special fund balances within
the Department to address deficits in the Regulatory Revolving Fund as they may occur during the fiscal year,
provided, however, that said funds must be reimbursed prior to the end of the fiscal year.
Section 82. (a) Section 1 of this Act provides $5,032.9 $5,179.6 ASF to Other Elective, State Treasurer,
Operations and Fund Management (12-05-02), Cash Management Policy Board, authorized by 29 Del. C. c. 27, for
the purpose of providing staff support and operational expenses, including payment of fees for banking services. The
$5,032.9 $5,179.6 in interest income on bank deposits shall be coded as special fund revenue to provide funds for
operation of the Cash Management Policy Board.
(b) The State Treasurer is not otherwise authorized to retain banking and/or investment services without
the consent of the Cash Management Policy Board, and funds under the custody of the State Treasurer shall be
invested consistent with Cash Management Policy Board guidelines pursuant to 29 Del. C. c. 27.
Section 83. The Office of the State Treasurer shall develop a rate for the purpose of recovering costs
associated with the State’s acceptance of funds through the use of credit, debit and purchasing cards. Cost
recoverable activities shall include online transactions as well as traditional card transactions. The initial rate and
periodic necessary adjustments to the rate shall be approved by the Office of Management and Budget. The Office
of the State Treasurer may initiate an automated revenue reduction process, equal to the approved rate, for all cash
receipts received by the aforementioned methods. The Office of the State Treasurer shall provide the agency with a
statement of total revenue or payment, less transaction costs and net revenue. In lieu of an automated revenue
142

reduction process, the Office of the State Treasurer may invoice a state agency for necessary reimbursement. The
use of these recovered funds shall be for the sole purpose of payment of Merchant Services fees.
Section 84. The Office of the State Treasurer, with the assistance of the Department of Technology and
Information and the Delaware Government Information Center, where appropriate, shall evaluate and approve the
payment component of all new web-based technology initiatives involving the electronic remittance of funds to the
State. Specifically, those projects promoting the use of online credit card payment, online debit card payment,
Automated Clearing House payments, “e-checks” and other forms of electronic funds transfer shall be subject to this
joint review and approval process. For those agencies that already use online credit card payment, online debit card
payment, Automated Clearing House payment, “e-check” or other forms of electronic funds transfer, those agencies
shall be exempt from this requirement unless and until such time as their current electronic payment component
must undergo any type of upgrade or the contract is due to expire, at which point the agency shall investigate the
feasibility of implementing the State’s designated payment component. A standard evaluation form will be designed
by the Office of the State Treasurer with the assistance of the Department of Technology and Information and the
Government Information Center, where appropriate, and approved by the Office of Management and Budget.
Section 85. The Plans Management Board and the Office of the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the
Department of Health and Social Services, the Office of Management and Budget and the Office of the Controller
General, shall explore funding sources to cover the administrative cost of the Achieving a Better Life Experience
(ABLE) program established pursuant to 16 Del. C. § 96A.
Section 86. Section 1 of this Act includes 1.0 ASF FTE and associated costs to Other Elective, State
Treasurer, Reconciliation and Transaction Management (12-05-06) for the Expanding Access for Retirement and
Necessary Saving (EARNS) Program authorized by 19 Del. C. c. 38, for the purpose of providing a state
administered retirement savings program for small businesses.
143

LEGAL
Section 87. The Department of Justice shall submit a semi-annual report to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and Controller General that details the number of Deputy Attorney General FTEs, the
source of their funding and the divisions to which they are assigned. These reports are due on November 30 and
May 15 of each fiscal year.
Section 88. Section 1 of this Act appropriates Personnel Costs and 17.0 split-funded FTEs (66 percent
ASF and 34 percent GF) to Legal, Department of Justice (15-01-01) to support the Child Support Services function.
The Child Support Services function in the Department of Justice will operate on a reimbursement basis, wherein
the State makes the initial expenditures and is reimbursed from federal funds controlled by the Department of Health
and Social Services. The reimbursement rate for operations will be 66 percent of total direct costs; the
reimbursement rate for indirect costs will be 40.75 24.22 percent of federal dollars spent on direct salary costs.
Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6404(h)(1) and (2), the Department of Justice shall be
allowed to retain the federal reimbursement of direct costs in an ASF account to pay the ASF share of operating
expenses associated with the Child Support Services function.
The Department of Justice shall also be allowed to retain up to a maximum of $30.0 of the departmental
portion of indirect cost recoveries for this function to support the agency's overhead and $16.3 to be applied to the
State's share for four clerical positions. The statewide portion of indirect cost recoveries will be deposited into the
indirect cost account in the Office of Management and Budget. The remainder of the indirect cost recoveries and any
unused portion of indirect cost funds in the Department of Justice will be deposited into a separate account and
retained to support the General Fund portion of the budget for this function in subsequent years.
Adjustments to ASF spending authority for the Department of Justice may be made upon the concurrence
and approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 89. Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 1.0 ASF FTE Legal Administrative
Specialist II (BP# 8131) in Legal, Department of Justice (15-01-01). In order to provide funding for this position, the
Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control (40-00-00) shall allocate monies to the Department of
Justice by July 15 of each fiscal year.
Section 90. Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs in Consumer Protection and 3.0 ASF FTEs in
Legal, Department of Justice (15-01-01) for activities associated with the regulation of credit counseling and debt
management companies as authorized in 6 Del. C. c. 24A, the Delaware Uniform Debt-Management Services Act.
144

Section 91. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds for the Victim Compensation Assistance Program in
Legal, Department of Justice (15-01-01). The Department of Justice shall provide semi-annual reports regarding the
Victim Compensation Assistance Program to the Office of Management and Budget and the Office of the Controller
General by July 31 and January 31 of each fiscal year. The report shall include financial updates for the Victim
Compensation Assistance Program, including federal and state expenditures, revenues and balances.
Section 92. Section 1 of this Act includes 1.0 FTE Deputy Attorney General and associated funding in
Legal, Department of Justice (15-01-01) for the Criminal Division to prosecute cases involving special victim’s unit
in either Sussex and/or Kent Counties and must be used exclusively in the Special Victim’s Unit.
Section 93. Effective January 3, 2019 no person holding one of the following positions shall retain tenure
pursuant to 29 Del. C. § 2511 while serving in that position unless, prior to immediately occupying the position,
said person had been regularly employed on a full-time basis by the Department of Justice for at least 18 months:
BP# 9386, BP# 1265, BP# 100275, BP# 6722, BP# 67521, BP# 6260 and BP# 6705. Any employee who has
already attained tenure prior to the effective date shall not be affected by this section.
Section 94. Section 1 of this Act includes an appropriation to Legal, Office of Defense Services, Office of
Conflicts Counsel (15-02-03) for the Office of Conflicts Counsel. The Office of Defense Services, per the Chief
Defender, may use such appropriation to recruit and retain contract attorneys in the Office of Conflicts Counsel.
The Chief Defender and the Chief of the Office of Conflicts Counsel, Assistant Public Defender V/Chief Conflicts
Counsel (BP# 85743), may decide upon, but are not limited to, the following options: implementing new contract
rates, including setting regional or market-based contract rate structures; increasing the number of contracts; and/or
splitting full-time contracts into part-time contracts. Upon the approval by the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General, the Chief Defender may implement any combination of these
or other reasonable options in an effort to maximize the recruitment and retention of qualified attorneys to serve the
Office of Conflicts Counsel.
145

HUMAN RESOURCES
Section 95. The Secretary of the Department of Human Resources is authorized to create a State of
Delaware Merit Employee Mediation Program within state agencies selected by the Secretary and, notwithstanding
Chapters 12.0 and 18.0 of the Merit Rules and/or any provision of Delaware Code to the contrary, the Secretary of
the Department of Human Resources is further authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the said
program. Matters that may be grieved shall be eligible for mediation. Matters that are otherwise not subject to the
Merit grievance procedure may be eligible for the Mediation Program. With the consent of the employee and
employing agency, participation in the Mediation Program will be offered as a voluntary alternative to the ordinary
grievance procedure. All mediation proceedings shall be deemed confidential. If a grievance is subjected to
mediation pursuant to this section, normal timelines associated with the filing of a grievance shall be tolled pending
the completion of mediation. If an employee has filed a formal grievance, subsequent mutual consent to mediation
will cause the grievance to be held in abeyance pending completion of mediation and the timelines that would
otherwise have applied to the grievance shall likewise be tolled pending completion of mediation. Upon completion
of mediation, an employee may continue to grieve and the normal timelines provided for grievances shall then
apply. The Mediation Program is not intended to limit other dispute resolution procedures available to an agency or
an employee or to deny a person a right granted under federal or other state law, including the right to an
administrative or judicial hearing.
Section 96. The Secretary of the Department of Human Resources shall continue to assume the central
leadership role for the Executive branch over all matters relating to personnel and labor relations affecting the
Executive branch and its departments and agencies, including collective bargaining negotiations with employee
organizations, labor arbitration, Public Employment Relations Board, Department of Labor, Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission and other administrative proceedings. The Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources shall also, on behalf of the State, approve and sign all collective bargaining agreements and any other
agreements or arrangements made involving employee organizations that represent employees subject to Executive
branch authority.
Section 97. Any other statutory provision notwithstanding, any change to the Merit Rules required by an
Act of the Legislature shall be codified in the Merit Rules by the Department of Human Resources.
Section 98. The Secretary of the Department of Human Resources in conjunction with agencies is
authorized to develop pilot talent acquisition and retention initiative programs for hard to fill positions. The criteria
146

to define and identify hard to fill positions shall be developed by the Department of Human Resources.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, such programs shall be approved by the Secretary of the
Department of Human Resources, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Agencies approved for a talent acquisition or retention program must have resources available to fund such
initiatives. Approvals granted will be through the remainder of the fiscal year in which approved. Justification to
support continuation of programs through the next fiscal year shall be submitted to the Department of Human
Resources no later than May 1. Such justification shall include, but not be limited to, baseline data, new initiatives,
results from new initiatives, i.e. increased applicant pool, etc.
Section 99. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $25.0 in GEAR Award to Department of Human Resources,
Division of Training and Human Resource Solutions (16-07-01). Notwithstanding 29 Del. C. c. 59 or any other
provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, the Department of Human Resources is further
authorized to establish the GEAR Public-Private (P3) Innovation and Efficiency Award (GEAR Award) in
conjunction with the existing Governor’s Team Excellence Award program managed by the Department of Human
Resources. The GEAR Award recognizes and incentivizes individuals or groups of State employees who can
demonstrate successful implementations of innovative, continuous improvement projects with verifiable and
sustainable results in process and/or service quality, speed or cost savings. Those selected for the award will serve
as models that promote interest and awareness in State government continuous improvement activities, encourage
information sharing and demonstrate the advantage of leveraging successful strategies to other organizations.
Awardees will receive GEAR Award funds as a one-time supplemental bonus as part of their compensation. The
State appropriates funds to cover 50 percent of the base award plus associated other employment costs with the
remaining 50 percent of the base award to be matched by contributions from non-State entities. The GEAR Award,
including award criteria, and funds for this award shall be administered by the Department of Human Resources in
partnership with the GEAR Board, or team selected by the GEAR Board.
147

STATE
Section 100. (a) Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 2.0 FTEs (BP# 65750 and 927), and
$180.0 for International Trade of Delaware in the Department of State, Office of the Secretary, Administration (20-
01-01). The employees will remain exempt from classified service in accordance with 29 Del. C. § 5903 and will
retain current compensation levels in addition to enacted salary policy.
(b) The International Development Group shall be the primary entity for the State related to all
international trade matters including: export and import assistance to Delaware residents and businesses;
international trade missions; and coordination with other state agencies, departments, international organizations,
international commissions and councils.
(c) The International Development Group shall be designated as the primary contact for the State
regarding all international trade matters with the business community; U.S. federal agencies; regional, national and
international organizations; foreign governments; and other domestic and international trade organizations
worldwide.
(d) The International Development Group shall be responsible to host, arrange and coordinate the schedule
for international trade delegations and foreign government officials visiting the State.
Section 101. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of State, Delaware Public
Archives (20-03-01) for the Delaware Heritage Commission. Of that amount, $7.0 shall be used at the discretion of
the Delaware Heritage Commission for scholar awards, challenge grants and publications.
Section 102. Section 1 of this Act appropriates ASF authority in the line item Historical Marker
Maintenance to the Department of State, Delaware Public Archives (20-03-01) for replacement, repair and
refurbishing of historical markers.
Section 103. Section 1 of this Act appropriates ASF authority for Technology Infrastructure Fund in the
Department of State, Corporations (20-05-01). All revenues derived as a result of 8 Del. C. § 391(h)(1), 6 Del. C. §
15-1207(b)(1), 6 Del. C. § 17-1107(b)(1), 6 Del. C. § 18-1105(b)(1) and 12 Del. C § 3813(b)(1) will be deposited
into this fund to be used for technological and infrastructure enhancements, ongoing maintenance, operational
expenses for Corporations, additional technology projects in the Department of State including projects that support
the operations of the Delaware Veterans Home, electronic government information projects and library technology
initiatives including grants to ensure a three-year replacement cycle for hardware, software and peripherals used to
support public access computing and other statewide and local library services. Of the amount appropriated to the
148

Technology Infrastructure Fund, $25.0 will be used for the operation of the Newsline Service as provided by the
Department of Health and Social Services, Visually Impaired, Visually Impaired Services (35-08-01). Quarterly
reports regarding the status of this fund shall be made by the Department of State to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 104. The Delaware Heritage Commission shall explore the feasibility of the publication of out of
print and new books and writings on Delaware History. Further, the Delaware Heritage Commission shall
investigate which writings in these categories would be valuable for republication. A report shall be made to the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General and by December 1 of each fiscal
year.
Section 105. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of State, Libraries (20-08-01) for
Library Standards. Of that amount, Libraries may reserve up to 10 percent for planning and evaluation grants to
determine each library’s attainment of state and federal library standards. The remaining funds shall be paid to
libraries in two installments equal to 50 percent of the total amount allocated to that library, one installment upon
signature of the contract and the second installment in January of the fiscal year. Funds granted to any library under
the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 66, if unspent at the end of the fiscal year, shall not revert to the General Fund, but
instead shall be held in an account for the benefit of the library from which the unspent funds came. These funds
may be spent in subsequent years for purposes described in 29 Del. C. c. 66. The use of such carryover funds shall
not be used as part of any subsequent years' formula payment.
Section 106. The Department of State shall establish the shift differential for Licensed Practical Nurses
employed at the Delaware Veterans Home at 10 percent for 3-11 shifts on weekdays and 7-3 shifts on weekends.
The shift differential shall be established at 15 percent for 11-7 shifts on weekdays and 3-11 shifts on weekends.
The shift differential for the 11-7 weekend shifts shall be established at 20 percent. To the extent or where an
employee is covered by a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to 19 Del. C. § 1311A, the terms and conditions
of said agreement shall apply.
Section 107. Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Delaware Code, the Department of State shall
have the authority to fill vacant positions at the Delaware Veterans Home with qualified applicants for the Certified
Nursing Assistant, Activity Therapist, Licensed Practical Nurse, Registered Nurse and Dentist classifications by
agency recruitment efforts unless an eligibility list is required by federal law for that position.
149

Section 108. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6102(a) and 5 Del. C. § 1106, the Office of
the State Banking Commissioner is authorized to retain $150.0 of the Bank Franchise Tax for costs associated with
the collection and administration of the Bank Franchise Tax. Also, an additional $75.0 of the Bank Franchise Tax
shall be used for costs associated with consumer education and information programs with approval of final
allocations by the Controller General.
Section 109. Notwithstanding 5 Del. C. § 105(e) or the provision in the fourth sentence of 5 Del. C. §
127(b), the minimum supervisory assessment to any institution, regardless of whether the examination is or may be
conducted within the state or outside the State, shall be waived for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
Section 110. The Delaware Economic Development Authority (20-10-01) will continue to use revenue
from the Blue Collar Training Fund for the Workforce Development Grant. Funding for this grant shall be
maintained at current levels. The Delaware Economic Development Authority is also authorized to use revenue
from the Blue Collar Training Fund to provide required State funds to match federal funding received by the
Delaware Manufacturing Extension Partnership.
Section 111. Section 1 of this Act appropriates ASF authority to Department of State, Division of Small
Business, Delaware Tourism Office (20-10-02) for Tourism Marketing, and National High School Wrestling
Tournament. These funds shall be payable by the Delaware Tourism Office in annual allotments.
Section 112. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the fiscal year interest earnings of the
Delaware Strategic Fund as provided for in 29 Del. C. § 8727A shall, to the extent of such interest earnings, be used
in the following order and manner, not to exceed the amounts so noted:
(a) The first $320.9 shall be used for the general operating expenses of the Division of Small Business.
Should interest earnings not be available by September 1, funding shall be made available directly from the
Delaware Strategic Fund.
(b) The next $400.0 shall be used for the general operating expenses of the Small Business Development
Center. Should interest earnings not be available by December 31 the center shall receive funding directly from the
Delaware Strategic Fund for said expenses and shall waive further interest earnings for that period.
(c) The next $300.0 shall be used to continue the Delaware Business Marketing Program within the
Delaware Economic Development Authority (20-10-01). Should interest earnings not be available by September 1,
funding shall be made directly from the Delaware Strategic Fund. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these
funds shall be used for business marketing and recruitment. These funds may be used together with non-state
150

contributions to the Delaware Business Marketing Program. However, in the event that non-state contributions are
not available, or in the event such contributions are insufficient to fully access the resources of the Delaware
Business Marketing Program, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the Delaware Business Marketing
Program shall continue to fully operate using only the interest earnings on the Delaware Strategic Fund as provided
for in 29 Del. C. § 8727A.
In the event that non-state contributions are available, they may be made in cash or in-kind. Non-state cash
contributions shall be deposited in a special fund for business marketing and recruitment purposes only. Non-state
in-kind contributions shall be valued at their fair market value and documented by the Delaware Economic
Development Authority in connection with the Delaware Business Marketing Program.
When non-state contributions are used, expenditures of the program shall be divided between non-state
contributions and state funds for any fiscal year’s appropriations such that non-state contributions are not less than
50 percent of total expenditures. Of the 50 percent non-state contributions, up to 25 percent shall be cash
contributions, and up to 25 percent shall be in-kind contributions. These funds shall not be used for hiring full-time
employees. Allocations shall be made by the Director of the Division of Small Business with the approval of the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
On or before December 1 the Director of the Division of Small Business shall provide to the Director of
the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General a report on the Delaware Business Marketing
Program. The report shall include an itemized list of all non-state cash and in-kind contributions received, total
expenditures and an assessment of the program to date.
(d) The next $150.0 shall be used to provide customized information technology training to small and
medium-sized businesses through grants made by Delaware Technical Community College I.T. Learning Center.
Should interest earnings not be available by September 1, funding shall be made available directly from the
Delaware Strategic Fund.
(e) Any remaining funds shall be used for the purposes of the Delaware Strategic Fund.
Section 113. During the fiscal year the State of Delaware, through the Delaware Tourism Office and the
Riverfront Development Corporation, shall be entitled to charter the Kalmar Nyckel. Said use is to include docked
guest entertaining privileges and/or day sails at no cost for as many State of Delaware guests as is consistent with
Kalmar Nyckel safety policies. Scheduling for State and Riverfront Development Corporation use of the Kalmar
151

Nyckel shall be at mutually agreeable times and locations to the Kalmar Nyckel, the Delaware Tourism Office on
behalf of the State of Delaware and the Riverfront Development Corporation.
Section 114. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of State, Division of Small
Business, Delaware Economic Development Authority (20-10-01) for Business Incubators. This appropriation is
supplemented by $175.0 of the fiscal year interest earnings of the Delaware Strategic Fund. The Department shall
award these funds to local economic development organizations supporting business development. The provisions
of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.
Section 115. The World Trade Center Delaware shall work in cooperation with the Delaware Prosperity
Partnership, the Department of State, and other state offices to promote foreign trade and investment in the State of
Delaware. As such, the World Trade Center may be a contact for the State regarding international trade matters with
the business community; U.S. federal agencies; regional, national and international organizations; and other
domestic and international trade organizations worldwide, as well as assist in hosting and coordinating international
trade delegations and foreign government officials visiting the State.
Section 116. In accordance with an Order of the Court of Chancery, dated October 12, 2020, approving a
settlement between the parties in In Re Delaware Public Schools Litigation, Section 1 of this Act makes an
appropriation to Department of State, Administration, Office of the Secretary (20-01-01) in Equity Ombudsperson
Program to provide three Ombudspersons, one to serve in each county. The program shall focus on non-legal
interventions with school districts to resolve disputes or complaints concerning different or unfair treatment of
students, including disparate discipline, inequitable access to school programs, or other similar disputes or
complaints. The program shall also serve students in charter schools. The Ombudspersons shall act as non-lawyer
advocates for students and their families in any proceedings conducted by schools or local, state, or federal
education agencies. If determined to be appropriate and desirable, the contracted supplier may seek pro bono, or
subcontract for, legal services.
152

FINANCE
Section 117. The Department of Finance, Office of the Secretary (25-01-01) is authorized during the fiscal
year to maintain special funds with the State Treasurer for the acquisition of technology and payment of other costs
incidental (including the hiring of seasonal employees) to the implementation and maintenance of computer systems
at the Office of the Secretary or Revenue (25-06-01). Deposits to the special funds shall be from the collection of
delinquent taxes and shall not exceed the amount specified in Section 1 of this Act. Within that amount, a revenue
collection and reporting system is authorized to be funded from the deposit of all revenues derived from penalties
and interest associated with the collection of such delinquent taxes to accumulate in such fund with quarterly reports
regarding the status of this fund made by the Department of Finance to the Director of the Office of Management
and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 118. Revenue (25-06-01) is authorized to establish and maintain a special fund with the State
Treasurer for the purpose of contracting and/or employing personnel for the collection of delinquent state taxes and
other debts that Revenue has undertaken to collect. The contracts and/or personnel may provide for 1) collection or
assistance in collection of delinquent accounts from businesses or persons; and/or 2) audit of business and personal
taxables under the direct supervision of Revenue management; and/or 3) audit of physical inventory of alcoholic
beverage wholesalers. Deposits to the special fund shall be from the collection of delinquent taxes. A detailed
report on all expenditures from and collections to this special fund shall be sent annually to the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. Unencumbered balances on June 30 in excess of
$300.0 shall revert to the General Fund. The Department of Finance may undertake pilot programs to improve the
collection of delinquent state taxes and other debts including, but not limited to, the domestication of judgments
outside of Delaware, additional legal processing efforts, related follow-up and staffing, and associated technology.
In the event that the Department of Finance’s operational or contractual expenses related to such collections
programs shall exceed the amount in Section 1 in the Division of Revenue (25-06-01) of this Act, the ASF budget in
Section 1 of this Act may be amended by the Secretary of Finance, the Controller General and the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget.
Section 119. The Director of Revenue shall have the authority to accept, on whatever terms and conditions
they may establish, payment by credit card of taxes, fees and other obligations that Revenue has undertaken to
collect. The Director is authorized to enter into contracts for the processing of credit card payments and fees
153

associated with such contracts. The ASF authority for delinquent collections may be used to pay for fees and
expenses associated with the collection of taxes by credit cards.
Section 120. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the Secretary of Finance or their designee
shall have the authority to enter into agreements according to which contingency and other fees are provided to
persons locating or substantiating property to be escheated to the State or to other persons identifying abandoned
property by means of audit or otherwise. Section 1 of this Act authorizes the Department of Finance, Office of the
Secretary (25-01-01) to maintain an Escheat ASF account (appropriation 60507) with the State Treasurer from
which charges relating to receiving and processing remittances and reports by holders, and claims by owners of
abandoned property, as well as advertising and travel fees and associated costs may be paid, and into which
abandoned property remittances may, at the discretion of the Secretary, be deposited; and from which contingency
and other fees, including legal expenses incident to escheat compliance and enforcement, may be paid to
compensate persons locating or substantiating property or developing or maintaining systems that permit the State
to substantiate and accept property to be escheated to the State or to other persons identifying abandoned property
by means of audit or otherwise, and into which abandoned property remittances may, at the discretion of the
Secretary, be deposited.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the Secretary of Finance or their designee may enter into
or maintain escrow, custodian or similar agreements for the purpose of protecting the State's interest in property to
be escheated or fees payable pursuant to the aforesaid agreements. In the event that the Department of Finance’s
amount of contractual services for escheat enforcement shall exceed the amount in Section 1 of this Act due to
higher than anticipated legal expenses or audit or other collections, the ASF budget in Section 1 of this Act may be
amended by the Secretary of Finance, the Controller General and the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget. In the event that such excess collections result in revenues exceeding the threshold established by 29 Del.
C. § 6102(s), such threshold shall be increased by an amount equal to any increases in appropriation 60507.
Unencumbered cash balances on June 30 for Escheat in excess of $7,275.0 shall revert to the General Fund.
Section 121. (a) In the event that the State Lottery Office (25-07-01) amount of Contractual Services
exceeds the amount in Section 1 of this Act due to increased lottery ticket sales (traditional, sports and other
products), the ASF budget in Section 1 of this Act may be amended by the Secretary of Finance, the Controller
General and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, provided that the total operating budget for this
fiscal year shall not exceed 20 percent of gross sales as limited by 29 Del. C. § 4815(a).
154

(b) In the event that the State Lottery Office’s amount of Contractual Services shall exceed the amount in
Section 1 of this Act due to increased video lottery net proceeds, the ASF budget in Section 1 of this Act may be
amended by the Secretary of Finance, the Controller General and the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget, subject to the limitations outlined in 29 Del. C. § 4815(b).
Section 122. Pursuant to 29 Del. C. § 4815(b)(3)(c) and 29 Del. C. § 4815(d)(1)(b), funds from the State
Lottery Fund shall be released to an appropriately established account within the Department of Health and Social
Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health (35-06-00) on or before the 15th day of each month, the amount of
which shall be based on the results of video lottery operations and table game operations, respectively conducted
during the immediately preceding month.
Section 123. Pursuant to 29 Del. C. § 4805(b)(4), the State Lottery Office (25-07-01) is authorized to enter
into an agreement with other state lotteries for participation in multi-jurisdictional, wide-area, progressive video
lottery games. The State Lottery Office is authorized to contract with these other state lotteries for the procurement
of services for implementation of multi-jurisdictional, wide-area, progressive video lottery games, and the
provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.
Section 124. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $52,808.3 ASF in the Department of
Finance, State Lottery Office (25-07-01) for Contractual Services. Up to $300.0 ASF of that amount may be used for
the marketing and promotion of prevention and treatment services related to compulsive gambling, including mobile
betting.
155

HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES
Section 125. Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Delaware Code, the Department of Health and
Social Services shall have authority to fill vacant positions with qualified applicants for the Certified Nursing
Assistant, Active Treatment Facilitator, Activity Therapist, Licensed Practical Nurse, Registered Nurse, Physician,
Dentist, Psychiatrist and Teacher of students with visual impairment classifications by agency recruitment efforts
unless an eligibility list is required by federal law for that position.
Section 126. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funding and 2.0 FTEs to the Department of Health and
Social Services, Office of the Secretary (35-01-10) for Home and Community-Based Services Ombudspersons
(HCBSO). These positions will report directly to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsperson and will serve as a
principal point of contact for adult home and community-based consumers. The HCBSO will function as a mediator
and facilitate conflict resolution relative to services for adults residing in home and community-based settings
and/or receiving services from providers licensed to provide home and community-based services in the State of
Delaware. In addition, the HCBSO will contribute to the development of state long-term care policy by means of
sharing data, information and funding from an array of home and community-based service system monitoring and
related activities.
Section 127. (a) Results of investigations conducted by the Audit and Recovery Management Services
(ARMS) concerning any and all public welfare and Purchase of Child Care programs administered by the
Department of Health and Social Services that indicate intentional program violation, inadvertent household error or
agency error are processed for collection of overpayment. Additionally, cases of intentional program violation of
the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) and the Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF)
programs shall be adjudicated for Administrative Disqualification. Cases of probable or prosecutable fraud shall be
transmitted to the Department of Justice directly by the Director of the Office of the Secretary, Administration. The
Department of Justice shall prosecute those cases deemed actionable and return the rest to the Department of Health
and Social Services for collection of overpayment. The Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services
shall file an annual report directly with the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General.
(b) Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $232.8 ASF in the Department of Health and Social
Services, Office of the Secretary, Administration (35-01-20) for Program Integrity for the operation of the ARMS
unit. Revenue from ARMS collections related to Public Assistance and Purchase of Child Care programs shall fund
156

this account. All revenue in excess of the Program Integrity’s ASF authority shall be deposited as designated by 29
Del. C. § 6102.
Section 128. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates $9,099.8 $11,504.1 in Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) under Early Intervention for the Part C Birth to Three
Program; $152.5 in Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Prevention and Behavioral
Health Services, Prevention/Early Intervention (37-04-20) for the Birth to Three Program; and $267.9 in the
Department of Education, Pass Through and Other Support Programs, Special Needs Programs (95-03-20) for the
Interagency Resource Management Committee (IRMC). IRMC shall consult and advise the lead agency in setting
program eligibility standards, shall have the authority to allocate such funds and may advise on the use of other
funds specifically designated for this project. Section 1 of this Act includes 29.5 FTEs in Department of Health and
Social Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20); 2.0 FTEs in the Department of Services for
Children, Youth and Their Families, Prevention and Behavioral Health Services, Prevention/Early Intervention (37-
04-20); and 2.0 FTEs in the Department of Education, Pass Through and Other Support Programs, Special Needs
Programs (95-03-20) to provide appropriate service coordination and transition services for children birth to three,
selected through the early intervention process to ensure compliance with federal regulations and a coordinated
transition with their respective local education agencies. In addition, IRMC may recommend the transfer of General
Fund positions and/or General Fund dollars from the Department of Health and Social Services as necessary to
operate this program.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services shall ensure that under the Part C Birth
to Three Program, no child will be denied services because of their parent's inability to pay. The following will be
adhered to by the Department of Health and Social Services in developing Part C-vendor agreements: 1) vendors
will agree to bill third party insurance including Medicaid and clients; 2) client fees will be based on the
Department of Health and Social Services scale developed by the Ability to Pay Committee and found in the
department's policy Memorandum 37 the Birth to Three Early Intervention Program shall not charge any family fees
for early intervention services, as defined in 34 CFR Section 303.13, that are identified in the child’s Individualized
Family Service Plans (IFSPs); and 3) those agencies who have sliding payment scales currently will be permitted to
continue using them as long as those scales do not require a greater financial burden than that of the Department of
Health and Social Services scale.
157

(c) Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social Services, for the
Birth to Three Program. Of that amount, $150.0 is appropriated to provide evaluation and direct services for
children.
Section 129. The Department of Health and Social Services shall work with the Department of Education
to make improvements to the Purchase of Care system to support children with special needs, including reducing the
administrative burden on families and child care providers. The Departments shall continue to make improvement
on steps as recommended in the progress report dated May 2023 regarding the identification and funding for
children with special needs, including:
(a) The Departments shall develop a system that relies on Individualized Education Programs (IEPs) and
Individualized Family Service Plans (IFSPs) as documentation and data matching, and conduct the
related implementation steps including:
i. The Departments shall identify components of regulation updates and develop agency MOUs by
October 1, 2024 November 1, 2025.
ii. The Departments shall identify components of regulation updates and develop agency MOUs by
November 1, 2024.
(b) The Departments shall develop a process by which other areas of need and diagnoses shall be
identified and supported by November 1, 2024 2025.
Section 130. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates $1,980.2 in DIMER Operations to Department of
Health and Social Services, Office of the Secretary (35-01-10) for the Delaware Institute of Medical Education and
Research (DIMER) to provide funding to medical schools and health systems to promote the availability of seats for
further education. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.
(b) Any changes from the current allocation must receive prior approval from the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(c) Any scholarship program developed by the DIMER Board will be repaid under terms and conditions
that will be coordinated with the Delaware Health Care Commission, who shall be responsible for monitoring and
enforcement. In designing a scholarship program, the DIMER Board will consider the need to assure that there is a
continuing supply of physicians for Delaware. Scholarships will be approved by the Delaware Health Care
Commission, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
158

Section 131. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates $200.0 in DIDER Operations to the Department of
Health and Social Services, Office of the Secretary (35-01-10) for the Delaware Institute of Dental Education and
Research (DIDER) to provide funding to dental schools to promote the availability of seats for further education.
The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.
(b) Any scholarship program developed by the DIDER Board shall be repaid under terms and conditions
coordinated with the Delaware Health Care Commission, who shall be responsible for monitoring and enforcement.
In designing a scholarship program, the DIDER Board shall consider the need to assure that there is a continuing
supply of dentists for Delaware. Scholarships shall be approved by the Delaware Health Care Commission, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 132. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates $198.4 to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Office of the Secretary (35-01-10) for the DIMER Loan Repayment Program.
(b) Any loan program developed by the DIMER Board will be repaid under terms and conditions
coordinated by the Delaware Health Care Commission, who shall be responsible for monitoring and enforcement.
In designing a loan program, the DIMER Board will consider the need to assure that there is a continuing supply of
physicians for Delaware. The loan repayment allocation of $198.4 shall be used to recruit physicians or other
practitioners eligible under the loan repayment program and to recruit and retain practitioners in underserved areas
of Delaware. Loans and loan repayment programs will be approved by the Delaware Health Care Commission, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 133. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates $17.5 to the Department of Health and Social Services,
Office of the Secretary (35-01-10) for the DIDER Loan Repayment Program.
(b) Any loan program developed by the DIDER Board will be repaid under terms and conditions
coordinated by the Delaware Health Care Commission, who shall be responsible for monitoring and enforcement.
In designing a loan program, the DIDER Board will consider the need to assure that there is a continuing supply of
dentists for Delaware. The loan repayment allocation of $17.5 shall be used to recruit dentists or other practitioners
eligible under the loan repayment program. Loans and loan repayment programs will be approved by the Delaware
Health Care Commission, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 134. The Department of Health and Social Services is authorized to contract with a cooperative
multi-state purchasing contract alliance for the procurement of pharmaceutical products, services and allied
159

supplies. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply to such contract. Prior to entering into any such
contracts, the department will obtain the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.
Section 135. (a) The amount appropriated by Section 1 of this Act to the Department of Health and Social
Services for Title XIX Federal Programs Medicaid shall be expended solely in accordance with the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This appropriation shall be used for the purpose of continuing the program of medical assistance
provided within the State Plan under Title XIX of the Social Security Act and the requirement of
Section 121(a) of P.L. 89-97 and all subsequent amendments enacted by the Congress of the
United States and commonly known as Title XIX of the Social Security Act; and
(2) The State Plan of medical care to be carried out by the Department of Health and Social Services
shall meet the requirement for Federal Financial Participation under the aforementioned Title
XIX.
(b) Funds appropriated by Section 1 of this Act for Title XIX Medicaid may be expended by the Department
of Health and Social Services for covered direct client services as well as transportation and disease management.
Funds may be expended for other administrative costs involved in carrying out the purpose of this section if
approved by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.
(c) The funds hereby appropriated for Medicaid shall be expended only on condition that the program is
approved and federal matching funds are provided by the appropriate federal agency except that funds may be
expended to cover certain mental health services received by Medicaid eligible clients even though the federal
government has terminated matching funds.
(d) The Department of Health and Social Services shall file a report to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General of all services provided by the Medicaid appropriation. The
report shall clearly identify any services that were changed, added or deleted during the current fiscal year. This
report is due by May 15 of each fiscal year.
Section 136. (a) Section 1 of this Act makes appropriations to the Department of Health and Social Services,
Medicaid and Medical Assistance (35-02-01) for various programs that pay for health care. In the Medicaid
program, federal regulations mandate that drug companies must provide rebates in order to participate in the
program. The Division of Medicaid and Medical Assistance (DMMA) shall establish a drug rebate process for any
prescription benefits provided to clients enrolled in the following non-Medicaid programs administered by the
160

Department of Health and Social Services, including but not limited to: the Delaware Prescription Assistance
Program, the Delaware Healthy Children Program, the Renal Disease program and the Cancer Treatment program.
The division shall establish a rebate process that it determines is in the best interests of the citizens who are being
served. The rebate amount shall be calculated using the full methodology prescribed by the federal government for
the Medicaid program. In addition, the division is authorized to negotiate rebates with drug companies for both
Medicaid and other programs. Notwithstanding any provisions of the Delaware Code to the contrary, the division
shall deposit any drug rebate funds received, as well as third party insurance collections (minus retention amounts)
and other collections into the appropriate Medicaid and Medical Assistance program account and use them to meet
program costs.
(b) Section 1 of this Act also makes appropriations to other agencies of state government for health care
programs that purchase drugs. DMMA shall work with other state agencies to develop a drug rebate process for
these programs.
(c) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Secretary of the Department of Health
and Social Services shall continue to analyze cost containment initiatives in the area of additional drug rebates for
prescription drugs. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Secretary of the Department of
Health and Social Services shall confer with the Controller General and the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance
Committee.
Section 137. The Department of Health and Social Services is authorized to contract for the procurement
of managed care services for the Delaware Medical Assistance Program. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not
apply to such contracts.
Section 138. (a) Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Medicaid and Medical Assistance (35-02-01) for Renal.
(b) Medicaid and Medical Assistance will provide the following support for the Chronic Renal Disease
Program: 1) provide staff support for the Chronic Renal Disease Advisory Committee, including the maintenance of
the committee membership and appointment system; 2) develop standards for determining eligibility for services
provided by the program, with the advice of the Advisory Committee; 3) extend assistance to persons suffering
from chronic renal disease who meet eligibility criteria; 4) periodically provide information to the Advisory
Committee on services provided and expenditures for these services; and 5) coordinate benefits with the Medicare
161

Part D program for non-state employee clients. Those clients not Medicaid eligible will receive the same level of
services as in previous years.
Section 139. Section 1 of this Act provides ASF spending authority to the Department of Health and
Social Services, Medicaid and Medical Assistance (DMMA) (35-02-01). Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del.
C. § 6102, the division shall be allowed to deposit Medicaid reimbursement for the federal share of Medicaid claims
for the Pathways Program Employment Navigators into its Medicaid ASF appropriation. Employment Navigators
are employees of the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services, Community Services (35-11-30) and
Division of Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities, Administration/Community Services (35-14-
01). Revenue will be retained by DMMA to support the state share of claims for Pathways services.
Section 140. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $40,000.0 ASF in Hospital Quality
Assessment to the Department of Health and Social Services, Medicaid and Medical Assistance (35-02-01) to
support Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 13 of the 152nd General Assembly. Of this amount, the Division of
Medicaid and Medical Assistance shall use up to 25 percent to further enhance rates for private, non-pediatric
skilled nursing facilities during the Calendar Year 2026. The Division of Medicaid and Medical Assistance shall
submit any necessary federal authorities to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services reflecting the rate
adjustment starting January 1, 2026, to ensure federal matching funds for this expenditure for the Fiscal Year 2026
and annually thereafter. Furthermore, up to 12.5 percent of the revenue recognized under 16 Del. C. § 1043(a)(2)
may be used as a one-time directed payment during Fiscal Year 2026. Enhanced rates shall require the approval of
the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 141. Section 1 of this Act includes 2.0 NSF FTEs in the Department of Health and Social
Services, Social Services (35-07-01). These Medicaid Eligibility Specialist positions will be funded through
voluntary contributions from medical facilities and from federal matching funds. These positions will expedite the
Medicaid eligibility application process for Medicaid clients and will ensure that these clients apply for services
through Medicaid, if appropriate, thereby maximizing federal revenues for the State of Delaware. Other medical
facilities throughout the State may participate in this program.
Section 142. Section 1 of this Act includes an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) for Tobacco Fund: Contractual Services. Of this amount,
$620.4 $403.3 ASF shall be used for the purpose of providing school nursing services five days a week to non-
public schools in New Castle County and Kent County.
162

The Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services will ensure that the contracts with the
various schools in this program are executed no later than August 15 of each fiscal year. The Secretary will also
ensure that timely payments are made to all contractors.
Section 143. (a) Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Director’s Office/Support Services (35-05-10) for a State Office of Animal Welfare. The
office shall be responsible for coordinating programs, standards and oversight to protect the State’s animals and
ensure best practices with public health and safety as outlined by the Animal Welfare Task Force recommendations
in 2013.
(b) There shall be 15.0 18.0 FTEs authorized for the Office of Animal Welfare. It is the intent of the
General Assembly that some veterinarian experience be included in the office’s structure, whether through one of
the office positions or in a contractual role.
(c) The General Assembly directs the Office of Animal Welfare within the Department of Health and
Social Services, Public Health, Director’s Office/Support Services (35-05-10) to enforce animal control and
licensing, dangerous dog, rabies control and animal cruelty laws for the State of Delaware.
(d) Section 1 of this Act authorizes $4,000.0 ASF and 14.0 ASF FTEs and 9.0 12.0 casual/seasonal ASF
positions for the Office of Animal Welfare for animal control and enforcement officer positions. The City of
Wilmington and New Castle, Kent and Sussex Counties are to submit payment for dog control and dangerous dog
law enforcement to the Office of Animal Welfare upon transfer of these enforcement services. These payments, as
well as payments related to enforcement of animal control, cruelty and licensing laws, shall be deposited into an
ASF account established by the Office of Animal Welfare.
(e) Section 1 of this Act provides $101.0 for Animal Welfare to Department of Health and Social Services,
Public Health, Director’s Office/Support Services (35-05-10) for costs associated with the enforcement of animal
cruelty laws and Senate Bill 211 of the 146th General Assembly.
Section 144. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $18.4 General Funds and $585.4 $380.5 Tobacco Funds to
the Department of Health and Social Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) for the Uninsured
Action Plan. It is the intent of the Administration and the General Assembly that these funds shall be used for the
continuation of the services provided under the plan after all other available funds for this purpose have been
exhausted. The Division of Public Health shall submit a report to the Director of the Office of Management and
163

Budget and the Controller General no later than October 15 of each fiscal year detailing the plan for the expenditure
of these funds.
Section 145. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) to provide flu, pneumonia, Hepatitis B and other necessary
vaccinations (and ancillary supplies such as syringes and needles) required for the protection of the Delaware
public, especially those that do not have medical insurance or whose insurance does not cover vaccines. This Act
also provides for the reimbursement of vaccine administration fees to eligible providers for vaccines administered to
eligible children under the Vaccines for Children program in line with rates set by the Division of Medicaid and
Medical Assistance in conjunction with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. If funding levels allow,
these funds may also be spent as necessary to upgrade and maintain the immunization registry (DelVAX).
Section 146. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) for Toxicology to be used for equipment
replacement/upgrade and related support costs for the program.
Section 147. (a) Section 1 of this Act provides funding for the Department of Health and Social Services,
Public Health, Community Health, Health Systems Protection (35-05-20) to administer the Drinking Water State
Revolving Fund (DWSRF). This fund consists of funding from the State Twenty-First Century Fund and United
States Environmental Protection Agency and includes appropriations for technical assistance and water operator
training for drinking water systems in the State. An available 2 two percent set-aside funding through the DWSRF
for training and technical assistance shall be distributed appropriately to agencies providing water operator training
and drinking water system technical assistance. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, upon approval of the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General, the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Program may
administer a competitive Request for Proposal (RFP) process for drinking water system technical assistance, if other
providers are available and cost savings exist.
Section 148. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds to the Department of Health and Social Services,
Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) and to Judicial, Administrative Office of the Courts - Non-Judicial
Services, Maternal and Child Death Review Commission (02-18-06) to improve birth outcomes and reduce infant
mortality. More specifically, the funds are to implement recommendations of the Infant Mortality Task
Force/Delaware Healthy Mother and Infant Consortium and other evidence-based recommendations. Included are
164

$4,201.6 for the Infant Mortality Task Force and Personnel Costs for 2.0 FTEs in Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20). Section 1 also appropriates funding for Personnel Costs for
3.0 FTEs in the Infant Mortality Task Force/Delaware Healthy Mother and Infant Consortium directly to Judicial,
Administrative Office of the Courts - Non-Judicial Services, Maternal and Child Death Review Commission (02-
18-06). The Department of Health and Social Services shall submit an update on the spending plan and staffing
details for review and approval for these funds to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General no later than November 1 of each fiscal year.
Section 149. Of the funds derived from those State Lottery funds transferred to the Department of Health
and Social Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health (35-06-00) pursuant to 29 Del. C. § 4815(b)(2), $20.0
shall be used by the division to create and/or continue an Addiction Prevention Program in all Delaware high
schools on the subject of compulsive gambling. These funds shall provide, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) A prevention education booklet to be given to every high school student in the State;
(2) A teacher guideline instructional booklet to assist teachers to impart this information to students; and
(3) On-site training to teachers on appropriate teaching methods.
Section 150. The Department of Health and Social Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health (35-06-
00) is encouraged, where appropriate, to reallocate resources so as to create a balanced system of services and
treatment for persons with mental illness. Such reallocation initiatives must be made within the division’s
appropriation limit with the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General. These reallocation initiatives shall not compromise the standard of care of the division’s clients.
Section 151. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $17,450.9 in Community Placements in the Department of
Health and Social Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health, Community Mental Health (35-06-20). The
department shall utilize the funds to support clients in the least restrictive settings and transition Delaware
Psychiatric Center residents into the community. As a result, the department shall realize savings in future fiscal
years through analyzing staffing and operational needs.
Section 152. The Merit Rules notwithstanding, Department of Health and Social Services, Division of
Substance Abuse and Mental Health (35-06-00), Board Certified Psychiatrists, Physicians and Chief Physician,
which support the Delaware Psychiatric Center, shall be eligible for standby pay and call back pay.
Section 153. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health, Delaware Psychiatric Center (35-06-30) for Contractual Services.
165

Of that amount, $41.2 shall be made available for a Direct Patient Care Education Program to enable direct care
professionals to take courses to increase their skills in specialty areas. It is understood that participants in this
program will provide clinical services with compensation to Delaware Psychiatric Center during the duration of
their education. It is further understood that these individuals shall remain employees of Delaware Psychiatric
Center for a minimum of one year after graduation or shall reimburse the State for any and all tuition received. It is
further understood that any individuals who do not successfully complete their courses shall be required to
reimburse the State for the cost of the tuition per divisional policy.
Section 154. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health, Substance Abuse (35-06-40) for Substance Use Disorder Services.
Substance exposed pregnant women shall receive priority in placement on any wait list for these services to the
extent allowable under federal guidelines.
Section 155. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Social Services (35-07-01) for the recovery of TANF Child Support Pass Through costs. The division
shall be allowed to collect and deposit funds into this appropriation as a result of child support payments collected
and retained by the Division of Child Support Services (DCSS). DCSS is able to retain payments of Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) clients based on the Assignment of Rights, which is a condition of TANF
eligibility. These retained funds will be used by Social Services to make supplemental payments to clients who are
eligible to receive a portion of their child support collections under state and federal TANF budgeting rules.
Section 156. Notwithstanding any provisions of the Delaware Code to the contrary, the Department of
Health and Social Services, Social Services (35-07-01) is authorized to make such policy changes in the
administration of the TANF and Child Care Development Block Grant programs as may be necessary to ensure that
Delaware will qualify for the full amount of its federal block grant entitlement funds. Any changes require the prior
approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and Controller General.
Section 157. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates Personnel Costs and 47.0 FTEs to the Department of
Health and Social Services, Visually Impaired, Visually Impaired Services (35-08-01). Of this appropriation 19.0
FTEs itinerant teachers are available to meet caseload requirements for the Braille Literacy Act per the provisions
of 14 Del. C. § 206(e).
(b) The Secretary may implement any combination of reasonable options to effectively meet Individual
Education Program (IEP) plans for students with visual impairments, including, but not limited to, straight time
166

overtime for itinerant teachers and Certified Orientation Mobility Specialists and professionals who are not covered
by the Fair Labor Standards Act. The method of compensation is subject to the availability of funds and/or the
operational needs of the department.
Section 158. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Visually Impaired, Visually Impaired Services (35-08-01) for Contractual Services. Of that amount, $23.8
shall be used to compensate correctional inmates for the purpose of producing Braille materials for visually
impaired school children.
Section 159. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $1,463.4 ASF in the Department of Health
and Social Services, Child Support Services (35-10-01) for the operation of the division. Revenue from child
support collections shall fund this account and the related 2.1 ASF FTEs. The department shall continue its efforts
to maintain collections related to child support programs, and all revenue in excess of the division's ASF authority
shall be deposited as designated by 29 Del. C. § 6102.
Section 160. Section 1 of this Act provides appropriations to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Child Support Services (35-10-01) for Technology Operations for maintenance and operating costs of the
Delaware Child Support System and the State Disbursement Unit. Child Support Services shall have the authority to
contract for IT resource augmentation, software maintenance and licensing, and other related IT costs for the
duration of these projects.
Section 161. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $575.0 $460.0 ASF in Tobacco Fund: Autism Supports to
the Department of Health and Social Services, Developmental Disabilities Services, Administration (35-11-10) for
Autism Spectrum Disorder. These funds are pass-through funding to the University of Delaware’s Center for
Disabilities Studies and will be used to implement the Delaware Network for Excellence in Autism (DNEA), which
will provide a resource for training and technical assistance for Delaware state agencies, organizations and other
private entities operating in the State of Delaware that provide services and support to individuals and families
affected by Autism Spectrum Disorder. These funds will support the following positions: one Network Director, one
Administrative Support and two Team Leaders. The remainder of the funding will be used to provide operational
support for DNEA. It is the intent that the DNEA and the Department of Education’s Statewide Autism Supports
program coordinate spending plans and programmatic initiatives in order to avoid duplicative programming and to
improve outcomes. A report detailing the coordination efforts shall be submitted to the Co-Chairs of the Joint
167

Finance Committee, the House and Senate Chairs of the Education Committees, the Controller General’s Office, and
the Office of Management and Budget by May 1 of each fiscal year.
Section 162. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6102(a), the Department of Health and Social
Services, Developmental Disabilities Services, Community Services (35-11-30) shall be permitted to retain revenue
collected above and beyond the first $350.0 deposited annually into the General Fund, resulting from Medicaid
reimbursement in an amount sufficient to cover costs associated with case management services.
Section 163. Section 1 of the Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social Services,
Developmental Disabilities Services (DDDS), Community Services (35-11-30) for Purchase of Community Services
for costs associated with providing transportation. This appropriation will support the provision of door to door
transportation to and from day service providers for DDDS eligible consumers. DDDS shall maintain Fiscal Year
2013 rates and shall implement an add on rate for door to door transportation for pre-vocational and day habilitation
services. Such add on rates will only be paid to providers that were providing door to door transportation for pre-
vocational and day habilitation services as of July 1, 2013.
Section 164. The Department of Health and Social Services, Developmental Disabilities Services (35-11-
00) is encouraged, where appropriate, to reallocate resources so as to maximize community-based residential
placements for persons with developmental disabilities. Such reallocation initiatives must be made within the
division’s appropriation limit with the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General. These reallocation initiatives shall not compromise the standard of care of the remaining
Stockley Center population.
Section 165. It is not the intent of the Department of Health and Social Services to pursue systems of
managed long term services and supports for the intellectual and developmental disabilities (I/DD) population in an
attempt to limit healthcare costs. If the Division of Developmental Disabilities and Services determines systems of
managed long term services and supports to be a viable solution to addressing increasing costs, the department must
first receive approval of the Joint Finance Committee prior to pursuing such a solution.
Section 166. Section 1 of this Act provides $4,843.5 ASF to the Department of Health and Social Services
(DHSS), Developmental Disabilities Services, Community Services (35-11-30) for the Purchase of Community
Services. Developmental Disabilities Services is allowed to retain revenue from Medicaid reimbursement for respite
services provided at the Stockley Center, and administrative services as specified in the DHSS public assistance
cost allocation plan. The division also receives revenue from ability to pay collections based on a sliding fee scale
168

and tenant and other fines and fees. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6102, the division shall be
allowed to collect and deposit the revenue into the Purchase of Community Services ASF account in Community
Services (35-11-30). Receipts in the account may be used for the benefit of DDDS community clients.
Section 167. Section 1 of this Act includes funding for Contractual Services for Department of Health and
Social Services, Social Services, State Service Centers (35-07-02). Of this amount, $182.2 shall be used for the
Delaware Helpline. Available funds designated for the Delaware Helpline may be distributed annually in a lump
sum at the beginning of the contract year. The department shall submit to the Office of Management and Budget
and the Office of the Controller General a proposed current year spending plan and a report of prior year
expenditures by August 31 of each fiscal year.
Section 168. Section 1 of this Act includes funding for Contractual Services for Department of Health and
Social Services, Social Services, State Service Centers (35-07-02). Of this amount, $3.0 shall be used to reimburse
emergency shelters and/or Code Purple Sanctuaries for operational costs, supplies and/or equipment expended to
house individuals and families that experience homelessness in Kent County during Code Purple weather
conditions. Code Purple weather declarations are made when weather poses a threat of serious harm to those
without shelter at night. It is declared when the combination of air temperature and wind chill is expected to be 32
degrees or less.
Section 169. The Department of Health and Social Services, Services for Aging and Adults with Physical
Disabilities (35-14-00) is encouraged, where appropriate, to reallocate resources so as to create a balanced system of
services and treatment between the internal program units: Hospital for the Chronically Ill (35-14-20) and
community-based services for persons aging and/or with physical disabilities in Administration/Community
Services (35-14-01). Such reallocation initiatives must be made within the division’s appropriation limit with the
approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. These reallocation
initiatives shall not compromise the standard of care of the remaining Long Term Care population.
Section 170. Section 1 of this Act provides ASF spending authority to the Department of Health and
Social Services, Division of Medicaid and Medical Assistance (35-02-01) and the Division of Substance Abuse and
Mental Health (DSAMH), Community Mental Health (35-06-20) and Substance Abuse (35-06-40).
Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6102, DSAMH shall be allowed to collect and deposit Medicaid
reimbursement, sliding fee scale client payments and additional insurance reimbursement for Promoting Optimal
Mental Health for Individuals through Support and Empowerment (PROMISE) and other behavioral health and
169

substance use disorder services by DSAMH operated programs. DSAMH will transfer the state share of Medicaid
payments into a DMMA ASF appropriation, and the remaining funds will be retained by DSAMH. Revenue
retained by DSAMH will be used to fund community residential, day program, care management, respite and other
behavioral health and substance use disorder services for program participants.
Section 171. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities, Administration/Community Services (35-14-01)
for Respite Care. Of that appropriation, $110.0 is appropriated to support families provided respite care services
through the Caregiver Program.
Section 172. Section 1 of this Act includes $25.0 ASF in the Department of Health and Social Services,
Services for Aging and Adults with Physical Disabilities, Hospital for the Chronically Ill (35-14-20) for Hospice.
The division shall be allowed to collect and deposit funds into this account as a result of revenue generated from
pharmaceuticals associated with Hospice services being provided.
Section 173. Any non-state agency whose employees are required to receive criminal background checks
pursuant to 16 Del. C. § 1141 and § 1145, shall provide to the Department of Health and Social Services quarterly
reports including a list of all employees hired over the preceding quarter for the purposes of verification. The
Department of Health and Social Services shall review those lists to ensure compliance with 16 Del. C. § 1141 and
§ 1145.
Section 174. The Department of Health and Social Services, Division of Substance Abuse and Mental
Health shall review its services and billing practices for generating and retaining revenue at the Delaware
Psychiatric Center (35-06-30). In the event of declining Disproportionate Share Hospital funds, the Division of
Substance Abuse and Mental Health shall submit a plan for approval to the Director of the Office of Management
and Budget and the Controller General to retain revenue to sustain operations at their current levels.
Section 175. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Health and Social
Services, Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) for School Based Health Centers. Of this amount, $340.0
shall be used to establish school-based health centers in high needs elementary schools. Centers shall be compliant
with 18 Del. C. § 3571G. For purposes of this subsection, high needs elementary schools shall be defined as any
elementary school that has greater than 90 percent of its student population classified as low-income, multilingual
learner (MLL), or underrepresented minority, or is in the top quartile in three or more of the following: percent low
income students, percent MLL students, percent students with disabilities, or percent underrepresented minority
170

students. School-based health centers shall be established at a rate of two per year, contingent on availability of
funding, through the Department of Health and Social Services, Division of Public Health. The Department of
Education shall provide a list of eligible schools and transfer appropriated funds to the Division of Public Health at
the start of each fiscal year. School districts and charter schools that meet the provisions of this subsection but have
already established school-based health centers may apply for consideration of reimbursement of for expenses
associated with establishing said health centers within the funds appropriated to the Department for this purpose.
The Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services, in consultation with the Secretary of Education,
may establish and promulgate rules and regulations governing the administration of such reimbursement.
Section 176. If the Department of Health and Social Services and the Division of Services for Aging and
Adults with Physical Disabilities release a Request for Proposal impacting awards for current providers of the Home
Delivered Meals Program, the department must first receive approval of the Director of the Office of Management
and Budget, the Controller General, and the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee prior to implementation of
the award.
Section 177. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds to the Department of Health and Social Services,
Division of Social Services (35-07-01) for Child Care. Of this amount, funding is allocated to increase the purchase
of care income limit to 200 percent of the Federal Poverty Level (FPL), effective July 1, 2024. The Secretary of the
Department of Health and Social Services shall report quarterly to the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget and the Controller General on the total resources (state and federal) expended, anticipated spending by
quarter, remaining funding available for Child Care, as well as the number of children enrolled in the purchase of
care program and this funding shall be reported by state, federal, and all other sources for the current and previous
State Fiscal Year. For federal funds the report shall indicate the sources of those funds including, but not limited to,
Child Care Development Fund (CCDF), TANF, SNAP, and any other funding source and whether those funds are
one-time funded. The first report will be due in November and subsequent reports will be due in February, May, and
August. The report shall also include:
(a) Any funding allocated to purchase of care that did not go directly to fund purchase of care and any
remaining funding available for Child Care;
(b) Data on the number of children, including school age and school age summer-only children,
enrolled in the purchase of care program and attendance rates by month for the current and
previous State Fiscal Year;
171

(c) The demographics of children and their families that utilize purchase of care, including race,
household income range by percentage of the federal poverty line, and household type; and
(d) Any anticipated or enacted policy changes in the reporting period.
Section 178. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $5.0 to the Department of Health and
Social Services, Office of the Secretary, Lyme Disease Education (35-01-10). This appropriation shall be used to
support the cost of annual website maintenance and design fees for the Lyme Disease Education Oversight Board in
providing education to the public and medical profession.
Section 179. Section 1 of this Act provides ASF spending authority to the Department of Health and
Social Services, Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health (DSAMH), Community Mental Health (35-06-20)
and Substance Abuse (35-06-40). Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. § 6102, DSAMH shall be allowed to
collect and deposit insurance reimbursement for the Dental Clinic services by DSAMH Dental clinic. DSAMH will
deposit the insurance funds, which will be retained by DSAMH. Revenue retained by DSAMH will be used to fund
community dental clinic participants.
Section 180. Section 1 of this Act provides ASF spending authority to the Department of Health and
Social Services, Division of Healthcare Quality (DHCQ), Health Care Quality (35-09-01). Notwithstanding the
provisions of 16 Del. C. §1119D, the DHCQ shall be allowed to collect and deposit registration fees paid by
temporary staffing agencies that provide temporary nurses and other staff positions to long-term care facilities.
Revenue retained by DHCQ will be used to cover the costs associated with the regulation, oversight and monitoring
of this section.
172

SERVICES FOR CHILDREN, YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES
Section 181. During the fiscal year, the Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families
may develop proposals to enhance or develop services provided in the State of Delaware. These proposals shall
include cost estimates that will demonstrate the cost effectiveness of the new or enhanced services. In the event that
a new service would require additional state employees, the department may request new positions that will be
funded by a structural change from existing appropriations within the department. Any new positions and funding
changes must be approved by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 182. The Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Management Support
Services (37-01-00) shall have 1.0 FTE exempt position in addition to those authorized by 29 Del. C. § 5903.
Section 183. Section 1 of this Act provides $5,591.2 $6,015.7 in K-5 Early Intervention to the Department
of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Prevention and Behavioral Health Services, Prevention/Early
Intervention (37-04-20) for prevention components administered by the Department of Services for Children, Youth
and Their Families and the Department of Education. Funding shall be used to provide early intervention services
through the Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Family Crisis Therapist Program.
Services are intended for grades K-5 and shall address but not be limited to, problems such as Early Onset Conduct
Disorder. The Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families may enter into contractual
agreements or may employ casual/seasonal personnel to operate the program.
Section 184. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $1,725.0 in Targeted Prevention Programs to the
Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Prevention and Behavioral Health Services,
Prevention/Early Intervention (37-04-20) for the purpose of providing statewide after-school programs focused on
youth violence and child suicide prevention. The Secretary of the Department of Services for Children, Youth and
Their Families, supported by the Criminal Justice Council, may work with the Department of Education to
determine allocation of said funding.
Section 185. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to the Department of Services for Children,
Youth and Their Families, Youth Rehabilitative Services, Community Services (37-05-30). Of these funds, $50.0
may be used, if necessary, for contractual services or to otherwise support statewide availability of the Juvenile
Offender Civil Citation Program.
Section 186. As a means of monitoring and continuing to improve the expenditure of casual/seasonal and
overtime in the Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Youth Rehabilitative Services,
173

Secure Care (37-05-50), the Secretary of the Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families shall
file a quarterly report with the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General on the
status of all Youth Rehabilitative Services operated facilities. The report shall include, but not be limited to,
casual/seasonal and overtime expenditures, leave usage, staffing vacancies, budgetary expenditures, population
statistics and incident reports at the Ferris School, Residential Cottages, New Castle County Detention Center and
Stevenson House. The report should reflect all actions (including disciplinary) being taken to expeditiously correct
the noted problem areas.
Section 187. Funds which are appropriated for foster care of children in Section 1 of this Act in the
Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families, Family Services (37-06-00), are made available
with the goal of limiting the number of children who remain in foster care for more than two years to 270. The 1997
Adoption and Safe Families Act (ASFA) codified reasonable exceptions for cases where youth may need to remain
in foster care for extended periods of time through proper planning. ASFA also allows for Alternative Planned
Permanency Living Arrangement designation, which allows more youth to enter long-term foster care placements.
The department shall file an annual report of the number of youth in foster care to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General by October 1 of each fiscal year.
Section 188. In addition to the positions authorized in Section 1 of this Act for Department of Services for
Children, Youth and Their Families, Family Services, Intake/Investigation (37-06-30) and Intervention/Treatment
(37-06-40), the Director of the Office of Management and Budget may authorize additional training positions for
the purpose of training investigative and treatment workers.
Section 189. If the quarterly average daily population at the New Castle County Detention Center is below
114, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General may reduce the number of
casual/seasonal or full-time positions through attrition.
Section 190. Section 1 of this Act provides appropriations to Department of Services for Children, Youth
and Their Families, Division of Family Services (37-06-00). Of this amount, $285.0 shall be used for the
development of Plans of Safe Care for infants with prenatal substance exposure. These funds shall be used to
support 4.5 contracted staff responsible for the completion of the plans.
Section 191. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Services for
Children, Youth and Their Families, Family Services, Intake/Investigation (37-06-30) has the authority to establish
174

up to 50.0 FTEs to achieve statutory child welfare investigation and treatment caseload compliance with the
approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
175

CORRECTION
Section 192. Section 1 of this Act includes 20.0 FTEs in the Department of Correction, Prisons, Steven R.
Floyd Sr. Training Academy (38-04-12) for the purposes of training classes. The department will use the salary
savings realized throughout the year to fund these positions. In the event that a training class would require
additional recruits, the department may request new positions that will be funded by a structural change from
existing appropriations within the department. Any new positions and funding changes must be approved by the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 193. The Department of Correction is authorized to contract for the procurement of health care
services to the department’s incarcerated population. For the current fiscal year, the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69
shall not apply to such contracts when there is an emergency thereby warranting it with the approval of the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 194. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $110.1 $123.2 to the Department of Correction, Prisons,
James T. Vaughn Correctional Center (38-04-03) for the Prison Arts Program. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that this funding is used to support programs that bring the arts into the state’s correctional institutions
and facilities. The department shall submit to the Office of Management and Budget, the Office of the Controller
General, the Chair of the Senate Corrections & Public Safety Committee, and the Chair of the House Corrections
Committee a proposed current year spending plan and a report of prior year expenditures by August 31 of each
fiscal year.
Section 195. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Correction, Prisons,
Bureau Chief - Prisons (38-04-01) for Supplies and Materials. Of this amount, $31.0 shall be used for the purpose of
collecting DNA samples.
Section 196. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation for Personnel Costs to the Department of
Correction, Prisons, James T. Vaughn Correctional Center (38-04-03). Included in this appropriation is 1.0 FTE and
associated funding to allow the department to oversee a program to manufacture reading materials in Braille for the
visually impaired.
Section 197. (a) Of the total FTEs authorized in Section 1 of this Act for the Department of Correction,
the following shall be used to continue the existing highway beautification projects: Community Corrections, Kent
County Community Corrections (38-06-08) - at least 3.0 FTEs; Community Corrections, Sussex County
Community Corrections (38-06-07) - at least 3.0 FTEs; Community Corrections, Hazel D. Plant Women's
176

Treatment Facility (38-06-13) - at least 1.0 FTE; and Community Corrections, Plummer Community Corrections
Center (38-06-14) - at least 1.0 FTE.
(b) Section 1 of this Act also makes an appropriation for Contractual Services to the Department of
Correction, Community Corrections, Kent County Community Corrections (38-06-08).
Section 198. (a) The Department of Correction, Administration, Office of the Commissioner (38-01-01)
shall maintain an overtime expenditure report and shall provide such report quarterly to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General. The report shall include the number of overtime hours worked
and the amount of overtime salary expended by each agency within the department and shall include a breakdown
of the reason for overtime.
(b) The Department of Correction shall work in conjunction with the Controller General and the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget on staffing analyses that are currently taking place within the department.
These analyses will provide necessary staffing levels according to National Institute on Corrections standards and
will be performed by the institution in an attempt to address existing overtime concerns.
Section 199. Prison education services shall be provided by utilizing existing teachers that are in the
Department of Correction, as well as authorized teaching FTEs in the Department of Education, Pass Through and
Other Support Programs, Special Needs Programs (95-03-20). The management of all educational positions shall be
provided by the Department of Education. Department of Correction teachers shall have the opportunity each fiscal
year to notify both agencies of their intent to transfer to the Department of Education. Such notification shall be
made by April 15 of each fiscal year to become effective July 1 of that calendar year. Any position transfer made
pursuant to this section shall be permanent.
If a remaining Department of Correction teacher applies for and is accepted into an authorized position in
the Department of Education, the position and associated funding shall be transferred to the Department of
Education for the operation of prison education services. If a remaining Department of Correction teacher position
becomes otherwise vacant, the position and associated funding shall be transferred to the Department of Education
for the operation of prison education services. In the event the Director of the Office of Management and Budget
proposes or implements position attrition or complement reduction initiative, the Director shall clearly indicate to
the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee when positions outlined in this section are included in the said
initiative(s).
177

Section 200. The Department of Correction, Community Corrections, Probation and Parole (38-06-02)
shall provide 24/7 supervision of Community Correction’s offenders. The department shall determine the number of
employees needed on duty throughout each 24-hour period and arrange staff coverage accordingly. At no time shall
the ratio of Probation Officer Is to other staff exceed 50 percent during nighttime and weekend hours.
Section 201. The Merit Rules notwithstanding, Department of Correction employees designated as
Correctional Emergency Response Team members, as well as the Correctional Security Superintendent/Chief of
Security and Inspections (BP# 61023) in Prisons, Special Operations (38-04-08) shall be eligible for standby pay
regardless of their classification. In addition, the Correctional Emergency Response Team employees in FLSA
exempt positions shall be eligible for straight-time overtime pay for activation requiring them to work beyond their
respective work schedules. Activations are defined as time periods in which team members are called into service to
meet critical operational needs as directed by the Warden of Special Operations or a higher authority.
Section 202. The Department of Correction is hereby authorized to review the current security status
classification of its facilities and submit a report including, but not limited to, any proposed security level changes
deemed necessary and appropriate to accommodate the needs of the department. Such report shall be submitted to
the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General no later than January 1 of each
fiscal year. If no such security level changes are proposed, no report shall be submitted by the Department of
Correction. No change shall be made to the security status of the facility without the prior approval of the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 203. (a) Section 1 of this Act appropriates $91,298.2 $91,480.7 to the Department of Correction,
Healthcare, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services, Medical Treatment and Services (38-02-01). The
Department of Correction shall provide quarterly reports relating to medical vendor performance to the Co-Chairs
of the Joint Finance Committee, the Chairs of the House and Senate Correction Committees, the Controller General
and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget. Reports shall include, but not be limited to, medical
staffing levels, overall performance, and plans for improvement. The administration of the contracts related to
providing healthcare, substance abuse and mental health services shall be the responsibility of the Commissioner of
Correction or the designee.
(b) The Department of Correction shall provide a bi-annual report to the members of the Joint Finance
Committee, the Controller General and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget relating to the
diagnoses and number of individuals receiving medical treatment by the Department and the average cost of
178

pharmaceuticals associated with these various diagnoses. This report shall also include the number of outside
consultant visits, as well as the costs for outside hospital stays lasting longer than 24 hours. The department shall
follow all HIPAA rules that apply, with all data stripping to be done as necessary. These reports shall be due by
August 31 and January 31 of each fiscal year.
(c) The Commissioner of Correction or designee shall jointly participate in developing the appropriate
requests for proposals to provide behavioral health services to include mental health and substance use disorder
treatment. Providers of behavioral and mental health services and providers of substance use disorder treatment shall
be permitted to bid on such services jointly or separately, but the Department of Correction shall evaluate proposals
for such services separately and independently. All selected contract providers shall report on a regular basis to the
Department of Correction on all follow-up regarding referrals and services provided to the offender population.
Section 204. Department of Correction Staff Lieutenants (MBDB05), Correctional Captains (MBDB06),
Correctional Officer Youth Rehab Food Service Director I (MCBC05) and Correctional Youth Rehab Food Service
Director II (MCBC06) not covered by the FLSA are entitled to receive compensation at their regular rate of pay for
all approved overtime services beyond the standard work week of 40 hours.
Section 205. Pursuant to 11 Del. C. c. 65 Subchapter VI, the Department of Correction is authorized to
expand Delaware Correctional Industries programs in Level IV and Level V facilities, should revenue be sufficient,
including a financial plan demonstrating a sustainable, self-funded operation. Upon approval by the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General, the Secretary of the Department of Human
Resources is authorized to increase the Department of Correction’s ASF personnel complement to expand said
programs.
Section 206. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and in order to meet critical
workforce needs, the Department of Correction has the authority with the concurrence of the Director of the Office
of Management and Budget, the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources and the Controller General to
reallocate and use vacant correctional officer positions to meet immediate internal operational needs of the
department including, but not limited to, Staff Training Relief Officers, Court and Security Transportation,
maintaining an Intelligence Operations Center and pre-trial supervision staffing. Further, if the use of the vacant
correctional officer positions results in correctional officer vacancies below the expected recruits for the fiscal year,
the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General have the authority to establish
correctional officer positions to backfill the vacant positions used to address immediate operational needs.
179

Section 207. (a) The Merit Rules notwithstanding, Department of Correction employees designated as
Critical Incident Stress Management (CISM) Team Members and respond and who are not covered under the Fair
Labor Standards Act shall be entitled to receive compensation at their straight time rate of pay for all approved
overtime services beyond their standard work week.
(b) Merit Rules 4.16 and 4.17 notwithstanding, employees designated as CISM Team Members shall be
eligible for standby and call back pay when activated, regardless of their classification.
Section 208. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $70.0 to the Department of Correction, Community
Corrections, Plummer Community Corrections Center (38-06-14) for the purposes of maintenance costs at
Riverview Cemetery. These funds may be expended on associated overtime costs, necessary equipment, equipment
maintenance, or other related expenses associated with Riverview Cemetery.
Section 209. The Commissioner of the Department of Correction shall provide an annual report, on or by
August 1, to the members of the Joint Finance Committee, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget,
and the Controller General relating to the status and timeline of addressing any salary compression for DOC
supervisor and manager affected job classes resulting from recent collective bargaining agreements of subordinate
employees.
180

NATURAL RESOURCES AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL
Section 210. Section 1 of this Act appropriates 1.0 ASF FTE Enforcement Coordinator position, which
shall be exempt from the Merit System, to the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control, Office
of the Secretary, Community Affairs (40-01-03) to be funded through expenses incurred and recovered by the
department related to processing of administrative enforcement actions under 7 Del. C. c. 60. Violators shall be
liable for the following expenses of the investigation incurred by the State after the notice of violation is issued:
direct costs of the investigation; legal assistance including paralegal assistance; public hearings; all other costs
expressly determined by the Secretary as reasonably related to the investigation of the incident; and the indirect
costs related to all of the above.
Section 211. The Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control, Office of Natural
Resources, Division of Fish and Wildlife (40-03-03) is authorized to expend funds carried forward from the sale of
boat registration fees, effective Fiscal Year 2000 and thereafter, for the purpose of supporting fisheries programs
and marine enforcement.
Section 212. Notwithstanding the provisions of 7 Del. C. § 6042(c), Section 1 of this Act appropriates 0.5
ASF FTE Ombudsperson to the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control, Office of the
Secretary, Community Affairs (40-01-03) to be funded through the Community Environmental Project Fund.
Section 213. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Natural Resources and
Environmental Control, Office of Natural Resources, Division of Watershed Stewardship (40-03-04) for
Contractual Services. Of that amount, $180.0 shall be used for additional field staff personnel for the preparation of
nutrient management plans.
Section 214. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Natural Resources and
Environmental Control, Office of Environmental Protection, Division of Water (40-04-03). Of that amount, $1.0
shall be set aside for the Environmental Science Scholarship program.
Section 215. The Governor and General Assembly herein acknowledges that certain programs within the
department are funded all or in part by fee-based revenues as specified in the appropriate chapter of the Delaware
Code. The Secretary shall perform a review of fees assessed and collected by the department to determine the
revenue sufficiency of the fees and programs they support, and a report shall be submitted to the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General on January 1, 2025, during the Department’s
budgetary process for Fiscal Year 2026 and every two years thereafter.
181

The review shall identify program elements that are funded through fees and other sources and shall
include an evaluation of effectiveness and efficiency. The review may include, but is not limited to, identification of
operational changes that improve efficiency and effectiveness of operations and reduce costs. The Secretary shall
provide appoint a peer review team consisting of stakeholders and individuals familiar with the program under
opportunity to review and provide them an opportunity for comment on the department’s findings.
Any changes in fees that require the approval of the General Assembly shall be submitted by the
department as part of the annual budgetary process.
Section 216. The Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control shall submit an annual
report on the Weatherization Assistance Program to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General on or before June 15. The report shall provide a synopsis of year to date activity, planned
activity for the remainder of the fiscal year, proposed activity for the next fiscal year and an assessment of the
program to date. Activity shall include an itemized list of funding received, total expenditures for each funding
source, eligibility compliance and the number of units completed from each funding source. Program assessment
shall include the percentage of completed units monitored, subgrantee evaluations (i.e. number of contractors,
contractor procurement methods, training administered, documentation retained as required and general contract
compliance), estimated energy savings for units completed and reporting metrics as required by the U.S.
Department of Energy.
Section 217. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds to Tire Clean-Up in the Department of Natural
Resources and Environmental Control, Office of Environmental Protection, Division of Waste and Hazardous
Substances (40-04-04). These funds are to be used per 7 Del. C. § 6041(c) to pay 90 percent of the cost of cleaning
up scrap tire piles that were in existence on June 30, 2006. The department may also use this funding for county,
municipal or community group initiatives to address illegally dumped tires. The department shall establish a
process for notification and award of such funds.
Section 218. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Code to the contrary, the Department
of Natural Resources and Environmental Control, Office of Environmental Protection, Waste and Hazardous
Substances (40-04-04) is authorized to utilize up to $800.0 ASF from the Scrap Tire Management Fund for costs
associated with the Solid Waste Program.
182

Section 219. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Natural Resources and
Environmental Control, Division of Fish and Wildlife (40-03-03). Of that amount, $25.0 and $5.0 ASF shall be set
aside for the Delaware Native Species Commission.
Section 220. Consistent with the exemption in 9 Del. C. § 8112 regarding county lodging taxes, rentals by
the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control are exempt from any lodging tax established by a
municipality.
Section 221. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds to the Department of Natural Resources and
Environmental Control, Office of the Secretary (40-01-01) for an Internship Program. The department, in
consultation with the Department of Human Resources, will develop an internship pilot program that will provide
work experience and valuable training for qualified students and graduates. A report on the development of the pilot
program and results shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources, the Controller
General and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget no later than September 1.
Section 222. The Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control shall provide a quarterly
report to the members of the Joint Finance Committee and the Controller General on the status of the per-and
polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) settlement agreement and associated funding. The report shall include details on
the progress of the PFAS steering committee, the anticipated expenditures of the PFAS settlement funds, a listing of
the expenditures already incurred, and the available balance.
183

SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY
Section 223. (a) The Department of Safety and Homeland Security is hereby authorized to continue
funding its share of the existing 48 patrol officers that have been established through agreements between State
Police (45-06-00) and Sussex County Council.
(b) In Section 1 of this Act, ASF spending authority has been provided to the Department of Safety and
Homeland Security, State Police, Patrol (45-06-03) in order to accommodate the match requirements (50/50 match)
stipulated by these agreements. In the event that the aforementioned agreements between State Police and Sussex
County Council are terminated, this authority shall be deauthorized.
(c) Section 1 of this Act provides additional spending authority for 1.0 ASF patrol officer FTE and 1.0
patrol officer FTE for the purpose of an amendment to the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) between Sussex
County Council and the Delaware State Police. It is the intent of the General Assembly that a total of 3.0 ASF patrol
officer FTEs and 3.0 patrol officer FTEs will be phased in between Fiscal Year 2024 through Fiscal Year 2026, in
which Sussex County Council will provide funding for the 3.0 ASF FTEs and the State will provide matching
funding for 3.0 FTEs. In the event that the amendment to the MOU is terminated, this authority shall be
deauthorized.
Section 224. State Police receives funds resulting from drug and other seizure activities. If the seizure is
defined as being under federal jurisdiction, then the funds flow to the Department of Safety and Homeland Security,
State Police, Executive (45-06-01) as NSF. The division shall submit a plan for the expenditure of these funds to the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General. This plan shall be updated quarterly.
A quarterly report as to the expenditure of such funds and to the respective projects shall be submitted to the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 225. Section 1 of this Act includes 20 positions in the Department of Safety and Homeland
Security, State Police, Patrol (45-06-03) for the purpose of training State Police recruits. Funding is authorized for
initial use of these positions to accommodate an anticipated graduating class of 20 troopers. The Director of the
Office of Management and Budget may authorize additional recruit positions accordingly.
Section 226. Notwithstanding 29 Del. C. c. 63 and c. 69 or any other statutory provision to the contrary,
the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, State Police (45-06-00) is authorized to enter into agreements
with private telecommunications companies to use space for communication facilities on the telecommunications
184

tower under State Police administration. The revenues paid to the State Police under these agreements shall be
designated for use in support of mobile data computing telecommunications infrastructure cost.
Section 227. Section 1 of this Act appropriates Personnel Costs and 2.0 FTEs for Traffic Light
Enforcement in the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, State Police, Traffic (45-06-07). The source of
the funding shall be from revenues generated as a result of the Red Light Enforcement Safety Program within the
Department of Transportation.
Section 228. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $20.0 in Contractual Services to the Department of Safety
and Homeland Security, Office of the Secretary, Developmental Disabilities Council (45-01-50) for the Partners in
Policymaking program.
Section 229. Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 5.0 6.0 ASF FTEs, $58.6 ASF in
Contractual Services and $50.3 ASF in Supplies and Materials in the Department of Safety and Homeland Security,
State Police, Traffic (45-06-07) for the personnel and operating costs associated with the Truck Enforcement Unit
(TEU) to be funded through the Department of Transportation. Any additional enhancements that are made to the
TEU to remain in compliance with Title 23, Code of Federal Regulations Part 657, shall occur through the annual
budgetary process.
Section 230. Notwithstanding the provisions of 16 Del. C. § 10104, the Department of Safety and
Homeland Security shall disburse funds from the E-911 Emergency Reporting System Fund to cover rent
obligations at statewide 911 answering points. An annual report on the E-911 Emergency Reporting System Fund
shall be submitted to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General no later than
October 15 of each fiscal year identifying prior year revenue and expenditures, and forecasted revenue and
expenditures for the current and upcoming three fiscal years.
Section 231. Section 1 of this Act includes $40.0 ASF in Supplies and Materials in Department of Safety
and Homeland Security, State Police, Training (45-06-09) for the purpose of recovering costs associated with
providing meals to recruits at the State Police Academy.
Section 232. Section 1 of this Act includes $160.0 ASF in Personnel Costs in Department of Safety and
Homeland Security, State Police, Patrol (45-06-03) for the purpose of recovering costs associated with providing
patrol services at the State Fair.
185

Section 233. (a) Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 2.0 ASF FTEs Forensic Chemist in the
Department of Safety and Homeland Security, State Police, Criminal Investigation (45-06-04). These positions shall
be funded using revenue generated by DUI conviction fees.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code to the contrary, the first $181.0 $200.2 generated
by the State for DUI fine revenue in accordance with 21 Del. C. c. 41 shall be deposited into an ASF account in
State Police, Criminal Investigation and be used to pay for the Personnel Costs associated with the 2.0 ASF FTEs
Forensic Chemist. Any additional DUI fine revenue generated shall be deposited to the General Fund.
Section 234. Section 1 of this Act includes Personnel Costs and 2.0 ASF FTEs Sex Offender Registry
Agent in the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, State Police, State Bureau of Identification (45-06-08).
These positions shall be funded using revenue from a Sex Offender Registry Fee.
Section 235. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code to the contrary, Section 1 of this Act
provides an appropriation of $2,125.0 ASF in the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, Office of the
Secretary, Administration (45-01-01) for the Fund to Combat Violent Crimes - State Police to assist with initiatives
to combat violent crime. Of this appropriation, $70.0 ASF is to be utilized for the annual replacement of ballistic
vests and $180.0 ASF is to be utilized for annual vehicle replacements. It is the intent of the General Assembly that
should funds become available, said expenses shall be paid through the General Fund.
(b) Upon approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General, the
Secretary of the Department of Human Resources is authorized to increase the Delaware State Police ASF personnel
complement to establish a dedicated Special Operations Response Team, to be funded by the Fund to Combat
Violent Crimes - State Police. The ASF authority and revenue collected for the said fund may be increased by the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General up to an amount sufficient to cover the
personnel and operating costs of the Special Operations Response Team.
186

TRANSPORTATION
Section 236. The Delaware Transportation Authority budget, as set forth in memorandum form in Section
1 of this Act, shall be expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(a) Debt Service estimates are for current project financing as authorized by 2 Del. C. c. 13;
(b) Funds provided for Kent and Sussex Transportation “E & D” are intended for continuation of
transportation service for persons who are elderly or have a disability in Kent and Sussex Counties. It is intended
that management and direction of the service will reside with the Delaware Transit Corporation which may contract
for services as they see fit, and that Kent County and Sussex County governments will review and approve
allocation of the service levels within each county. Final allocations from this appropriation will be approved by the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(c) Funds provided for Kent and Sussex Transportation “E & D” include funding for the Sussex County
Reimbursable Program. To improve the operation of this program, the following provisions shall be implemented:
(1) Sussex County Council, on behalf of the eligible transportation providers, shall submit annual
operating budget requests to the Delaware Transit Corporation by September 1 of each fiscal year;
and
(2) Delaware Transit Corporation shall by May 1 distribute proposed contracts to each of the eligible
transportation providers for transportation services commencing the ensuing July 1. Said
contracts shall be subject to an annual appropriation for such purpose.
(d) It is intended that funds for Taxi Services Support “E & D” will be maintained at least at the same
service level as in the previous year. It is intended that management and direction of these services shall reside with
the Delaware Transit Corporation who may contract for this service as required;
(e) Funds of the Delaware Transit Corporation may not be provided as aids to local governments for
transportation systems which restrict passengers because of residential requirements. Nothing in this section is
meant to require that governments must operate these transportation systems outside their political boundaries; and
(f) Funds provided for Transit Operations are intended to include funding to allow the Delaware Transit
Corporation or a private contractor to:
(1) Continue to provide the present level of service to dialysis patients on normal service days during
the hours offered in New Castle County by the Delaware Transit Corporation to the extent that
187

such service does not place the Delaware Transit Corporation in violation of the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act; and
(2) Provide service to dialysis patients in Kent and Sussex Counties during hours identical to those
offered in New Castle County.
Section 237. The Department of Transportation and/or its E-ZPass contractor is prohibited from monitoring
the speed of motor vehicles through E-ZPass toll booths for the purpose of issuing traffic citations or the suspension
of E-ZPass privileges. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the State Police from enforcing traffic laws including
speed enforcement at the E-ZPass toll booths.
Section 238. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Transportation, Maintenance
and Operations, Maintenance Districts (55-04-70) in the amount of $10,000.0 TFO in Snow/Storm Contingency that
will provide for the expenses of weather/emergency operations. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to
the contrary, at the end of each fiscal year, the department shall carryover up to $10,000.0 TFO for use in future
fiscal years. Any unexpended sums in excess of $10,000.0 TFO shall be transferred to Prior Year Operations (55-
01-02-93082). The department shall be allowed to transfer funds from this account to divisions on an as-needed
basis for expenditures incurred. The department may also transfer funds to municipalities and other qualified
entities to reimburse them pursuant to contracts entered into by the department and the municipality to keep transit
routes open during snow and storm emergencies. The transfer of funds from this account shall not require the
approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget or the Controller General. The department shall
provide quarterly reports each fiscal year to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General.
Section 239. During the fiscal year, the Department of Transportation shall be prohibited from changing
its departmental policy regarding access pipe installation on private homeowner entrances. Specifically, the
department shall not charge said homeowners for the labor costs associated with the installation of the access pipe.
Section 240. Notwithstanding the provisions of 17 Del. C. or any regulation to the contrary, the
Department of Transportation shall permit an existing church, school, fire department, or veterans post sign, located
on the premises of such church, school, fire department, or veterans post, presently located within 25 feet of the
right-of-way line of any public highway to be replaced with a variable message sign or new fixed outdoor
advertising display, device or sign structure of equal or smaller dimension than the existing sign, sign structure,
display or device, relating to the activities conducted on such property.
188

Section 241. All continuing appropriations being transferred to the account entitled Prior Year Operations
(55-01-02-93082) shall not be expended without the prior approval of the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget and the Controller General.
Section 242. (a) Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation in Personnel Costs to Department of
Transportation, Maintenance and Operations, Maintenance Districts (55-04-70) to include funding a minimum of
3.0 casual/seasonal positions and 3.0 FTEs at the Smyrna Rest Stop. With these positions, the department shall
provide, at minimum, 12-hour coverage staffing of the Visitor Center front desk daily. Staffing of the Visitor Center
for peak season hours shall be determined by the department.
(b) The Department of Transportation shall provide the Director of the Office of Management and Budget
and the Controller General with an annual report on utilization of the Visitor Center.
Section 243. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2013, provisions of 30 Del. C. § 2051-2057 shall be suspended.
Section 244. For back charge purposes, the Department of Transportation, Facilities Management Section
(host department) (55-02-01) may request payment from state agencies that occupy Department of Transportation
facilities for maintenance costs where maintenance is the responsibility of the host department. Back charges are
allowed according each agency’s pro‐rated occupancy within host department facilities, subject to the approval of
the Director of Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General
189

LABOR
Section 245. (a) Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $625.0 in Department of Labor,
Employment and Training, Employment and Training Services (60-09-20) for the Summer Youth Program to
operate a program commencing July 1. The budget will take into consideration the funds required to commence the
program at the end of the current fiscal year, on or about June 15. Allocations made from this appropriation shall be
determined through an application process established by the department.
(b) In allocations made for this program, no more than 10 percent shall be expended for administrative
purposes including staff, equipment, supplies and mileage to support the program. A record of all expenses with
funds herein appropriated shall be kept by the sponsoring agent. At the conclusion of the program the Department
of Labor has the authority to request any unused supplies purchased.
(c) The Department of Labor is encouraged to implement summer youth programming in coordination
with community-based partners to meet the needs of local employers as well as the needs of low-income youth.
Youth shall receive a meaningful work experience that provides them the opportunity to learn positive youth
behaviors, gain skills, and earn wages over the summer months. The Department of Labor is encouraged to link
educational and career exploration activities to summer experiences when possible.
(d) Funding appropriated by this section may not be used to employ youth within jobs whose sole
responsibility is participating in recreational programming.
Section 246. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $560.7 in Supported Employment to the Department of
Labor, Vocational Rehabilitation, Vocational Rehabilitation Services (60-08-10) for the purpose of securing
employment opportunities for individuals with significant disabilities. Notwithstanding 19 Del. C. c. 10, funds may
be used to provide supported employment requiring ongoing work-related support services for individuals with the
most significant disabilities. Supported employment shall be defined as competitive employment in an integrated
setting or employment in integrated work settings in which individuals are working toward competitive
employment.
Section 247. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $630.0 in Workforce Development to the Department of
Labor, Employment and Training, Employment and Training Services (60-09-20), to promote and support
employers with workforce training needs. Such needs may include the following: assisting trainers with preparing
and implementing training programs, targeting new populations, and using innovative training methods and various
forms of experiential learning as a workforce development tool. The Department of Labor shall have authority to
190

utilize these funds to award grants or to enter into contracts for this purpose. The Department of Labor may utilize
public-private partnerships with other agencies and entities including, but not limited to, Delaware Technical
Community College, the Delaware Manufacturing Association and the Delaware Manufacturing Extension
Partnership. The program will provide a variety of resources including, but not limited to, hands-on-training,
certificate completion, mentoring and college credit in various occupational fields such as mechanics and
manufacturing.
Section 248. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds to Department of Labor, Employment and Training,
Employment and Training Services (60-09-20). Of these appropriations, 3.0 FTEs and associated personnel costs
shall be used to support the State of Delaware’s Apprenticeship and Training program.
Section 249. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $500.0 to Department of Labor, Employment and
Training, Employment and Training Services (60-09-20) (DET), for creation of the Learning for Careers Program
(the Program). The Program’s funds shall be used by the Delaware Workforce Development Board (Board) to
engage employer groups, chambers, and associations in creating paid work experiences for youth. The purpose of
the Program is to expand employer participation in student education, training, and employment programs that lead
to an increase in the number of youth served through summer youth employment or other DOL funded programs,
post-secondary work-based learning and/or clinical/experimental learning programs, internships, apprenticeships, or
other types of cooperative education programs.
The Board is authorized to enter into contracts through a competitive process or by issuing grants to
employer association, employer chamber, employer group, or state agency acting on behalf of a group of employers.
The funds for the Program will be administered by DET in coordination with the Department of Education.
The Board, with the consent of the Secretary of Education or designee and the Secretary of Labor or
designee, may adopt implementing rules or regulations. The application for the award of funds under this Program
and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this Section shall be available on the Board’s website.
By the end of each fiscal year, the Board must report to the General Assembly summary data on the awards
granted.
191

AGRICULTURE
Section 250. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Agriculture,
Administration (65-01-01) of $497.2 in Poultry Health Surveillance for Poultry Disease Research and the Diagnostic
Poultry Program at the University of Delaware. The intent of said funding is to leverage the university’s diagnostic
capability and conduct essential research to reduce poultry disease impacts and develop new disease control
strategies as well as to allow the university to respond to ongoing poultry health issues and evaluate new poultry
health products for Delaware’s poultry industry.
Section 251. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation of $541.5 ASF to the Department of
Agriculture, Agricultural Lands Preservation Foundation (65-01-13) to be funded from the dedicated revenue source
for Farmland Preservation. The foundation shall not operate any accounts outside of the state accounting system.
Section 252. The Department of Agriculture may use up to $100.0 ASF annually from state forest timber
sales for the following programs:
(a) $25.0 ASF shall be used for marketing and promoting Delaware’s agricultural and forestry products
and commodities; and
(b) $75.0 ASF shall be used for forestry cost share programs. The allocation of these funds, and the
determination of qualifying projects, shall be determined by the State Forester, provided the funds are
allocated to supplement federal Rural Forestry Assistance and Urban Forestry Assistance programs.
Section 253. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Agriculture, Harness Racing
Commission (65-01-05) and the Thoroughbred Racing Commission (65-01-10) for fingerprinting. It is the intent of
the General Assembly that the Commissions are required to use the State Bureau of Identification for all
fingerprinting activities and background investigations per recommendation of the Joint Sunset Committee.
Section 254. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Agriculture, Thoroughbred
Racing Commission (65-01-10), and to support it, the State Lottery Office (25-07-01) is authorized to:
(a) Deduct up to $500.0 from the proceeds due to the video lottery agents licensed only to conduct
thoroughbred racing in the current fiscal year to pay for expenses associated with conducting
thoroughbred racing at their respective racetrack; and
(b) Deduct up to $250.0 from the proceeds, which would otherwise fund purses for thoroughbred racing in
the current fiscal year to pay for racing expenses.
192

Section 255. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Agriculture, Harness Racing
Commission (65-01-05), and to support it, the State Lottery Office is authorized to:
(a) Deduct up to $1,035.2 from the proceeds due to the video lottery agents licensed only to conduct
harness racing in the current fiscal year to pay for expenses associated with conducting harness racing
at their respective racetrack; and
(b) Deduct up to $178.4 from the proceeds, which would otherwise fund purses for harness racing in the
current fiscal year to pay for racing expenses.
Section 256. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Agriculture, Administration for Carvel
Center/Irrigation (65-01-01). Of this amount, $80.0 shall be used for irrigation research and programming, and
$180.0 shall be used for field crop research and programming at the Carvel Research and Education Center.
193

ELECTIONS
Section 257. The Department of Elections, upon approval of the State Board of Elections, may establish
polling places in which one or more small mandated districts of less than 300 registered voters as of 60 days prior to
the date of an election may be administered by the election officers of another election district.
These entities shall hereinafter be referred to as "Combined Election Districts." Each election district that
is part of a Combined Election District shall have designated voting machine(s), voting machine certificate, poll list,
and/or electronic poll book.
The respective county office may assign up to two additional clerks for each such mandated district so
assigned to a Combined Election District. If the State Board of Elections is unable to meet due to a vacancy, the
State Election Commissioner shall approve the establishment of Combined Election Districts within that respective
county.
Section 258. Section 1 of this Act contains an appropriation for Elections, State Election Commissioner
(70-01-01), Other Items: Voter Purging, for the purpose of assisting the Department of Elections with its statewide
efforts to maintain the voter rolls in an orderly manner.
Section 259. For purposes of designating and procuring polling places for primary, general and special
elections, the respective county office shall pay a rental fee totaling $300.00 for each facility used, no matter how
many election districts are assigned to that facility.
Section 260. Any state agency, office or department is prohibited from publishing or funding the
publication of voter guides.
Section 261. Based on findings of the 2001 Tax Compliance Audit, specifically those regarding poll
worker compensation and deductions, all Department of Elections poll workers shall be compensated through the
Payroll Human Resource Statewide Technology system if paid an amount equal to or greater than specified by the
State of Delaware Section 218 Agreement during a calendar year. In addition, all appropriate deductions shall be
taken from such compensation. All Department of Elections poll workers who are paid under an amount equal to or
greater than specified by State of Delaware Section 218 Agreement may be paid through the First State Financials.
Section 262. Notwithstanding the respective sections of 15 Del. C., the State Election Commissioner may
replace the signature cards and poll lists currently used with a revised poll list and/or electronic poll books on which
voters would sign beside their personal information. The State Election Commissioner in collaboration with the
county offices shall establish policies and procedures for use of the revised poll list and/or electronic poll books.
194

Section 263. Any funds remaining after election expenses may be used by the Department of Elections for
one-time initiatives upon approval from the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General. These funds shall not revert to the General Fund.
195

NATIONAL GUARD
Section 264. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Delaware National Guard (76-01-01) for
Energy. Within this appropriation, sufficient energy funds are included to defray energy expenses of the Lora Little
School building that are not directly attributable to occupancy by the Delaware National Guard.
Section 265. (a) Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Delaware National Guard (76-01-01)
for Educational Assistance. The National Guard shall not be required to pay fees.
(b) The Delaware National Guard, with the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget and the Controller General, is authorized to use excess educational funds and excess Joint Enlistment
Enhancement Program funds to fund recruitment and retention programs.
196

HIGHER EDUCATION
Section 266. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation for Operations to Higher Education,
University of Delaware (90-01-01) and an appropriation for Operations to Higher Education, University of
Delaware, Delaware Geological Survey (90-01-02). This figure includes total state assistance for university
operations costs as well as funds required to be appropriated by 29 Del. C. § 5505(6).
Section 267. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Higher Education, University of Delaware
(90-01-01) for the College of Agriculture and Natural Resources. Within that appropriation are sufficient funds to
fully fund 1.0 Agriculture Extension Agent and 2.0 Cooperative Extension Agent per county and 1.0 Agricultural
Extension Engineer for the program statewide.
Section 268. Section 1 of this Act provides appropriations to Higher Education, University of Delaware
(90-01-01) to support academic, research and public service programming in each college. The University of
Delaware shall submit a report of programs funded in each college which details the goals, performance measures
and prior year and proposed current year budgets of the programs to the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget and the Controller General by September 30 of each fiscal year. This proposal shall also include other
special line programming as described in this section. The special lines amounts shall be as follows:
College of Agriculture and Natural Resources $6,385.0
College of Arts and Sciences 1,341.4
College of Business and Economics 1,841.6
College of Earth, Ocean and Environment 878.1
College of Education and Human Development 2,914.8
College of Engineering 2,709.0
College of Health Sciences 598.5
Biden School of Public Policy 1,274.3
Biotechnology Institute 525.5
Diversity Enhancement 259.0
Total $18,727.2
Section 269. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Higher Education, University of Delaware
(90-01-01) for the College of Education and Human Development. Of this amount, $117.3 shall be allocated to
provide faculty advisement for student teachers in Kent and Sussex Counties for placement of such student teachers
197

in Kent and Sussex County school districts and charter schools. In addition, said funds shall be used to support
instruction in the Associate in Arts Program in Sussex County for those students pursuing a career in education.
Section 270. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Higher Education, University of Delaware
(90-01-01) for the College of Agriculture and Natural Resources. Of this amount $17.9 shall be allocated for the
continued support of the Just-in-Time Parenting program.
Section 271. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Higher Education, University of Delaware
(90-01-01) for the Biden School of Public Policy. Of this amount, $10.2 shall be allocated for the continued support
of the Women’s Leadership program and $280.4 shall be for the continued support of Civics Education for
Teachers.
Section 272. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation in Scholarships for First State Promise in
Higher Education, University of Delaware (90-01-01). University of Delaware (UD) shall compile a report
identifying the number of applicants, the numbers of accepted participants, the number of recipients who graduated
or received a certification during the academic year, the average First State Promise Scholarship award per student,
and the total amount of First State Promise Scholarships awarded for each of the five preceding academic years.
This report shall be submitted to the Secretary of Education, Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and
Controller General no later than November 1 annually of each fiscal year.
Section 273. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, of the
funds appropriated to the University of Delaware for Operations, $100.0 shall be allocated to cover the costs of
Delaware Interscholastic Athletic Association (DIAA) state championship events at the University of Delaware.
Section 274. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Higher Education, Delaware State University,
Operations (90-03-01) for General Scholarships. Of that amount, $25.0 shall be for state scholarships for high ability
students, $25.0 shall be for departmental scholarships to attract high achievers into the sciences, $225.0 shall be for
scholarships to attract high ability students into the teaching program and $125.0 shall be for scholarships for female
athletes.
Section 275. For the fiscal year covered by this Act, in order to continue the assessment of procedures
implemented during Fiscal Year 1993 intended to reduce the administrative burden incurred as a result of
processing accounting transaction data into two independent accounting systems, the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget has authorized Delaware State University to:
198

(a) Discontinue detail data input to First State Financials for encumbrance and vendor payment
transactions related to General Fund, federal financial assistance and college funds;
(b) Effect vendor payment disbursements of the above identified funds on Delaware State University
checks generated through the university’s accounting system and drawn on a university bank account; and
(c) Summarize General Fund and federal financial assistance fund disbursements on a weekly, post
disbursement basis, and draw down the corresponding amounts through the standard First State Financials payment
voucher process.
This authorization does not provide for any change to the processing of encumbrances and vendor payment
transactions related to Bond/Capital funds; it does not affect payroll processing and does not relax or alter any
control requirements prescribed by law or policy related to procurement, encumbrance and payment activity.
The university shall comply with specific procedures developed and prescribed by the Office of
Management and Budget and the Department of Finance, Accounting. In addition, the university shall cooperate
fully with the Office of Auditor of Accounts to aid in any review or examination of the university's accounting
procedures, records and system.
Operations as enabled by this section shall be periodically reviewed and evaluated during the stated period
by the Office of Management and Budget, the Department of Finance and the Office of Auditor of Accounts. Any
procedural/control weaknesses identified shall be addressed and resolved, and this authority may be withdrawn for
cause at any time during the stated period, with the allowance that Delaware State University will be provided
reasonable time to revert to standard processes.
Section 276. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $225.4 to Higher Education, Delaware State University,
Operations (90-03-01) for Athletic Grant. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the entire amount shall be
used for scholarships to attract female athletes.
Section 277. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Delaware State University, Operations (90-
03-01) for the Delaware State University Inspire Scholarship program. This appropriation shall be used to award
scholarships to graduates of Delaware public and non-public high schools who meet the eligibility criteria pursuant
to the provisions of 14 Del. C. c. 34 Subchapter XV.
(a) Delaware State University (DSU) has established regulations for the implementation and administration of
the Inspire program. Notwithstanding the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 3413A, funding will be available for
all new and returning students that meet the eligibility criteria referenced above.
199

(b) Delaware State University shall be responsible for the management of the funds within the appropriation
based on the enrollment of students receiving the Inspire Scholarship under eligibility criteria in 14 Del. C.
c. 34 Subchapter XV. DSU shall consult with, report to, and receive the concurrence of the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General prior to expanding the program offerings
eligible under the Inspire program.
(c) Delaware State University (DSU) shall compile a report identifying the number of applicants, the numbers
of accepted participants, the number of recipients who graduated or received a certification during the
academic year, the average Inspire Scholarship award per student, and the total amount of Inspire
Scholarships awarded for each of the five preceding academic years. This report shall be submitted to the
Secretary of Education, Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and Controller General no later
than November 1 of each fiscal year.
Section 278. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Higher Education, Delaware State
University, Operations (90-03-01) for Operations to address the gap between tuition revenues and operational
expenses. The President of Delaware State University may conduct a review of tuition and other revenue streams to
determine their sufficiency in supporting the University’s operational needs. Should it be determined that a tuition
rate increase is necessary, and before any increase is implemented, the University shall first submit a report
detailing the findings of such a review to the Governor, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and
the Controller General.
Section 279. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Higher Education, Delaware Technical
Community College, Office of the President (90-04-01) for Associate in Arts Program - Operations and Associate
in Arts Program - Academic. This appropriation is to assist in the provision of the Delaware Technical Community
College/University of Delaware Associate in Arts Program which will be operated jointly by the two institutions
under a contract initiated by Delaware Technical Community College. Under this contract, the University of
Delaware will teach students at Delaware Technical Community College facilities. Future budget requests will be
made jointly by Delaware Technical Community College and the University of Delaware, and budget cuts, if
necessary, will be shared on a pro rata basis. Approval of tuition and other fees will be made by the Board of
Trustees of the institution that delivers the relevant service and after the institutions have reached an agreement for
tuition sharing. Representatives from both institutions will meet at least once each semester to review program
operations.
200

Section 280. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to the University of Delaware (90-01-01) and
Delaware Technical Community College, Office of the President (90-04-01) for Student Excellence Equals Degree
(SEED) Scholarship. This appropriation shall be used to award scholarships to graduates of Delaware public and
non-public high schools who meet the eligibility criteria pursuant to the provisions of 14 Del. C. c. 34 Subchapter
XIV.
(a) Delaware Technical Community College and the University of Delaware (The Institutions) have
established regulations for the implementation and administration of the SEED Program. Notwithstanding
the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 3405A, funding will be available for all new and returning students that meet
the eligibility criteria referenced above.
(b) The Institutions shall be responsible for the management of the funds within their respective appropriation
based on the enrollment of students receiving the SEED Scholarship under eligibility criteria in 14 Del. C.
c. 34 Subchapter XIV. The Institutions shall consult with, report to, and receive the concurrence of the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General prior to expanding the
program offerings eligible under the SEED program.
(c) Funds awarded under the SEED program are portable in the event that an eligible student transfers between
the two eligible institutions.
(d) The Institutions shall each compile a report identifying the number of applicants, the numbers of accepted
participants, the number of recipients who graduated or received a certification during the academic year, the
average SEED Scholarship award per student, and the total amount of SEED Scholarships awarded for each
of the five preceding academic years. This report shall be submitted to the Secretary of Education, Director
of the Office of Management and Budget, and Controller General no later than November 1 of each fiscal
year.
Section 281. All higher education institutions in Delaware must be contracted members of the National
Student Clearinghouse and be required to input data. Participation will allow the Department of Education to track
Delaware’s students as they enroll or transfer into Delaware higher education institutions or other member higher
education institutions across the country. Membership requires higher education institutions to report data elements
to the National Student Clearinghouse.
Section 282. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2011, the requirements of 14 Del. C. § 5302 and § 6511 shall be
waived until such time that state funding is appropriated for said program.
201

Section 283. Delaware graduates of public and non-public high schools who meet the eligibility criteria
and are awarded either the SEED or Inspire scholarship shall receive their earned scholarship award regardless of
the appropriated amount in Section 1. Shortfalls which occur as a result of increased demand shall be funded by the
State of Delaware. The Institution of Higher Education experiencing such a shortfall shall notify the Office of
Management and Budget, and shall furnish all documentation necessary to validate the request.
202

EDUCATION
Section 284. Notwithstanding the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1305(m), (n) and (o), for those employees
who have achieved certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS) and serve as
teacher or lead mentors, the mentor stipend payment for such service will be excluded from the 15 percent salary
supplement limit only. Amend Title 14 of Delaware Code, § 1305(l) with deletions as shown by strikethrough and
insertions as shown by underline as follows:
(l) In addition to the base salary derived from subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an employee who has
achieved certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards or from an equivalent
program approved by the State Board shall receive a salary supplement equal to 12% of the base salary so
derived. An employee shall receive a salary supplement equal to 6% of base salary so derived for receiving
any of the following national certifications:
(1) Certificate of clinical competence from the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association
(ASHA)—speech pathologists and audiologists.
(2) Nationally-certified school counselor from the National Board for Certified Counselors (NBCC).
(3) Music therapist—Board-certified from the Certification Board for Music Therapists (CBMT).
(4) Nationally-certified school psychologist from the National Association of School Psychologists
(NASP).
(5) Nationally-certified school nurse from the National Board for Certification of School Nurses
(NBCSN).
(6) Occupational therapist advanced certification from the American Occupational Therapy
Association or the Occupational Therapist Registered from the National Board for Certification in
Occupational Therapy.
(7) School-based physical therapists who have passed the National Physical Therapy Exam (NPTE) as
administered by the Federation of State Boards of Physical Therapy (FSBPT).
The Professional Standards Board, with the approval of the State Board of Education, may authorize
stipends pursuant to this subsection in fiscal year 2000. The supplement shall be in the form of an
additional salary amount spread evenly across an employee’s contract period similar to base salary.
Funding for National Board certification described in this subsection is subject to an annual appropriation.
203

The Department of Education shall provide for funding the supplement provisions of this subsection in its
annual budget.
For those employees who have achieved certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching
Standards (NBPTS) and who serve as teacher or lead mentors, the mentor stipend payment for such service
will be excluded from the 15 percent salary supplement limit established in subsection (o).
Section 285. (a) Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation of $7,168.1 to Department of Education,
District and Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) for Skills, Knowledge and Responsibility Pay
Supplements. This appropriation provides funding for the supplements associated with mentor stipends and
National Board Certifications as established in 14 Del. C. § 1305(l). Any teacher or specialist eligible for this
stipend that is not employed on a full-time basis during the school year, shall have their stipend pro-rated to reflect
their part-time employment status.
(b) Any educator or related service specialist listed in 14 Del. C. § 1305(l) who achieved certification from
the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS) or other national certification during the
moratorium period between May 21, 2008, and June 30, 2019 is not eligible for retroactive funding.
(c) NBPTS certification and other national certifications by individuals paid under 14 Del. C. § 1305
excludes superintendents, assistant superintendents, directors and individuals employed in non-instructional areas
detailed in Section 1312(c), and employees of the Department of Education, except for teachers and
teacher/supervisors of the Prison Education program.
(d) The funds received by charter schools through the Department of Education associated with staff
members who qualify for the salary supplement described in subsection (a) shall be paid to said employees in
accordance with subsection (a).
(e) The Department of Education shall provide districts and charters with guidance for the processing of
the annual salary supplements.
Section 286. Funds received by charter schools through the Department of Education associated with staff
members who qualify for salary supplements under 14 Del. C. § 1309, § 1311(b), or § 1324(c) shall be paid to said
employee. Amend Title 14 of Delaware Code, § 1303 with deletions as shown by strikethrough and insertions as
shown by underline as follows:
The salary schedules and classifications set forth in this chapter shall be permanent state-supported uniform
salary schedules and classifications which shall govern, subject to § 1304 of this title and Chapter 17 of this
204

title, the amounts of the salaries that shall be paid by each district and the Department of Education to the
employees covered by the schedules. Funds received by charter schools through the Department of
Education associated with staff members who qualify for salary supplements under § 1309 or § 1324(c) of
this Title shall be paid to said employee.
Section 287. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation for Skills, Knowledge and Responsibility Pay
Supplements in Department of Education, District and Charter Operations (95-02-02). Funding in this appropriation
shall provide an annual $1,000 stipend for middle school and high school athletic directors who receive certification
as a Certified Athletic Administrator or Certified Master Athletic Administrator through the National Interscholastic
Athletic Administrators Association. Funds received by charter schools through the Department of Education
associated with staff members who qualify for this stipend shall be paid to said employee.
Section 288. For this fiscal year, the inflation factor for the local per pupil payments required under the
State’s Enrollment Choice Program, as specified in 14 Del. C. § 408(e), and for the local per pupil payments
required under the State’s Charter School Program, as specified in 14 Del. C. § 509(d), shall be equal to 4.0 percent.
Section 289. 14 Del. C. § 122(e) requires the Department of Education to review all regulations to ensure
that all regulations are current and not burdensome, and 14 Del. C. § 122(f) and (g) provide a means for districts to
pursue waivers of state regulations. The Federal Education Flexibility Partnership Act of 1999 allows districts to
apply for waivers of federal regulation in states that have adopted challenging content and performance standards,
have aligned assessments to those standards, have established a system of school and district accountability and
allow waiver of state statutory and regulatory requirements relating to education.
Given federal approval of the Department of Education’s application for Ed Flex, the department may
waive state statutory and regulatory requirements pursuant to the Federal Education Flexibility Partnership Act of
1999 as amended in the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) in 2015. Such waivers must be applied for
according to procedures and policies determined by the Department of Education and must be related to Title I, Part
B of Title II, Title IV, Title V, Title III and the Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century
Act. State programs for which waivers may be granted include, but are not limited to, Student Discipline, Academic
Excellence and Professional and Curriculum Development.
Section 290. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, all consequences related to the
Statewide Assessment System for individual students including summer school, Individual Improvement Plans,
205

retention, assessment retakes, retests at high school grades and the related student consequences shall no longer
apply.
Section 291. General Fund appropriations to Department of Education, Pass Through and Other Support
Programs (95-03-00) and to District and Charter Operations (95-02-00) for Delmar Tuition, General Contingency,
and Related Services for Students with Disabilities shall not be subject to the limitations as defined for Division I
and Division II in 14 Del. C. § 1706 and § 1709.
Section 292. Notwithstanding the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1703, the First State School Program shall be
guaranteed state funding based upon a minimum of two Division I units.
The Department of Education, Children Services Cost Recovery Project is authorized to pursue Medicaid
cost recovery for eligible services provided to Medicaid eligible children at the First State School. Students in the
program are considered eligible for special education services and have Individual Education Programs in addition
to their medical treatment plans. Any funds recovered shall be utilized to offset the guaranteed 2.0 units earned and
First State School operational costs.
Section 293. Section 1 of this Act provides certain appropriations to Department of Education, District
and Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02). These amounts are not based on the unit system. The line item
Other Items Special School Supports in the internal program unit Other Items (95-02-02) shall be allocated as
follows:
Delaware School for the Deaf:
Residence - Other Costs $88.0
Contractual Services 51.3
Preschool Summer Program 7.1
Christina Autistic:
Residence - Other Costs 212.9
Contractual Services 11.8
John G. Leach 51.5
Sussex Orthopedic School 13.3
First State School 314.5
Total $750.4
206

Section 294. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) of $2,500.0 for School Improvement Funds that shall be used to provide
technical assistance and support to schools and districts rated as Reward, Recognition, Targeted Support and
Improvement and Comprehensive Support and Improvement or with recognized need under Delaware’s approved
Federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act ESSA plan. The Department of Education shall provide a report
on the use of said funds to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General by May
1 of each fiscal year, detailing the recipients of said funds and the programmatic initiatives supported by said funds.
Section 295. Notwithstanding the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1707, the assessment to sales ratios used to
equalize current fiscal year tax rates for those districts that cross county lines (Smyrna, Milford, Woodbridge and
Polytech) shall be the ratios included in the current Fiscal Year Equalization report not inclusive of a county that has
completed reassessment effective for the current tax year.
Section 296. Notwithstanding the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1707, for the current fiscal year, all school
districts shall receive Equalization funding based on the Fiscal Year 2009 average per unit amount for existing and
new units.
Section 297. Section 1 of this Act makes appropriations to Department of Education, District and Charter
Operations, Division Funding (95-02-01) for Division II Units: All Other Costs and Energy. A Division II - Energy
Unit shall be valued at $2,387.00. A Division II - All Other Costs Unit shall be valued at $2,925.00 $3,010.00.
Section 298. Section 1 of this Act provides to Department of Education, District and Charter Operations,
Other Items (95-02-02) an appropriation of $28,150.9 for the Educational Sustainment Fund. The funds are allocated
proportionally to districts and charter schools based upon the Division I unit count as certified in 14 Del. C. §
1704(1) and § 1710. These funds are to maintain critical educational programming and services. To maximize their
effectiveness, they may be used for any Division III purpose pursuant to 14 Del. C. § 1304, § 1707(h) and § 1711.
Section 299. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Department of Education, Pass Through
and Other Support Programs, Adult Education and Work Force Training (95-03-50). This appropriation shall be
allocated by the Department of Education to the following programs/districts:
Adult Trade Extension/Apprentice Program (statewide) $1,677.3
James H. Groves High School (statewide) 3,433.9
Adult Basic Education (statewide) 959.8
New Castle County Learning Center (Christina School District) 215.5
207

Delaware Skills Center (N.C.C. Vo-Tech) 1,347.8
Alternative Secondary Education Program (statewide) 680.9
Marine Mechanics Apprentice Program (Sussex Vo-Tech) 20.4
Interagency Council on Adult Literacy 278.6
Diploma-at-a-Distance 122.9
Caesar Rodney – Naturalization 14.5
Red Clay – Naturalization 117.2
Dual Generation Literacy Program (Christina School District) 160.0
Total $9,028.8
The full Adult Trade Extension/Apprentice Program funding allocation shall be distributed to the adult divisions of
the three county-wide vocational technical districts in the following amounts: N.C.C. Vo-Tech $948,100; Polytech
$390,100; and Sussex Tech $339,100. The allocations will be used to provide adult post-secondary
technical/Rregistered Aapprentice training.
Section 300. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Education Block Grants, Professional Accountability and Instructional Advancement Fund (95-
02-05).
(a) The following allocations shall be provided:
(1) $400.0 for Alternative Routes to Certification programs. These allocations will be distributed
through a competitive bid process, in accordance with 29 Del. C. c. 69;
(2) $1,566.5 shall be allocated by the Department of Education to districts and charter schools for
professional and curriculum development activities. Districts shall submit applications to the
Department of Education detailing the district’s plan for the utilization of these funds. The
Department of Education shall review and approve plans and allocate an amount not to exceed
$157.00 per certified employee, based on a district's personnel complement for the 2023-2024
2024-2025 school year. Grants are to be used for developing and implementing curriculum based
on the content standards established by the Curriculum Frameworks Commission, as approved by
the State Board of Education or for other professional development activities, including, but not
limited to: Discipline; Special Education/Inclusion Collaboration/Consensus Building; Conflict
Resolution; Shared Decision Making; local school board member training; Trauma Informed
208

Practices; and Educational Technology. Districts are encouraged to collaborate as a means of
maximizing resources as well as focusing district activities on consistent principles. Grants may
be utilized for training, planning, in-service programs and contractual services. The Department of
Education is authorized to transfer 50 percent of the estimated district grant amount by July 30 of
the fiscal year. The remaining 50 percent shall be transferred within 30 days of the final approval
of the district application for funding;
In the application, districts shall detail the proposed utilization of funds as well as the
incorporation of the following criteria:
(i) Integration of the proposal with existing resources and programs such as the Comprehensive
Discipline Act, Delaware Principals Academy, Delaware Teachers Center, Title IV Student
Support and Academic Enrichment Grants program, Title I and II, Special Education and
local funds dedicated to Standards and Assessment: and
(ii) Inclusion of local staff in planning of the grant proposal, with representation from all
involved in student learning, including all professional employees by category. The plan(s)
should focus on overall improved student performance, with a built-in level of accountability
to determine effectiveness.
(3) $300.0 for Professional Mentoring. The intent of this appropriation is for exemplary teachers to
assist new teachers through leadership and guidance and includes a training component in order
for teachers to become better mentors. This funding level allows for a statewide program;
(4) $1,683.8 $2,064.6 for Literacy Cadre. This appropriation will provide each local school district,
excluding charter schools, with the state share of salaries in accordance with 14 Del. C. § 1305
and the state share of the Division III Equalization Unit amount as defined in 14 Del. C. § 1707
for one 10-month Reading Specialist. The purpose of this Specialist will be the creation of a
Literacy Cadre which will provide assistance to districts in designing, demonstrating and
implementing best practices in literacy instruction. Such position shall be responsible for
curriculum alignment and professional development in literacy for district educators;
(5) $1,830.5 for Educator Preparation and Development. This appropriation shall be used to support
current and aspiring educators by providing and sponsoring ongoing: pre-service training for
future teachers and leaders; educator recruitment platforms and tools for Local Education
209

Agencies; educator effectiveness systems and supports; teacher-leadership opportunities and
teacher and leader professional learning networks and supports; and
(6) $600.0 for Delaware Standards. This funding shall be used to engage educators in sustained,
intensive and collaborative professional development and building educator resources for state
standards.
(b) Any funds remaining subsequent to these allocations may be disbursed at the discretion of the
Department of Education for professional accountability and instructional advancement activities.
Section 301. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $150.0 in Department of Education, Pass Through and
Other Support Programs, Pass Through Programs (95-03-15) for University of Delaware Center for Excellence and
Equity in Teacher Preparation. This funding shall be used to support professional and curriculum development
activities in the content areas of reading and social studies. The Department of Education shall determine, in
coordination with the agency (or agencies) performing such activities, the training goals and objectives, including
how the objectives of Standards and Assessments will be furthered. The Department of Education, the Controller
General and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall ensure that the proposed development
activities are cost efficient and meet the objectives outlined in this section before agreeing to transfer the
appropriation from the Department of Education to the operating agency.
Section 302. For the current fiscal year, any local school district that has had two consecutive failed
current expense tax referenda during the time period July 1, 2022 2023 to January 1, 2025 2026, is authorized to
exercise the cash option on Academic Excellence units up to the total number of units provided under that program.
This provision will apply for the current fiscal year only. In addition, districts meeting this criterion are authorized
to utilize funds derived from this cash option to pay local salary supplements. Any district that has had a successful
current expense tax referendum subsequent to two consecutive failed current expense tax referenda is ineligible for
the provisions of this section.
Section 303. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations (95-02-00) for Education Block Grants. Of this appropriation, $8.5 shall be made available to
support the annual Anti-Bullying/Gay Straight Alliance Summit for members of Delaware middle and high school
Gay Straight Alliances.
Section 304. (a) Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, Pass Through
and Other Support Programs, Pass Through Programs (95-03-15) of $700.0 for Speech Pathology to support the
210

implementation of a Master’s degree program in Communication Sciences and Disorders at the University of
Delaware. Said funds shall be utilized for, but not be limited to, curriculum development, seeking program
accreditation through the Council on Academic Accreditation in Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology,
developing a Delaware resident scholarship program where recipients commit to working in Delaware for at least
three years post graduation and staffing and equipment costs associated with program development and
implementation.
(b) Of the $700.0 appropriated for Speech Pathology, $100.0 shall be used to create the Student Success in
Schools for Speech-Language Pathologists (SSS for SLPs) scholarship program to support $20.0 in annual tuition
for five second-year students who commit to working for three years post-graduation in Delaware schools. Three
students shall be employed by New Castle schools, and one student in each in Sussex and Kent County schools.
Schools demonstrating higher percentages of Title Nine students must be prioritized by students when selecting
employment. The university will design an application and interview process to select eligible students.
(c) The university shall submit by May 1 of each fiscal year an implementation status report on the
Master’s degree program in speech-language pathology to the Secretary of the Department of Education, Co-Chairs
of the Joint Finance Committee, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General.
Section 305. Section 1 of this Act makes an ASF appropriation to Department of Education, Pass Through
and Other Support Programs, Special Needs Programs (95-03-20) for the Children Services Cost Recovery Project
(CSCRP). All local school districts shall fully participate in the implementation and operation of the project for the
fiscal year ending June 30. Local school district participation shall be on a district-wide basis.
The following resources are appropriated to operate CSCRP during the fiscal year ending June 30. No
appropriation is made for the purchase of additional state-owned vehicles pursuant to this section. The appropriated
funds for supplies and in-state travel which, pursuant to this section, are passed through to the local school district
shall be dedicated to operating CSCRP.
All revenue generated through the cost recovery project from local school district sources will, after the
deduction of all operational project costs, be divided between the State General Fund and the local school district’s
operating funds in a proportion that equals the original sharing of expenses. Any funds returned to a local school
district that were generated through recovery on non-transportation services provided by a tuition-based special
school must be made available to the special school for expenditure at the special school. Funds recovered on behalf
of tuition eligible students served in mainstream environments can be used at the districts’ discretion.
211

Audit exceptions, including any penalties and fees, will be covered from drawdowns on future recoveries
on a similar basis as indicated above.
Section 306. For the purpose of participating in CSCRP, provisions of the Delaware Code to the contrary
notwithstanding, school psychologists certified or otherwise licensed by the Department of Education in accordance
with the provisions 14 Del. C. § 1092, shall be considered in compliance with qualification standards equivalent to
state licensure to practice psychology as set forth in 24 Del. C. § 3508. Such equivalent state licensure status shall be
limited to the delivery of services related to the Department of Education or local school district approved school
programs conducted within the course of the regular school day at a Department of Education or local school district
approved school site or least restrictive environment location. The provisions of this section shall in no way be
construed as entitling a person not otherwise qualified to do so to represent themselves to the public by any title or
description of services incorporating the words "psychology," "psychological" and/or "psychologist" within the
meaning of 24 Del. C. § 3502, except as may be herein specifically provided.
Section 307. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) for the Student Discipline Program.
(a) A total of $4,000.2 is allocated for the statewide implementation of programs for severe discipline
cases. Of that amount, a total of $2,400.0 will be allocated to the three counties in the following manner: 50 percent
to New Castle County, 25 percent to Kent County and 25 percent to Sussex County. Of the $2,400.0, $150.0 in New
Castle County and $75.0 in both Kent and Sussex Counties must be utilized for transitional services. A total of
$1,020.0 will be disbursed on a competitive basis among the existing school district consortia or to individual
school districts. Of the $1,020.0, $820.0 will be utilized for improvement of academic programs and $200.0 will be
utilized for extended year opportunities. A total of $580.2 is allocated to increase resources for programs in Kent
and Sussex Counties and shall be divided between the two programs as follows: $330.2 in Kent and $250.0 in
Sussex. If funds are used for personnel costs, they may only be used for the state share in accordance with the
schedules contained in 14 Del. C. c. 13.
Programs receiving funds under this section may utilize no more than $300.0 in total from Public School
Transportation (95-02-06) for transportation expenses.
(b) For the purpose of facilitating the continuation of services, districts receiving an allocation under the
provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, may receive 50 percent of the prior year’s base grant allocation
at the outset of each fiscal year. These districts are required to present program proposals to the Department of
212

Education no later than November 15 of each fiscal year. Upon Department of Education approval, adjustments to
program allocations will be made.
(c) The Department of Education shall determine common data definitions and data collection
methodologies for each program in this section. Districts shall use such definitions and methodologies and shall
provide information as requested by the Department of Education. This information shall include but not be limited
to the following: the number of students served; reasons for service; measures of behavioral improvement;
measures of academic improvement as appropriate; rates of recidivism within programs; and number and types of
referrals for additional services. The Department of Education shall prepare a statewide management report to
identify needs for program improvement and best practice. This an annual report shall be submitted to the Joint
Finance Committee, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General by May 1 of
each fiscal year.
(d) Based on the recommendations that resulted from House Joint Resolution 25 of the 139th General
Assembly, a total of $1,325.0 shall be allocated for the continued operation of the alternative school program. The
program shall be developed utilizing research based best-practice models. The program shall provide year-round
services as deemed appropriate and determined by the consortium board and the Department of Education within
the prescribed state appropriation. This program shall be considered a special school for the purposes of charging
tuition payments to be made by school districts of residence under the statutory provisions of 14 Del. C. c. 6, such
that the districts shall fund at least 30 percent of the total cost of the program. The New Castle County Consortium
and the Department of Education shall oversee administration of the program and may enter into contractual
arrangements to operate the program. Such oversight shall include an annual evaluation of the program to be
submitted to the Department of Education.
(e) Any funds remaining subsequent to these allocations may be used at the discretion of the Department
of Education for activities related to school climate and discipline.
Section 308. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) for Exceptional Student Unit - Vocational. This appropriation shall be
used to continue the program of vocational education for students with disabilities. The funds appropriated shall
provide for Divisions I, II and III funding for a maximum of six units, prior to application of the vocational deduct,
in a single program. The unit shall be based upon 13,500 pupil minutes per week of instruction or major fraction
thereof after the first full unit and shall be in addition to the funding otherwise provided under 14 Del. C. § 1703(d).
213

Section 309. Section 1 of this Act appropriates 47.5 FTEs, of which up to 4.0 shall be authorized as
teachers/supervisors, 36.8 authorized as teachers, 3.0 authorized as secretaries for the Department of Education, 1.0
school psychologist, 1.0 special education coordinator, and 1.0 Education Associate to operate the Prison
Education Program (an additional 2.0 FTEs are authorized in the Department of Correction for the Prison Education
Program). The qualification of employees for the Prison Education Program shall be the same as the qualification
for employees in the public high schools community adult education programs. Teachers/supervisors shall have
teaching responsibilities as defined by job responsibilities and duties developed by the Department of Education.
Students served under this program shall not be included in the calculation for unit count purposes as
defined in 14 Del. C. c. 17. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General may
transfer funds between lines and departments to pay for this program.
In the event the Director of the Office of Management and Budget proposes or implements a position
attrition or complement reduction initiative, the Director shall clearly indicate to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance
Committee when positions outlined in this section are included in said initiative(s).
Section 310. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $36,416.6 to Department of Education, Pass Through and
Other Support Programs, Special Needs Programs (95-03-20) for Early Childhood Initiatives. These funds are to be
used to support the Delaware Stars for Early Success, the State’s quality improvement system for early care and
education. Funding will also support strengthening the State’s comprehensive early childhood system as outlined in
the state’s strategic plans, compiled through the efforts of the Delaware Early Childhood Council and the
Interagency Resource Management Committee managed through the Delaware Department of Education, Early
Childhood Support. Initiatives shall include, but not be limited to, quality improvement awards, technical assistance
and assessment of providers, professional development activities for professionals in licensed programs,
professional development activities for practitioners in early care and education, early childhood mental health
consultation, developmental screenings and surveys, and overall evaluation and awareness of the Delaware Stars for
Early Success program. Notwithstanding 14 Del C. § 3001 or this Act to the contrary, program expenses may not
exceed the appropriated amount. Upon approval by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General, the Secretary of Education may make program changes based on participation rates and
available data.
Section 311. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Department of Education’s Administrative Code,
Delaware non-public school (private and home school) students shall not be subject to a tuition-based driver
214

education program for the program’s initial offering at rates approved by the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance
Committee. The fee for the current fiscal year shall be zero.
Section 312. (a) The Public School Transportation Committee, consisting of representatives from the
Department of Education, the Office of the Controller General, the Office of Management and Budget and
representatives for bus contractors and school district transportation supervisors shall make recommendations to the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General for revisions to components of the
transportation formula no later than April 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) Public School Transportation funds are allocated in the amount of $180,406.2 $186,129.2 in
accordance with the transportation formula, as adopted by the State Board of Education on July 23, 1987, subject to
the following amendments and procedural modifications:
(1) The per gallon price used to calculate the fuel allowance shall be based on the state contract bid
price for fuel plus $0.07 per gallon for districts and plus $0.31 per gallon for contractors. For
districts and contractors north of the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal, the per gallon price shall be
based on delivery to a large-sized tank (5,000 or more gallons). In the case of contractors located
south of the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal, the per gallon price shall be based on delivery to a
small-sized tank (275 - 1,900 gallons). Upon determination by the Department of Education that a
contractor located north of the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal and operating five or fewer buses
does not have existing storage capacity in the large tank range, the per gallon price shall be based
on the smaller tank size.
The initial fuel rates shall be based on the state contract bid price as of June 1 of the
preceding fiscal year. Funding adjustment will be made when the annual average price increases
or decreases by at least $0.05 per gallon. The first review will be based on the annual averages
through December 31 of each fiscal year and additional reviews will be conducted each month
thereafter until April 30. Timing and frequency of fuel adjustments shall be determined by the
Department of Education, in collaboration with the Public School Transportation Committee.
Reviews may also be conducted at any time upon the request of the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General. Propane school buses will receive the same
fuel allowances and be subject to the same adjustment as diesel school buses;
215

(2) For the current fiscal year, the allowable cost of a new unused bus that was purchased by a
contractor and put on contract and that was produced between January 1, 2024 2025 and
December 31, 2024 2025 (as noted on the school bus identification plate) shall begin its seven
year capital allowance schedule using the 2023 2024 state bid price for new school buses, minus 2
percent for salvage value, plus 11 percent to account for dealer charges and profits not reflected in
the state bid price due to the higher number of buses being purchased and the lag time between
ordering and delivery. Any bus produced on or after January 1, 2024 2025, must meet the current
federal emissions requirements in order to receive a capital allowance. Any bus produced and
placed in service after January 1, 2024 2025 shall be entitled to an allowance based on the 2024
2025 state bid price.
A used bus placed in service shall utilize the allowance schedule which would have been
allowed had the bus been placed in service when new based on its production date. The bus shall
receive the remaining years of capital allowance. The Department of Education shall continue to
utilize the procedures developed in Fiscal Year 1989 for determining the allowable cost for any
size bus that it did not bid in Fiscal Year 2024 2025. In addition to the procedure for establishing
the allowable cost of a new bus specified above, the Department of Education is requested to
structure its bids for buses in Fiscal Year 2025 2026 in such a manner that public school bus
contractors will be permitted to purchase buses from the successful lower bidder at the same price
as the State of Delaware. If a contractor elects to purchase a bus at the bid price, the lowest base
bid of an awarded contract minus 2 percent for salvage value will be the allowable cost in
subsequent reimbursements to the contractor;
(3) For the current fiscal year, the fixed cost allowance for district and contractor buses shall include
funding for the provision of emergency communication devices. The Department of Education is
authorized to bring school districts or private contractors operating school buses equipped with
cellular phone technology under a state negotiated cellular phone contract; and
(4) For district operated pupil transportation services, bus driver and driver aide salaries shall receive
an increase commensurate with the general salary increase enumerated in Section 8 of this Act in
years in which one is provided.
216

(c) Except as specified in this section, or for changes in the price of fuel, or for the adjustments of those
items changed by state or federal laws, the Department of Education shall not change the transportation formula
unless the change has been authorized by the General Assembly and an appropriation therefore has been made by
the General Assembly.
(d) The Department of Education shall calculate the formula amounts for each district as provided herein
but shall only provide 90 percent of such calculation to each school district. The contract formula amount is the
maximum funding that any public-school transportation contractor is eligible to receive through a combination of
state and local funds. Homeless transportation funding shall be provided to school districts and charter schools at 90
percent of the total cost for approved, eligible students. This excludes transportation for foster children.
(e) Of the appropriation allocated for public school districts, funding is allocated to purchase air
conditioned buses to transport special need students. The Department of Education is authorized to allow the
purchase of air-conditioned buses required to transport special education students that have a medical need for air
conditioning (specified by a physician).
(f) $4,366.6 is allocated to increase the minimum hourly rate for bus drivers.
(g) (f) It is the intent of the General Assembly that, to the maximum extent possible, any funds provided
through the school transportation formula to provide hourly rates for bus drivers, that these funds shall go directly
toward increasing the salaries of bus drivers and to address workforce shortage and retention issues.
(h) $515.0 is allocated to increase the insurance allowance and standardize said allowance across bus
capacity sizes, per the recommendations of the Public School Transportation Committee report, dated March 21,
2024.
(g) It is the intent of the General Assembly to make progress toward implementing the recommendation of
the Public School Transportation Working Group to address school bus operating cost factors not reflected in the
school transportation formula, which has been in existence since 1977. These factors include, but are not limited to,
environmental compliance requirements for school bus maintenance, maintenance costs of advanced technology on
school buses, and school bus driver training requirements.
Section 313. (a) All school districts shall be required to utilize Busology, a computerized routing system
for school bus transportation, provided by the Department of Education to create school bus routes. Schools are
encouraged to maximize the capabilities of this system to derive transportation efficiencies to contain increasing
costs.
217

(b) The department is directed to continue to provide bus transportation services to any residential area
which has received transportation services since October 1, 1977.
Section 314. During the fiscal year, local school districts are hereby directed to provide, at the local school
district’s cost, bus transportation of public school students previously declared ineligible by the Unique Hazards
Committee, including the following:
(1) Students attending Stanton Middle School who are now forced to walk along Telegraph Road with
a constant threat of injury;
(2) Students attending Mount Pleasant High School and P.S. DuPont Middle School who are now
forced to walk along Marsh Road with a constant threat of injury;
(3) Students in the town of Seaford, living west of Conrail and north of the Nanticoke River, who
attend the Seaford schools, grades K-6;
(4) Students attending Seaford Central Elementary who live in the area east of Conrail, north of the
Nanticoke River and west of Williams Pond, within the Seaford city limits;
(5) Students attending the Cab Calloway School of the Arts and Wilmington Charter School on
Lancaster Avenue to Delaware Avenue in the north-south grid and on Jackson Street to DuPont
Street on the east-west grid;
(6) Students attending Newark High School who live in Windy Hills and are forced to walk along
Kirkwood Highway with a constant threat of injury;
(7) Students attending schools in Laurel living in the areas of Lakeside Manor, Route 24 east of
Laurel town limits, Route 13A south of Laurel town limits and Dogwood Acres;
(8) Students attending Delcastle Technical High School who live in Newport and are forced to walk
along Centerville Road (Route 141) with a constant threat of injury;
(9) Students attending Woodbridge Middle School who must travel along Route 13A south of
Bridgeville, and students living west of Bridgeville who must travel along Route 404 or Route 18;
(10) Students attending Smyrna Middle School who reside in the Sunnyside Acres area between
Sunnyside Road and U.S. 13 and who would otherwise be required to walk along U.S. 13 in order
to reach school;
218

(11) Students attending Concord High School who live south of Naamans Road in the Talleybrook-
Chalfonte, Brandywood, Brandon and Beacon Hill areas who must walk along Grubb and/or
Naamans Road with a constant threat of injury;
(12) Students attending the Laurel Elementary Schools in Grades K-6 who live in the Town of Laurel
and the surrounding areas;
(13) Students attending Mount Pleasant Elementary School, who would be forced to walk along
Bellevue Road;
(14) Students attending Mount Pleasant Elementary School, who would be forced to cross over and/or
walk along River Road between Lore Avenue and Bellevue Road;
(15) Students attending Douglass Alternative School, who would be forced to walk along Route 2
(Union Street) or through Canby Park via the paths, with a constant threat of injury;
(16) K-5 - New Todd Estates Development to Jennie Smith Elementary School - because of hazards of
Route 4 at Pierson Drive intersection;
(17) Students living in West Wilmington Manor who walk to Wilmington Manor Elementary School;
(18) Woodbridge Early Childhood Education Center students living in the town of Greenwood, west of
the railroad tracks;
(19) Woodbridge Middle School students living on Route 13A from Route 13 north of Bridgeville to
Bridgeville north of town limits including streets with access to that part of Route 13A;
(20) Talley Jr. High School students who reside in the Ashbourne Hills, Greentree, Stoney Brook
areas, students who reside in the Woodacre Apartments and students who live along Peachtree
Road;
(21) Springer Middle School students residing in Eden Ridge III, Tavistock, Sharpley and Eden Ridge
who must cross Concord Pike;
(22) Georgetown Elementary School students who live east of Bedford Street;
(23) Lombardy Elementary School students who must cross Foulk Road;
(24) Students of the Appoquinimink School District who reside in Odessa Heights;
(25) Students attending Brandywine High School who live in Concord Manor and are forced to walk
along Shellpot Drive and Windley Hill;
219

(26) Students attending Clayton Elementary, Clayton Intermediate, Smyrna Middle, and Smyrna High
School in the Smyrna School District who live on Buresch Drive;
(27) Notwithstanding the construction of any sidewalk or footpath along Grubb Road between
Naamans Road and Marsh Road, any child currently receiving bus transportation by the
Brandywine School District who lives along Grubb Road (between Naamans Road and Marsh
Road) or lives in a neighborhood which enters directly onto Grubb Road (between Naamans Road
and Marsh Road) shall continue to receive bus transportation to and from school;
(28) Stanton Middle School students residing in Kiamensi Gardens, Kiamensi Heights and Westfield
who must cross Limestone Road;
(29) Students attending Warner Elementary or Warner Kindergarten who also attend the Brandywine
Day Care Center;
(30) Students attending Brandywine Springs Elementary School who live along Newport Gap Pike;
(31) Students attending Mount Pleasant High School and P.S. DuPont Middle School who reside in the
vicinity of Rysing Drive in Edgemoor Gardens, in the vicinity of Rysing Drive in the Village of
Woods Edge, in the vicinity of Edgemoor Road in Edgemoor Terrace and the Village of Fox Point
on Governor Printz Boulevard;
(32) Students attending the Woodbridge School District, who live in the Canterbury Apartments in
Bridgeville, will embark and disembark in the parking lot of the apartment complex in lieu of the
bus stop area along the heavily traveled U.S.13;
(33) Students attending McCullough Middle School living along and east of Route 9 from I-295 north
to district boundary;
(34) Students attending Talley Middle School who can walk without hazard to the corner of Yardley
Lane and Silverside Road;
(35) All students attending Kathleen H. Wilbur Elementary School in the Colonial School District; and
(36) Cape Henlopen High School students who must cross Kings Highway or Savannah Road.
Section 315. Notwithstanding the provisions of any state law or regulation to the contrary, the Colonial
School District is hereby directed to provide bus transportation for public school students who attend the Panda
Early Education Center at 1169 South DuPont Highway in New Castle to and from Kathleen H. Wilbur Elementary
220

School and Southern Elementary School. The Colonial School District is authorized to utilize state transportation
dollars to fund the transportation of students as directed herein.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any state law to the contrary, the Red Clay Consolidated School District
is authorized to utilize state transportation dollars to fund students traveling from routes to and from the Cab
Calloway School of the Arts and Conrad Schools of Science and the Indian River School District is authorized to
utilize state transportation dollars to fund students traveling from routes to and from the Southern Delaware School
of the Arts.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any state law to the contrary, the Christina School District is authorized
to utilize state transportation dollars to fund students traveling from routes to and from Christiana High School,
Glasgow High School, and Newark High School as part of the district’s high school redesign program. Additional
routes resulting from the redesign program and associated state transportation dollars shall require the approval of
the Secretary of Education, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any state law to the contrary, the Colonial School District is authorized
to utilize state transportation dollars to fund students traveling from routes to and from Gunning Bedford Middle
School, George Read Middle School and McCullough Middle School as part of the district’s middle school redesign
program. Additional routes resulting from the redesign program, and associated state transportation dollars, shall
require the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, Controller General and Secretary of
Education.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any state law to the contrary, the Red Clay Consolidated School District
is authorized to utilize state transportation dollars to fund students traveling from routes to and from the Brandywine
Springs (6-8) program.
Section 316. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, all
charter schools receiving a state transportation funding allocation shall submit an annual report of anticipated
transportation expenditures for the current fiscal year, including any negotiated contracts, to the Department of
Education by January 15 each fiscal year. If the charter school projects a net savings between the state
transportation funding allocation and anticipated expenditures, the charter school may request to the Secretary of
Education, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General that the savings be
used for educational purposes allowable under Opportunity Funding. All charter schools receiving state
transportation funding shall submit a final report of actual expenditures for the prior fiscal year’s transportation
221

allocation to the Department of Education no later than October 15 of each fiscal year. The Department of
Education shall provide a standard template to charter schools to report these expenditures, as well as information
regarding the vendor(s) providing transportation services, the number of school buses on contract, and any relevant
vehicle identification information.
Section 317. As recommended by the Task Force on State Education Technology, the Department of
Education is authorized to establish a Council on Educational Technology. The Council shall be supported by staff
from the Department of Education and the Department of Technology and Information, and shall be comprised of
no more than 15 stakeholder representatives. The Council will: (1) provide strategic guidance for public education
technology by conducting needs assessments; (2) offer policy and budget recommendations; (3) engage in strategic
planning to ensure alignment between state and local efforts; (4) define acceptable use policies, procedures and
processes to ensure compliance with federal and state regulations; and (5) provide support for technology-related
procurement. Amend Title 14 of Delaware Code, § 121 with deletions as shown by strikethrough and insertions as
shown by underline as follows:
(e) The Department shall establish a Council on Educational Technology. The Council shall be supported
by staff from the Department of Education and the Department of Technology and Information, and shall be
comprised of no more than 15 stakeholder representatives. The Council will: (1) provide strategic guidance
for public education technology by conducting needs assessments; (2) offer policy and budget
recommendations; (3) engage in strategic planning to ensure alignment between state and local efforts; (4)
define acceptable use policies, procedures and processes to ensure compliance with federal and state
regulations; and (5) provide support for technology-related procurement.
Section 318. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $3,767.5 to Department of Education,
District and Charter Operations, Education Block Grants (95-02-05) for Technology Block Grant. These funds are
allocated proportionally to district and charter schools based upon the Division I unit count as certified in 14 Del. C.
§ 1704(2) and § 1710. Funds provided by this Act are intended to support the following priorities: (1) replacement
or purchase of equipment supporting classroom instruction; (2) supporting technology maintenance in the schools
either through the use of technology personnel or contractual services; (3) supporting professional learning through
the use of instructional personnel; or (4) such other technology needs as may arise which could improve or enhance
the technology capabilities of the district or charter school. To the extent that these funds are used to pay salary
expenses, they may only be used for the state share of salary, benefits and other employment costs in accordance
222

with the schedules contained in 14 Del. C. c. 13. Local districts are encouraged to match their allocation pursuant to
the provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1902(b), provided the local match does not exceed those established under 71 Del
Laws, c. 378. The matching provisions provided in this section shall not be interpreted to provide duplicative rate
increases. The Department of Education shall be charged with the authority to verify the use of the funds.
Section 319. The provisions of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, consistent with the provisions of
14 Del. C. § 509(b), charter schools eligible to receive allocations from the Professional Accountability and
Instructional Advancement fund, Academic Excellence and Minor Capital Improvements program will not be
required to submit an application to the Department of Education. Any funds received as a result of the allocation of
these programs may be used for current operations, Minor Capital Improvements or tuition payments.
Section 320. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, Pass Through and
Other Support Programs, Scholarships (95-03-40) for Scholarships and Grants, per the provisions of 14 Del. C. c.
34. This funding shall be used for the following programs:
Merit-Scholarships: Herman M. Holloway, Sr. Scholarship, Bradford B. Barnes Memorial Scholarship and
the Charles L. Hebner Memorial Scholarship.
Need-Based: Scholarship Incentive Program (SCIP).
Mental Health Educators Incentive and Speech Pathology: scholarships and student loan payments.
Tuition Reimbursement: Critical Need Reimbursement.
Programmatic Pass Through:
$40.0 Delaware Advance Scholarship Program.
An annual report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance Committee, the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General by May 1 of each fiscal year detailing the number of applicants
and the funding amounts used for each program.
Section 321. Any scholarship funds unused in any given fiscal year may be carried over into a reserve
account to be utilized in the subsequent year.
Section 322. A school district operating a special school or program or with tuition eligible students may
not reallocate state units earned in these cases, if such reallocation requires an increase in the tuition tax rate or
tuition billing amount. If a reallocation of state units earned will not require such an increase, districts may
reallocate positions as necessary to ensure the most efficient delivery of services, except for those instances
currently prohibited by Delaware Code.
223

Additionally the Department of Education shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations
pertaining to tuition billings and tuition payments to include, but not be limited to, procedures to implement a
specific billing and payment schedule; procedures for justification accounting for any increases from estimated to
actual per pupil amounts billed; and procedures for the review of included costs to ensure appropriateness as it
relates to the ratio of state to local resources.
Section 323. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2009, all school districts and charter schools shall access the data
services and technical assistance of the New Castle County Data Service Center (DSC) for compliance with the
provisions of 14 Del. C. § 122(11). Such access shall ensure that all financial reports remain available in the new
financial system and are accessible by the Department of Education, the Office of Management and Budget and the
Office of the Controller General. Services provided by DSC, which is owned and operated by the Colonial and Red
Clay Consolidated School Districts, for compliance with this section, shall be provided through an agreement with
the State of Delaware.
Section 324. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2010, for purposes of 14 Del C. § 1321(e)(11), § 1321(e)(12), §
1716 and § 1716A, a school district electing to take a cash option or contractual option shall submit the required
application to the Department of Education no later than January 31 of the current fiscal year. The Department of
Education shall provide a report on the use of said cash/contractual options to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General by May 1 of each fiscal year. Amend Title 14 of Delaware
Code, § 1725(e) with deletions as shown by strikethrough and insertions as shown by underline as follows:
(e) For purposes of § 1321(e)(11), § 1321(e)(12), § 1716 and § 1716A of this Title, a school district electing
to take a cash option or contractual option shall submit an application to the Department of Education no
later than January 31 of each fiscal year. The Department of Education shall provide a report on the use of
said cash/contractual options to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General by May 1 of each fiscal year.
Section 325. Pursuant to provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1902(b), all local districts shall be authorized to assess
a local match for Fiscal Year 2010 Reading Resource Teachers and Mathematics Resource Teachers/Specialists and
Fiscal Year 2008 Extra Time. Amend Title 14 of Delaware Code, § 1902 with deletions as shown by strikethrough
and insertions as shown by underline as follows:
224

(c) Pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this section, all local districts shall be authorized to assess
a local match for Reading Resource Teachers and Mathematics Resource Teachers/Specialists at the Fiscal
Year 2010 rate and Extra Time at the Fiscal Year 2008 rate.
Section 326. Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, and in order
to share certain expenses of public education between school districts, any school district which receives funding
under the provisions of 14 Del. C. is authorized to enter into a memorandum of understanding with another school
district or school districts for the sharing of central services within such school districts which may use, without
limitation, the combining of similar unit funded positions to pay for a shared position to perform the services agreed
to and payments between the districts for such shared services, provided that the memorandum of understanding is
also approved by the Secretary of Education, with the concurrence of the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget and the Controller General.
Section 327. The provisions of 14 Del. C. § 124A, § 154 and § 155, and any implementing regulations in
14 DE Admin Code that the Delaware Department of Education determines to be inconsistent with the Department’s
ESSA plan as approved by the U.S. Department of Education shall not be applicable to Delaware Public Schools
and School Districts. The department shall review code references in this section and suggest revisions to make
them consistent with the accountability system and approved ESSA plan.
Section 328. Section 1 of this Act contains an appropriation to the Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items, Child Nutrition (95-02-02).
(a) This appropriation shall be used to cover the difference between the federal reimbursement rate for
reduced-price meals and free meals to allow students who qualify for a reduced-price meal to receive
the meal free of charge.
(b) Notwithstanding any language to contrary, for any appropriate purpose, the Department of Education
may use an alternative measure to determine low socio-economic status in lieu of the eligibility for free
and reduced priced lunch. The use of an alternative measure shall not affect any student’s eligibility to
receive free or reduced meals.
Section 329. Upon approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General, school districts and charter schools are authorized to utilize unfilled full and/or combine unfilled partial
units of Division I funding earned in accordance with 14 Del. C. c. 13 and 17 and the Annual Appropriations Act to
address instructional needs of their respective school districts. This option shall only apply if the school district has
225

not filled the unit and/or partial unit at any time during the fiscal year in which it was earned and if the unit was
filled the prior fiscal year and became vacant. This option shall exclude Division I units and associated Related
Services units earned in Pre-K, Basic, Intensive and Complex categories.
Notwithstanding 14 Del. C. § 1716E, and § 1716F, and § 1716H school districts are authorized to combine
unfilled partial units of K-5, and middle, and high school mental health services funding, or exercise cash options
for any full or fractional units of mental health services funding to address mental and behavioral health needs of
their respective schools.
School districts approved to utilize the provisions of this section shall continue to be subject to all relevant
salary schedules and supplemental compensation pursuant to 14 Del. C. c. 13 and the Annual Appropriations Act;
be subject to financial reporting requirements of 14 Del C. § 1507 and § 1509; and continue to be subject to the
provisions of 14 Del. C. § 1310(b) regarding school nurses.
Section 330. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) of $63,000.0 $66,840.4 for Opportunity Funding. This funding shall be
used to provide additional funding for multilingual learner (MLL) and low-income (LI) students.
These combined funds shall be allocated to district and charter schools using prior year MLL and LI
enrollment for use in the following manner:
(a) $55,000.0 $58,840.4 in the current fiscal year shall be apportioned on a per pupil basis to all district
and charter schools where such local education agencies shall have flexibility in the use of these funds
to enhance services to MLL and LI students, including using these funds to cover 100 percent of
personnel costs, excluding any additional local benefits provided by the school district or charter
school, for associated staff, contractual services, supplies and materials, or other expenditures deemed
necessary to provide additional supports to these populations. Staff may include, but not be limited to,
personnel dedicated to improving reading comprehension and math proficiency, or who provide
additional wrap-around services or mental health supports.
(b) $8,000.0 in the current fiscal year shall be apportioned to schools which meet the following criteria
based on the prior year unit count: (1) a grade configuration containing kindergarten through fourth
grade and (2) greater than or equal to 30 percent LI and/or greater than or equal to 10 percent MLL
enrollment. Said funds shall be used by districts and charter schools for mental health services in the
form of school counselors, school social workers or licensed clinical social workers, school
226

psychologists, and/or for additional reading supports for grades K-5. Services may include the
employment of staff, where such funding may be used to cover 100 percent of personnel costs,
excluding any additional local benefits provided by the school district or charter school, on a 10 to 12-
month basis and/or contracted services.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, all districts shall be
authorized to assess a local match to provide for the local costs associated with this appropriation.
Districts and charter schools must submit an expenditure plan to the Department of Education no later than
the last Friday in July of each fiscal year. The Department of Education will provide an expenditure plan template
and plan development supports, including identifying evidence-based practices shown to improve performance
outcomes for these two subgroups, to districts and charter schools. Funds allocated under this section shall not
supplant otherwise available funding.
Effective beginning in Fiscal Year 2023, local school boards shall allocate not less than 98 percent of the
total allocation it receives generated by a specific school to that school. A local school board that wishes to allocate
the funds in a different manner may do so in accordance with 14 Del. C. §1704(4). Districts and charter schools
shall each submit an annual report to the Department of Education on the use of funds no later than January each
fiscal year detailing how each school expended funds earned under this section and total expenditures by school,
and make those reports publicly available on their website; the Department shall also make the submitted reports
publicly available on its website.
Section 331. Section 1 of this Act contains appropriations to the Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations (95-02-00) ) $2,009,315.7 $2,231,165.9. The appropriations include a reduction of $26,000.0 in
state operating funds originally taken in Fiscal Year 2018. The reductions shall be allocated proportionally to
districts and charter schools based upon the prior year Division I unit count as certified in 14 Del. C. § 1704(2) and
§ 1710 or, where applicable, the preliminary roster as provided in 14 Del. C. § 504A(9).
As of July 1, reductions will be applied to Division II – All Other Costs. Districts and charter schools shall
be permitted to submit an alternative reduction plan to the Department of Education, Office of Management and
Budget and Office of the Controller General no later than the end of December. If a plan is not approved, the final
state allocation for Division II – All Other Costs will be reflective of the total reduction amount. If a plan is
approved, adjustments will be made by the end of January. Reduction plans should be in accordance with the
following:
227

(a) Districts may use Division I savings from unfilled units as a reduction for whole unfilled units. The
amount to be utilized as a credit per person will be as follows: Superintendent $156,773 $164,789;
Assistant Superintendent $133,188 $144,764; Administrative Assistant $81,682 $83,344; Director
$134,410 $149,012; Supervisor $104,882 $106,903; Principal $122,447 $135,623; Assistant Principal
$107,801 $118,781;10-month Teacher $82,372 $89,610; 11-month Teacher $88,864 $96,578; 12-
month Teacher $95,355 $103,547; Secretary $65,031 $71,168; and Custodian $63,182 $67,757.
(b) Funds associated with the cash options authorized in 14 Del. C. § 1321(e)(9) for administrative
positions and 14 Del. C. § 1716(g) for academic excellence units are acceptable.
(c) Appropriations used to offset district funding reduction shall be taken from a state budget
appropriation and may not be taken from local funds. Reductions may not be taken from funding
provided for transportation costs.
Section 332. Section 1 of this Act appropriates funds to Department of Education, District and Charter
Operations, Education Block Grants (95-02-05) for Student Success Block Grant. Said funds shall be used to
support reading assistance in kindergarten through fourth grade. Funds shall be allocated with the intention to
support one 10-month Reading Interventionist in each qualifying school only. Qualifying schools are those in a
district or a charter school, which meet the following criteria based on the prior year student unit count: (1) a grade
configuration containing kindergarten through fourth grade and (2) greater than or equal to 60 percent low socio-
economic status and/or greater than or equal to 20 percent multilingual learner enrollment. In the current fiscal year,
schools that were eligible last year but no longer meet the eligibility criteria shall continue to receive an allocation
equivalent to the prior fiscal year as a hold harmless. This hold harmless provision is only applicable for the year
after the criteria is no longer met. Additionally, schools that become eligible in the current fiscal year may receive
an allocation, contingent on availability of funding. State funds shall be based on the state share of personnel costs
for a teacher holding a master’s degree plus 15 credits with 15 years of experience and employed for 10 months.
Districts and charters shall provide information for staff hired under this section as requested by the Department of
Education; any such staff shall work in collaboration with the Department to monitor student progress and
participate in professional learning. Each district and charter receiving funding shall provide a summary of services
to the Department, no later than September 1of each fiscal year, detailing the number of students served, types of
services provided and data outcomes that show effectiveness of this initiative for the prior school year.
228

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code or this Act to the contrary, all districts shall be
authorized to assess a local match to provide for the local contribution of personnel costs associated
with this appropriation.
(b) Funds allocated under this section are intended to support inclusion efforts in schools and shall not
supplant otherwise available funding. Local education agencies may request to use funding allocated
under the Student Success Block Grant for purposes other than intended upon the approval of the
Secretary of Education, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General.
Section 333. In accordance with an Order of the Court of Chancery, dated October 12, 2020, approving a
settlement between the parties in In Re Delaware Public Schools Litigation, the following shall apply:
(a) Section 1 of this Act includes a total appropriation of $15,774.3 to Department of Education, Pass
Through and Other Support Programs, Special Needs Programs (95-03-20) for Early Childhood
Assistance Program. Of this appropriation, $12,249.3 is included to provide at least fifty percent of the
additional seats made possible by the funding added above the Fiscal Year 2023 appropriation of
$6,149.3 to be allocated to non-LEA community based early care and education programs. The
additional $3,525.0 shall be used to increase seats for early care and education of infants, toddlers, 3-
and 4-year-old children.
(b) Section 1 of this Act includes an appropriation of $4,000.0 in Teacher Recruitment/Retention to
the Department of Education, District and Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) for recruitment
and retention of educators in Delaware’s highest need schools, as identified by the Department of
Education.
Section 334. Section 1 of this Act appropriates 1.0 FTE, Education Associate, and 1.0 FTE, Director of
Early Childhood Intervention, in Department of Education, Early Childhood Supports (95-01-06) to support the
planned transition of the Birth to Three, Part C program from the Department of Health and Social Services to the
Department of Education. The Departments of Education and Health and Social Services shall continue
implementing the seamless transition of services which shall be completed no later than July 2028. The Department
of Education shall include any additional resources necessary for a successful transition in a future budget request.
Section 335. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $300.0 in Department of Education, Pass
Through and Other Support Programs, Scholarships (95-03-40) for Mental Health and Speech Language Program.
229

The Mental Health Services Scholarship will support full-time students who are enrolled in a Master’s degree
program in a Delaware Institute of Higher Education that will lead to certification as a school counselor, school
psychologist, or school social worker in a Delaware school. The Mental Health Services and Speech Language Loan
Repayment programs will support the repayment of educational loans for school counselors, school psychologists,
school social workers, and speech language pathologists. The Department of Education shall establish rules and
regulations to administer these funds.
Section 336. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation of $20,200.0 to the Department of Education,
District and Charter Operations (95-02-02) to Redding Consortium/Wilmington Learning Collaborative for
disadvantaged students.
(a) Of this amount, $10,200.0 shall be used for Redding Consortium initiatives. These funds shall be allocated
pursuant to a spending plan submitted for approval by the Redding Consortium to the Co-Chairs of the
Joint Finance Committee, the Controller General’s Office, and the Office of Management and Budget.
These funds may not be expended prior to the submission and approval of this plan.
i. Of these funds, $156.0 shall be provided to the University of Delaware, Biden School of Public
Policy and $84.0 shall be provided to Delaware State University to provide for staff support and
administrative needs of the Redding Consortium. No portion of these amounts shall be used to
fund overhead or student tuition expenses.
ii. Of these funds, up to $5,000.0 shall be provided to support recommendations related to
redistricting in the City of Wilmington. This shall include, but is not limited to, costs associated
with retention of salaries and leave balances of employees transitioning between districts, and/or
revenue disparities between school district tax bases.
iii. All funds appropriated for the Redding Consortium are limited to uses dedicated to achieving
educational equity and to improve educational outcomes of all Pre-K to grade 12 students in the
City of Wilmington and northern New Castle County.
(b) Of this amount, $10,000.0 shall be used for the Wilmington Learning Collaborative. These funds shall be
allocated pursuant to a spending plan submitted for approval by the Wilmington Learning Collaborative to
the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, the Controller General’s Office, and the Office of
Management and Budget. These funds may not be expended prior to the submission and approval of this
plan. Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code to the contrary, excluding 29 Del. C. c. 69,
230

participating schools shall have the flexibility to use all appropriated state funds to maximize educational
opportunities, including to cover personnel, contractual services, supplies and materials, or other
expenditures deemed necessary to support the Collaborative and the associated memoranda of
understanding.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69, the Department of Education is authorized to enter into
a contract for services with the Wilmington Learning Collaborative, Inc., or with any entity that provides
services to the Wilmington Learning Collaborative.
(d) It is the intent that the Redding Consortium and Wilmington Learning Collaborative coordinate spending
plans and programmatic initiatives in order to avoid duplicative programming and to improve student
outcomes for the City of Wilmington.
Section 337. Section 1 of this Act provides $500.5 to the Department of Education, Workforce Support
(95-01-04) in Contractual Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 or any other provision to the
contrary, the Department of Education is authorized to enter into a contract or agreement to support school-to-work
transitional services for middle and high school students in Delaware.
Section 338. Section 1 of this Act makes an appropriation to Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) of $1,000.0 for Mid-Year Unit Count. These funds are intended to
provide additional state funding for enrollment growth that occurs after the September 30 unit count each school
year. The Department of Education is authorized to conduct a mid-year unit count on the last school day of January
in each fiscal year for all school districts and charter schools. The mid-year unit count shall be conducted in the
same manner as the annual September 30 unit count. Upon certification of the mid-year unit count, the Department
shall allocate this funding to each school district and charter school that experienced net enrollment growth on a pro-
rated basis, weighted for needs-based funding as defined in 14 Del. C. §1703, as a percentage of the statewide net
enrollment growth. School districts and charter schools receiving funding through this allocation shall have
flexibility in the use of these funds to support costs associated with the increased enrollment. Any school district or
charter school that experienced a decrease in enrollment after the September 30 unit count shall be held harmless
and are not required to return any funds earned prior to the mid-year unit count. The Department shall explore the
necessary programming, including costs, to include changes in needs-based funding categories for existing students
to be incorporated within enrollment growth calculations in the future.
231

Section 339. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $2,000.0 to Department of Education, District and Charter
Operations, Education Block Grants (95-02-05) for Substitute Teacher Block Grant. These funds shall be used to
employ full-time, 10-month substitute teachers to provide temporary teaching to pupils when a regular classroom
teacher is unavailable. Allocation of funds shall be targeted to high needs elementary, middle and high schools, with
populations of 50 percent or more low-income students.
Individuals employed using these funds shall be paid for 10 months at a starting salary equitable to no
degree, step 1 in accordance with 14 Del. C. §1305. Individuals hired under this subsection must possess a
bachelor’s degree from an accredited institute of higher education. Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware
Code or this Act to the contrary, all school districts shall be authorized to assess a local match to provide for the
local contribution of personnel costs associated with this appropriation.
To ensure success of these individuals, each school district and charter school shall develop and implement
a professional development program specifically designed for these substitute teachers that, at a minimum, includes
all of the following:
(a) Implementing lesson plans.
(b) Classroom management.
(c) Student behavior, including disability awareness and behaviors that may manifest as a result of disabilities.
(d) Basic understanding of Individualized Education Plans and 504 Plans.
(e) All individuals hired under this section are subject to the provisions of 14 Del. C. c. 41 and, at the
discretion of each LEA, subject to district and building level professional development requirements.
Section 340. Section 1 of this Act includes an appropriation for Substitute Reimbursement in the
Department of Education, District and Charter Operations (95-02-02). Included in said appropriation is funding for
paid family leave. For local education agencies, funding available for this program shall be limited to a maximum
value of the daily rate of a Class A substitute as specified in 14 Del. C. § 1326 and current year other employment
costs. Local education agencies shall submit the request for contractual substitute reimbursement to the Department
of Education and funding shall be transferred to the local education agencies for eligible costs. The Department of
Education shall submit a report to the Department of Human Resources detailing the number of persons using paid
family leave no later than August 15 following each school year.
Section 341. Section 1 of this act contains an appropriation to Department of Education, Scholarships,
Veterinary Tuition Assistance (95-03-40) in the amount of $497.6 for tuition assistance for veterinary medicine
232

program students to support a total of 14 seats. Notwithstanding current laws of Delaware relating to the DIVME
program, these funds shall be used to provide tuition support for Delaware residents studying at veterinary medicine
programs in accordance with the Southern Regional Education Board. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not
apply.
Section 342. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $2,000.0 to Department of Education,
District and Charter Operations, Education Block Grants (95-02-05) for Athletic Trainers Block Grant. These funds
shall be allocated proportionally to districts and charter schools serving grades 9-12 with athletic programs, based
upon the certified, prior year enrollment. These funds shall be used to employ 10-month athletic trainers in
accordance with the salary schedule set forth in 14 Del. C. §1305. Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware
Code or this Act to the contrary, all school districts shall be authorized to assess a local match to provide for the
local contribution of personnel costs associated with this appropriation.
Section 343. All school districts and charter schools are required to utilize the State’s student information
system, as contracted for by the Department of Education. Amend Title 14 of Delaware Code, § 122(b) with
deletions as shown by strikethrough and insertions as shown by underline as follows:
(31)Requiring all school districts and charter schools to utilize a single, uniform student information
system, as contracted for by the Department of Education.
Section 344. Section 1 of this Act contains an appropriation to the Department of Education, District and
Charter Operations, Other Items, Mental Health Services (95-02-02). Of this amount, $10,000.0 $15,000.0 shall be
used for the purpose of House Bill 200 or similar legislation as amended by House Amendment 1 of the 152nd
General Assembly. $9,800.0 $14,800.0 shall be allocated for Mental Health Services Units for grades 9 – 12 for
school districts and charter schools and shall be allocated as a block grant. Distribution of said funds to local
education agencies (LEA) shall be on a pro-rata basis based on student population as determined by the September
2023 2024 unit count. To the extent that funding is available, LEAs may not reduce existing ratios. Funding may be
used to cover 100 percent of personnel costs, excluding any additional local benefits provided by the school district
or charter school, on a 10 to 12-month basis and/or contracted services for school psychologists. The remaining
$200.0 shall be allocated for purposes of House Bill 200 or similar legislation as amended by House Amendment 1
of the 152nd General Assembly for the Mental Health Critical Need Reimbursement Program and shall be awarded
on a pro-rata basis based on the size of the applicant pool.